Vermont, session 2025-2026, H951.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Purpose, Definitions, Legend * * *
Sec. A.100 SHORT TITLE
(a) This bill may be referred to as the “BIG BILL – Fiscal Year 2027
Appropriations Act.”
Sec. A.101 PURPOSE
(a) The purpose of this act is to provide appropriations for the operations of
State government and for capital appropriations not funded with bond proceeds
during fiscal year 2027. It is the express intent of the General Assembly that
activities of the various agencies, departments, divisions, boards, offices, and
commissions be limited to those that can be supported by funds appropriated in
this act or other acts passed prior to June 30, 2026. Agency and department
heads are directed to implement staffing and service levels at the beginning of
fiscal year 2027 so as to meet this condition unless otherwise directed by
specific language in this act or other acts of the General Assembly.
Sec. A.102 APPROPRIATIONS
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act serves as the
primary source and reference for appropriations for the operations of State
government and for capital appropriations not funded with bond proceeds in
fiscal year 2027.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 2 of 248
2026
(b) The sums herein stated are appropriated for the purposes specified in
the following sections of this act. When no time is expressly stated during
which any of the operating appropriations are to continue, the appropriations
are single-year appropriations and only for the purpose indicated and shall be
paid from funds shown as the source of funds. Capital appropriations funded
from the Capital Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and
Essential Investments shall be subject to the provisions of 32 V.S.A.
§ 1001b(e). If in this act there is an error in either addition or subtraction, the
totals shall be adjusted accordingly. Apparent errors in referring to section
numbers of statutory titles within this act may be disregarded by the
Commissioner of Finance and Management.
(c) Unless codified or otherwise specified, all narrative portions of this act
apply only to the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2027.
Sec. A.103 DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this act:
(1) “Capital appropriation” means an appropriation for tangible capital
investments or expenses that are eligible to be funded from general obligation
debt financing and are allowed under federal laws governing the use of State
bond proceeds as described in 32 V.S.A. § 309.
(2) “Encumbrances” means a portion of spending authority reserved for
the subsequent payment of existing travel authorizations, purchase orders,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 3 of 248
2026
grants, or contracts. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall
make final decisions on the appropriateness of encumbrances.
(3) “Grants” means subsidies, aid, or payments to local governments, to
community and quasipublic agencies for providing local services, and to
persons who are not wards of the State for services or supplies and means cash
or other direct assistance, including pension contributions.
(4) “Operating expenses” means property management; repair and
maintenance; rental expenses; insurance; postage; travel; energy and utilities;
office and other supplies; equipment, including motor vehicles, highway
materials, and construction; expenditures for the purchase of land and
construction of new buildings and permanent improvements; and similar items.
(5) “Personal services” means wages and salaries, fringe benefits, per
diems, contracted third-party services, and similar items.
Sec. A.104 RELATIONSHIP TO EXISTING LAWS
(a) Except as specifically provided, this act shall not be construed in any
way to negate or impair the full force and effect of existing laws.
Sec. A.105 OFFSETTING APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In the absence of specific provisions to the contrary in this act, when
total appropriations are offset by estimated receipts, the State appropriations
shall control, notwithstanding receipts being greater or less than anticipated.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 4 of 248
2026
Sec. A.106 FEDERAL FUNDS
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the Governor, with the approval of the General
Assembly or the Joint Fiscal Committee if the General Assembly is not in
session, may accept federal funds available to the State of Vermont, including
block grants in lieu of, or in addition to, funds herein designated as federal.
The Governor, with the approval of the General Assembly or the Joint Fiscal
Committee if the General Assembly is not in session, may allocate all or any
portion of such federal funds for any purpose consistent with the purposes for
which the basic appropriations in this act have been made.
(b) If, during fiscal year 2027, federal funds available to the State and
designated as federal in this and other acts of the 2026 session of the General
Assembly are converted into block grants or are abolished under their current
title in federal law and reestablished under a new title in federal law, the
Governor may continue to accept such federal funds for any purpose consistent
with the purposes for which the federal funds were appropriated. The
Governor may spend such funds for such purposes for not more than 45 days
prior to General Assembly or Joint Fiscal Committee approval. Notice shall be
given to the Joint Fiscal Committee without delay if the Governor intends to
use the authority granted by this section, and the Joint Fiscal Committee shall
meet in an expedited manner to review the Governor’s request for approval.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 5 of 248
2026
Sec. A.107 NEW POSITIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the total number of
authorized State positions, both classified and exempt, excluding temporary
positions as defined in 3 V.S.A. § 311(a)(11), shall not be increased during
fiscal year 2027 except for new positions authorized by the General Assembly
during the 2026 session. Limited service positions approved pursuant to
32 V.S.A. § 5 shall not be subject to this restriction.
Sec. A.108 LEGEND
(a) This act is organized by functions of government. The sections
between B.100 and B.9999 contain appropriations of funds for the upcoming
budget year. The sections between E.100 and E.9999 contain language that
relates to specific appropriations or government functions, or both. The
function areas by section numbers are as follows:
B.100–B.199 and E.100–E.199 General Government
B.200–B.299 and E.200–E.299 Protection to Persons and
Property
B.300–B.399 and E.300–E.399 Human Services
B.400–B.499 and E.400–E.499 Labor
B.500–B.599 and E.500–E.599 General Education
B.600–B.699 and E.600–E.699 Higher Education
B.700–B.799 and E.700–E.799 Natural Resources
B.800–B.899 and E.800–E.899 Commerce and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 6 of 248
2026
Community Development
B.900–B.999 and E.900–E.999 Transportation
B.1000–B.1099 and E.1000–E.1099 Debt Service
B.1100–B.1199 and E.1100–E.1199 One-time and other
appropriation actions
(b) The C sections contain any amendments to the current fiscal year; the D
sections contain fund allocations, transfers, reversions, and reservations for the
upcoming budget year; the F sections contain the Pay Act; and the G section
contains effective dates applicable to the act itself or specific sections within
this act.
* * * Fiscal Year 2027 Base Appropriations * * *
Sec. B.100 Secretary of administration - secretary’s office
Personal services 2,506,216
Operating expenses 266,559
Grants 125,000
Total 2,897,775
Source of funds
General fund 1,861,224
Special funds 125,000
Interdepartmental transfers 911,551
Total 2,897,775
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 7 of 248
2026
Sec. B.100.1 Secretary of administration - office of racial equity
Personal services 1,568,041
Operating expenses 95,802
Total 1,663,843
Source of funds
General fund 1,113,347
Internal service funds 550,496
Total 1,663,843
Sec. B.101 Secretary of administration - finance
Personal services 1,557,057
Operating expenses 185,178
Total 1,742,235
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 1,742,235
Total 1,742,235
Sec. B.102 Secretary of administration - workers’ compensation insurance
Personal services 896,646
Operating expenses 104,349
Total 1,000,995
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,000,995
Total 1,000,995
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 8 of 248
2026
Sec. B.103 Secretary of administration - general liability insurance
Personal services 417,351
Operating expenses 68,210
Total 485,561
Source of funds
Internal service funds 485,561
Total 485,561
Sec. B.104 Secretary of administration - all other insurance
Personal services 301,453
Operating expenses 57,383
Total 358,836
Source of funds
Internal service funds 358,836
Total 358,836
Sec. B.104.1 Retired state employees pension plus funding
Grants 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Source of funds
General fund 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 9 of 248
2026
Sec. B.105 Agency of digital services - communications and information
technology
Personal services 33,055,594
Operating expenses 16,188,998
Total 49,244,592
Source of funds
General fund 9,317,892
Special funds 1,031,998
Internal service funds 38,894,702
Total 49,244,592
Sec. B.105.1 Agency of digital services - demand driven services
Personal services 32,005,770
Operating expenses 15,300,212
Total 47,305,982
Source of funds
Internal service funds 47,305,982
Total 47,305,982
Sec. B.106 Finance and management - budget and management
Personal services 1,726,678
Operating expenses 376,867
Total 2,103,545
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 10 of 248
2026
General fund 1,320,303
Internal service funds 517,237
Interdepartmental transfers 266,005
Total 2,103,545
Sec. B.107 Finance and management - financial operations
Personal services 3,263,811
Operating expenses 835,537
Total 4,099,348
Source of funds
Internal service funds 3,880,186
Interdepartmental transfers 219,162
Total 4,099,348
Sec. B.108 Human resources - operations
Personal services 12,618,652
Operating expenses 1,683,153
Total 14,301,805
Source of funds
General fund 2,009,464
Special funds 180,668
Internal service funds 11,149,163
Interdepartmental transfers 962,510
Total 14,301,805
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 11 of 248
2026
Sec. B.108.1 Human resources - VTHR operations
Personal services 2,495,563
Operating expenses 989,816
Total 3,485,379
Source of funds
Internal service funds 3,335,155
Interdepartmental transfers 150,224
Total 3,485,379
Sec. B.109 Human resources - employee benefits & wellness
Personal services 1,470,728
Operating expenses 765,201
Total 2,235,929
Source of funds
Internal service funds 2,235,929
Total 2,235,929
Sec. B.110 Libraries
Personal services 3,142,573
Operating expenses 548,504
Grants 238,660
Total 3,929,737
Source of funds
General fund 2,470,909
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 12 of 248
2026
Special funds 87,178
Federal funds 1,241,835
Interdepartmental transfers 129,815
Total 3,929,737
Sec. B.111 Tax - administration/collection
Personal services 30,878,080
Operating expenses 7,323,104
Total 38,201,184
Source of funds
General fund 25,818,400
Special funds 12,332,784
Interdepartmental transfers 50,000
Total 38,201,184
Sec. B.112 Buildings and general services - administration
Personal services 1,090,871
Operating expenses 228,872
Total 1,319,743
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 1,319,743
Total 1,319,743
Sec. B.113 Buildings and general services - engineering
Personal services 102,231
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 13 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 1,114,195
Total 1,216,426
Source of funds
General fund 1,216,426
Total 1,216,426
Sec. B.113.1 Buildings and general services engineering - capital projects
Personal services 3,489,916
Operating expenses 500,000
Total 3,989,916
Source of funds
General fund 3,351,480
Interdepartmental transfers 638,436
Total 3,989,916
Sec. B.114 Buildings and general services - information centers
Personal services 3,684,847
Operating expenses 2,228,705
Total 5,913,552
Source of funds
General fund 723,210
Transportation fund 4,710,621
Special funds 479,721
Total 5,913,552
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 14 of 248
2026
Sec. B.115 Buildings and general services - purchasing
Personal services 3,189,478
Operating expenses 266,883
Total 3,456,361
Source of funds
General fund 1,727,877
Internal service funds 1,386,959
Interdepartmental transfers 341,525
Total 3,456,361
Sec. B.116 Buildings and general services - postal services
Personal services 892,320
Operating expenses 173,126
Total 1,065,446
Source of funds
General fund 96,479
Internal service funds 968,967
Total 1,065,446
Sec. B.117 Buildings and general services - copy center
Personal services 992,680
Operating expenses 217,022
Total 1,209,702
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 15 of 248
2026
Internal service funds 1,209,702
Total 1,209,702
Sec. B.118 Buildings and general services - fleet management services
Personal services 1,086,176
Operating expenses 251,051
Total 1,337,227
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,238,057
Interdepartmental transfers 99,170
Total 1,337,227
Sec. B.119 Buildings and general services - federal surplus property
Operating expenses 4,427
Total 4,427
Source of funds
Enterprise funds 4,427
Total 4,427
Sec. B.120 Buildings and general services - state surplus property
Personal services 389,970
Operating expenses 167,097
Total 557,067
Source of funds
Internal service funds 557,067
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 16 of 248
2026
Total 557,067
Sec. B.121 Buildings and general services - property management
Personal services 1,250,068
Operating expenses 722,602
Total 1,972,670
Source of funds
Internal service funds 1,830,898
Interdepartmental transfers 141,772
Total 1,972,670
Sec. B.122 Buildings and general services - fee for space
Personal services 23,787,396
Operating expenses 17,757,907
Total 41,545,303
Source of funds
Internal service funds 41,545,303
Total 41,545,303
Sec. B.124 Executive office - governor’s office
Personal services 2,087,428
Operating expenses 571,877
Total 2,659,305
Source of funds
General fund 2,086,338
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 17 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 572,967
Total 2,659,305
Sec. B.125 Legislative counsel
Personal services 5,562,384
Operating expenses 305,246
Total 5,867,630
Source of funds
General fund 5,867,630
Total 5,867,630
Sec. B.126 Legislature
Personal services 6,319,895
Operating expenses 5,653,460
Total 11,973,355
Source of funds
General fund 11,973,355
Total 11,973,355
Sec. B.126.1 Legislative information technology
Personal services 1,589,468
Operating expenses 940,400
Total 2,529,868
Source of funds
General fund 2,529,868
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 18 of 248
2026
Total 2,529,868
Sec. B.127 Joint fiscal committee
Personal services 3,218,498
Operating expenses 203,144
Total 3,421,642
Source of funds
General fund 3,421,642
Total 3,421,642
Sec. B.128 Sergeant at arms
Personal services 1,738,030
Operating expenses 215,269
Total 1,953,299
Source of funds
General fund 1,953,299
Total 1,953,299
Sec. B.129 Lieutenant governor
Personal services 256,396
Operating expenses 65,515
Total 321,911
Source of funds
General fund 321,911
Total 321,911
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 19 of 248
2026
Sec. B.130 Auditor of accounts
Personal services 4,914,039
Operating expenses 159,245
Total 5,073,284
Source of funds
General fund 289,054
Special funds 53,145
Internal service funds 4,731,085
Total 5,073,284
Sec. B.131 State treasurer
Personal services 7,459,970
Operating expenses 378,493
Total 7,838,463
Source of funds
General fund 2,744,590
Special funds 4,713,210
Interdepartmental transfers 380,663
Total 7,838,463
Sec. B.132 State treasurer - unclaimed property
Personal services 980,240
Operating expenses 669,064
Total 1,649,304
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 20 of 248
2026
Source of funds
Private purpose trust funds 1,649,304
Total 1,649,304
Sec. B.133 Vermont state retirement system
Personal services 287,163
Operating expenses 3,480,963
Total 3,768,126
Source of funds
Pension trust funds 3,768,126
Total 3,768,126
Sec. B.134 Municipal employees’ retirement system
Personal services 234,016
Operating expenses 1,973,853
Total 2,207,869
Source of funds
Pension trust funds 2,207,869
Total 2,207,869
Sec. B.134.1 Vermont pension investment commission
Personal services 2,696,175
Operating expenses 286,820
Total 2,982,995
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 21 of 248
2026
Special funds 2,982,995
Total 2,982,995
Sec. B.135 State labor relations board
Personal services 435,622
Operating expenses 85,406
Total 521,028
Source of funds
General fund 507,202
Special funds 11,038
Interdepartmental transfers 2,788
Total 521,028
Sec. B.136 VOSHA review board
Personal services 114,314
Operating expenses 27,965
Total 142,279
Source of funds
General fund 91,275
Interdepartmental transfers 51,004
Total 142,279
Sec. B.136.1 Ethics commission
Personal services 364,306
Operating expenses 36,234
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 22 of 248
2026
Total 400,540
Source of funds
General fund 150,000
Internal service funds 250,540
Total 400,540
Sec. B.137 Homeowner rebate
Grants 17,500,000
Total 17,500,000
Source of funds
General fund 17,500,000
Total 17,500,000
Sec. B.138 Renter rebate
Grants 15,500,000
Total 15,500,000
Source of funds
General fund 15,500,000
Total 15,500,000
Sec. B.139 Tax department - reappraisal and listing payments
Grants 3,410,000
Total 3,410,000
Source of funds
Special funds 3,410,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 23 of 248
2026
Total 3,410,000
Sec. B.140 Municipal current use
Grants 21,650,000
Total 21,650,000
Source of funds
General fund 21,650,000
Total 21,650,000
Sec. B.142 Payments in lieu of taxes
Grants 12,200,000
Total 12,200,000
Source of funds
Special funds 12,200,000
Total 12,200,000
Sec. B.144 Payments in lieu of taxes - correctional facilities
Grants 40,000
Total 40,000
Source of funds
Special funds 40,000
Total 40,000
Sec. B.145 Total general government
Source of funds
General fund 152,613,175
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 24 of 248
2026
Transportation fund 4,710,621
Special funds 37,647,737
Federal funds 1,241,835
Internal service funds 163,432,820
Interdepartmental transfers 7,979,570
Enterprise funds 4,427
Pension trust funds 5,975,995
Private purpose trust funds 1,649,304
Total 375,255,484
Sec. B.200 Attorney general
Personal services 17,117,330
Operating expenses 2,045,972
Grants 20,000
Total 19,183,302
Source of funds
General fund 8,947,036
Special funds 2,976,044
Tobacco fund 434,660
Federal funds 1,956,258
Interdepartmental transfers 4,869,304
Total 19,183,302
Sec. B.201 Vermont court diversion
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 25 of 248
2026
Personal services 1,250
Grants 5,012,871
Total 5,014,121
Source of funds
General fund 4,756,124
Special funds 257,997
Total 5,014,121
Sec. B.202 Defender general - public defense
Personal services 20,439,822
Operating expenses 1,855,610
Total 22,295,432
Source of funds
General fund 21,705,779
Special funds 589,653
Total 22,295,432
Sec. B.203 Defender general - assigned counsel
Personal services 8,277,975
Operating expenses 64,500
Total 8,342,475
Source of funds
General fund 8,342,475
Total 8,342,475
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 26 of 248
2026
Sec. B.204 Judiciary
Personal services 67,540,550
Operating expenses 14,904,686
Grants 121,030
Total 82,566,266
Source of funds
General fund 76,767,361
Special funds 1,970,905
Federal funds 1,580,000
Interdepartmental transfers 2,248,000
Total 82,566,266
Sec. B.205 State’s attorneys
Personal services 19,675,456
Operating expenses 2,818,379
Total 22,493,835
Source of funds
General fund 21,865,234
Federal funds 31,000
Interdepartmental transfers 597,601
Total 22,493,835
Sec. B.206 Special investigative unit
Personal services 151,063
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 27 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 34,335
Grants 2,174,400
Total 2,359,798
Source of funds
General fund 2,359,798
Total 2,359,798
Sec. B.206.1 Crime victims advocates
Personal services 3,733,421
Operating expenses 104,756
Total 3,838,177
Source of funds
General fund 3,838,177
Total 3,838,177
Sec. B.207 Sheriffs
Personal services 6,738,595
Operating expenses 475,338
Total 7,213,933
Source of funds
General fund 7,213,933
Total 7,213,933
Sec. B.208 Public safety - administration
Personal services 6,697,580
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 28 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 6,307,218
Grants 278,285
Total 13,283,083
Source of funds
General fund 7,978,921
Special funds 162,545
Federal funds 1,108,908
Interdepartmental transfers 4,032,709
Total 13,283,083
Sec. B.209 Public safety - state police
Personal services 85,401,432
Operating expenses 21,768,293
Grants 5,105,175
Total 112,274,900
Source of funds
General fund 92,333,444
Special funds 3,272,346
Federal funds 15,200,575
Interdepartmental transfers 1,468,535
Total 112,274,900
Sec. B.210 Public safety - criminal justice services
Personal services 5,274,841
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 29 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 2,267,161
Grants 47,775
Total 7,589,777
Source of funds
General fund 3,140,979
Special funds 3,502,099
Federal funds 946,699
Total 7,589,777
Sec. B.211 Public safety - emergency management
Personal services 6,727,689
Operating expenses 1,030,786
Grants 62,267,474
Total 70,025,949
Source of funds
General fund 1,717,693
Special funds 710,000
Federal funds 67,578,256
Interdepartmental transfers 20,000
Total 70,025,949
Sec. B.212 Public safety - fire safety
Personal services 10,703,913
Operating expenses 4,581,165
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 30 of 248
2026
Grants 55,000
Total 15,340,078
Source of funds
General fund 2,339,163
Special funds 11,259,010
Federal funds 1,696,905
Interdepartmental transfers 45,000
Total 15,340,078
Sec. B.213 Public safety - forensic laboratory
Personal services 4,643,753
Operating expenses 1,465,076
Total 6,108,829
Source of funds
General fund 4,435,869
Special funds 70,131
Federal funds 1,087,429
Interdepartmental transfers 515,400
Total 6,108,829
Sec. B.215 Military - administration
Personal services 1,179,336
Operating expenses 916,266
Grants 1,219,834
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 31 of 248
2026
Total 3,315,436
Source of funds
General fund 3,315,436
Total 3,315,436
Sec. B.216 Military - air service contract
Personal services 12,390,019
Operating expenses 1,476,497
Total 13,866,516
Source of funds
General fund 846,658
Federal funds 13,019,858
Total 13,866,516
Sec. B.217 Military - army service contract
Personal services 45,572,956
Operating expenses 8,116,785
Total 53,689,741
Source of funds
Federal funds 53,689,741
Total 53,689,741
Sec. B.218 Military - building maintenance
Personal services 1,215,984
Operating expenses 773,080
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 32 of 248
2026
Total 1,989,064
Source of funds
General fund 1,926,564
Special funds 62,500
Total 1,989,064
Sec. B.219 Military - veterans’ affairs
Personal services 1,462,774
Operating expenses 189,912
Grants 37,500
Total 1,690,186
Source of funds
General fund 1,511,104
Special funds 52,149
Federal funds 126,933
Total 1,690,186
Sec. B.220 Center for crime victim services
Personal services 2,391,977
Operating expenses 349,027
Grants 8,450,425
Total 11,191,429
Source of funds
General fund 1,662,398
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 33 of 248
2026
Special funds 3,765,489
Federal funds 5,763,542
Total 11,191,429
Sec. B.221 Criminal justice council
Personal services 2,691,167
Operating expenses 1,987,866
Total 4,679,033
Source of funds
General fund 4,331,708
Interdepartmental transfers 347,325
Total 4,679,033
Sec. B.222 Agriculture, food and markets - administration
Personal services 3,612,905
Operating expenses 462,506
Total 4,075,411
Source of funds
General fund 1,650,272
Special funds 1,919,780
Federal funds 497,859
Interdepartmental transfers 7,500
Total 4,075,411
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 34 of 248
2026
Sec. B.223 Agriculture, food and markets - food safety and consumer
protection
Personal services 6,110,557
Operating expenses 1,310,703
Grants 2,780,000
Total 10,201,260
Source of funds
General fund 4,235,750
Special funds 3,830,620
Federal funds 2,122,890
Interdepartmental transfers 12,000
Total 10,201,260
Sec. B.224 Agriculture, food and markets - agricultural development
Personal services 3,031,439
Operating expenses 720,667
Grants 16,318,200
Total 20,070,306
Source of funds
General fund 3,232,484
Special funds 683,149
Federal funds 16,103,955
Interdepartmental transfers 50,718
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 35 of 248
2026
Total 20,070,306
Sec. B.225 Agriculture, food and markets - agricultural resource management
and environmental stewardship
Personal services 3,112,283
Operating expenses 916,568
Grants 555,000
Total 4,583,851
Source of funds
General fund 808,770
Special funds 2,977,583
Federal funds 411,751
Interdepartmental transfers 385,747
Total 4,583,851
Sec. B.225.1 Agriculture, food and markets - Vermont agriculture and
environmental lab
Personal services 2,118,554
Operating expenses 1,425,694
Total 3,544,248
Source of funds
General fund 1,657,622
Special funds 1,799,983
Interdepartmental transfers 86,643
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 36 of 248
2026
Total 3,544,248
Sec. B.225.2 Agriculture, food and markets - clean water
Personal services 4,302,930
Operating expenses 596,899
Grants 13,704,381
Total 18,604,210
Source of funds
General fund 2,040,981
Special funds 13,143,719
Federal funds 899,994
Interdepartmental transfers 2,519,516
Total 18,604,210
Sec. B.226 Financial regulation - administration
Personal services 3,191,764
Operating expenses 119,849
Grants 100,000
Total 3,411,613
Source of funds
Special funds 3,411,613
Total 3,411,613
Sec. B.227 Financial regulation - banking
Personal services 2,626,530
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 37 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 489,061
Total 3,115,591
Source of funds
Special funds 3,115,591
Total 3,115,591
Sec. B.228 Financial regulation - insurance
Personal services 6,081,320
Operating expenses 726,826
Total 6,808,146
Source of funds
Special funds 6,808,146
Total 6,808,146
Sec. B.229 Financial regulation - captive insurance
Personal services 5,852,030
Operating expenses 485,166
Total 6,337,196
Source of funds
Special funds 6,337,196
Total 6,337,196
Sec. B.230 Financial regulation - securities
Personal services 1,484,957
Operating expenses 236,805
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 38 of 248
2026
Total 1,721,762
Source of funds
Special funds 1,721,762
Total 1,721,762
Sec. B.232 Secretary of state
Personal services 22,771,803
Operating expenses 3,553,687
Grants 1,800,000
Total 28,125,490
Source of funds
General fund 1,800,000
Special funds 21,682,168
Federal funds 4,643,322
Total 28,125,490
Sec. B.233 Public service - regulation and energy
Personal services 13,710,252
Operating expenses 2,748,196
Grants 16,375,000
Total 32,833,448
Source of funds
Special funds 12,654,322
Federal funds 18,595,869
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 39 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 1,568,571
Enterprise funds 14,686
Total 32,833,448
Sec. B.233.1 VT Community broadband board
Personal services 2,453,429
Operating expenses 816,431
Grants 43,000,000
Total 46,269,860
Source of funds
Special funds 882,735
Federal funds 45,387,125
Total 46,269,860
Sec. B.234 Public utility commission
Personal services 4,685,041
Operating expenses 604,301
Total 5,289,342
Source of funds
Special funds 5,289,342
Total 5,289,342
Sec. B.235 Enhanced 9-1-1 board
Personal services 4,854,520
Operating expenses 704,797
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 40 of 248
2026
Total 5,559,317
Source of funds
Special funds 5,559,317
Total 5,559,317
Sec. B.236 Human rights commission
Personal services 1,352,987
Operating expenses 178,128
Total 1,531,115
Source of funds
General fund 1,531,115
Total 1,531,115
Sec. B.236.1 Liquor and lottery commission
Personal services 11,295,690
Operating expenses 5,914,352
Total 17,210,042
Source of funds
Special funds 125,000
Tobacco fund 252,863
Interdepartmental transfers 70,000
Enterprise funds 16,762,179
Total 17,210,042
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 41 of 248
2026
Sec. B.240 Cannabis control board
Personal services 4,669,174
Operating expenses 2,456,952
Grants 15,000
Total 7,141,126
Source of funds
General fund 4,576,032
Special funds 2,565,094
Total 7,141,126
Sec. B.241 Total protection to persons and property
Source of funds
General fund 302,868,880
Special funds 123,157,988
Tobacco fund 687,523
Federal funds 252,448,869
Interdepartmental transfers 18,844,569
Enterprise funds 16,776,865
Total 714,784,694
Sec. B.300 Human services - agency of human services - secretary’s office
Personal services 18,803,543
Operating expenses 8,491,902
Grants 3,257,864
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 42 of 248
2026
Total 30,553,309
Source of funds
General fund 12,150,921
Special funds 135,517
Federal funds 15,052,120
Global Commitment fund 2,875,929
Interdepartmental transfers 338,822
Total 30,553,309
Sec. B.301 Secretary’s office - global commitment
Grants 2,273,186,435
Total 2,273,186,435
Source of funds
General fund 743,900,289
Special funds 31,874,504
Tobacco fund 21,049,373
State health care resources fund 31,074,772
Federal funds 1,440,101,602
Interdepartmental transfers 5,185,895
Total 2,273,186,435
Sec. B.303 Developmental disabilities council
Personal services 536,809
Operating expenses 91,194
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 43 of 248
2026
Grants 191,595
Total 819,598
Source of funds
Federal funds 819,598
Total 819,598
Sec. B.304 Human services board
Personal services 837,298
Operating expenses 103,145
Total 940,443
Source of funds
General fund 550,413
Federal funds 390,030
Total 940,443
Sec. B.305 AHS - administrative fund
Personal services 330,000
Operating expenses 13,170,000
Total 13,500,000
Source of funds
Interdepartmental transfers 13,500,000
Total 13,500,000
Sec. B.306 Department of Vermont health access - administration
Personal services 147,234,611
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 44 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 47,892,588
Grants 3,112,301
Total 198,239,500
Source of funds
General fund 43,531,984
Special funds 11,408,238
Federal funds 135,473,624
Global Commitment fund 4,814,385
Interdepartmental transfers 3,011,269
Total 198,239,500
Sec. B.307 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program - global
commitment
Grants 1,018,891,468
Total 1,018,891,468
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 1,018,891,468
Total 1,018,891,468
Sec. B.309 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid program - state
only
Grants 87,719,396
Total 87,719,396
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 45 of 248
2026
General fund 62,223,167
Special funds 20,025,000
Global Commitment fund 5,471,229
Total 87,719,396
Sec. B.310 Department of Vermont health access - Medicaid non-waiver
matched
Grants 53,713,422
Total 53,713,422
Source of funds
General fund 13,976,890
Federal funds 39,736,532
Total 53,713,422
Sec. B.311 Health - administration and support
Personal services 9,530,484
Operating expenses 9,699,306
Grants 0
Total 19,229,790
Source of funds
General fund 3,988,804
Special funds 1,584,462
Tobacco fund 70,101
Federal funds 9,440,311
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 46 of 248
2026
Global Commitment fund 4,018,122
Interdepartmental transfers 127,990
Total 19,229,790
Sec. B.312 Health - public health
Personal services 74,383,408
Operating expenses 9,332,917
Grants 50,181,945
Total 133,898,270
Source of funds
General fund 16,942,106
Special funds 28,928,042
Tobacco fund 1,022,514
Federal funds 64,633,236
Global Commitment fund 19,796,403
Interdepartmental transfers 2,550,969
Permanent trust funds 25,000
Total 133,898,270
Sec. B.313 Health - substance use programs
Personal services 6,228,331
Operating expenses 1,597,360
Grants 62,950,881
Total 70,776,572
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 47 of 248
2026
Source of funds
General fund 4,597,402
Special funds 11,594,473
Tobacco fund 949,917
Federal funds 16,490,182
Global Commitment fund 37,144,598
Total 70,776,572
Sec. B.314 Mental health - mental health
Personal services 15,045,226
Operating expenses 3,284,381
Grants 284,925,309
Total 303,254,916
Source of funds
General fund 16,159,945
Special funds 1,006,836
Federal funds 13,679,245
Global Commitment fund 271,143,986
Interdepartmental transfers 1,264,904
Total 303,254,916
Sec. B.315 Department of mental health - mental health facilities
Personal services 42,645,892
Operating expenses 3,453,114
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 48 of 248
2026
Total 46,099,006
Source of funds
General fund 23,627,954
Special funds 1,711,833
Global Commitment fund 20,759,219
Total 46,099,006
Sec. B.316 Department for children and families - administration & support
services
Personal services 53,504,671
Operating expenses 21,318,873
Grants 5,311,047
Total 80,134,591
Source of funds
General fund 54,056,305
Special funds 2,695,360
Federal funds 20,162,623
Global Commitment fund 2,593,300
Interdepartmental transfers 627,003
Total 80,134,591
Sec. B.317 Department for children and families - family services
Personal services 53,086,776
Operating expenses 5,608,679
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 49 of 248
2026
Grants 101,038,145
Total 159,733,600
Source of funds
General fund 68,388,078
Special funds 729,150
Federal funds 37,280,968
Global Commitment fund 53,320,404
Interdepartmental transfers 15,000
Total 159,733,600
Sec. B.318 Department for children and families - child development
Personal services 7,080,069
Operating expenses 1,017,973
Grants 225,731,684
Total 233,829,726
Source of funds
General fund 71,876,506
Special funds 104,967,803
Federal funds 42,948,970
Global Commitment fund 14,036,447
Total 233,829,726
Sec. B.319 Department for children and families - office of child support
Personal services 14,842,317
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 50 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 3,753,380
Total 18,595,697
Source of funds
General fund 5,841,149
Special funds 453,110
Federal funds 11,913,838
Interdepartmental transfers 387,600
Total 18,595,697
Sec. B.320 Department for children and families - aid to aged, blind and
disabled
Personal services 2,611,765
Grants 10,283,881
Total 12,895,646
Source of funds
General fund 7,452,643
Global Commitment fund 5,443,003
Total 12,895,646
Sec. B.321 Department for children and families - general assistance
Personal services 15,000
Grants 11,190,819
Total 11,205,819
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 51 of 248
2026
General fund 11,004,245
Federal funds 11,098
Global Commitment fund 190,476
Total 11,205,819
Sec. B.322 Department for children and families - 3SquaresVT
Grants 53,077,812
Total 53,077,812
Source of funds
Federal funds 53,077,812
Total 53,077,812
Sec. B.323 Department for children and families - reach up
Operating expenses 23,821
Grants 32,466,947
Total 32,490,768
Source of funds
General fund 17,904,212
Special funds 6,106,068
Federal funds 4,953,062
Global Commitment fund 3,527,426
Total 32,490,768
Sec. B.324 Department for children and families - home heating fuel
assistance/LIHEAP
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 52 of 248
2026
Grants 20,730,395
Total 20,730,395
Source of funds
Special funds 1,480,395
Federal funds 19,250,000
Total 20,730,395
Sec. B.325 Department for children and families - office of economic
opportunity
Personal services 1,872,257
Operating expenses 188,231
Grants 55,272,640
Total 57,333,128
Source of funds
General fund 48,486,907
Special funds 83,135
Federal funds 5,139,585
Global Commitment fund 3,623,501
Total 57,333,128
Sec. B.326 Department for children and families - OEO - weatherization
assistance
Personal services 473,291
Operating expenses 277,072
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 53 of 248
2026
Grants 16,147,885
Total 16,898,248
Source of funds
Special funds 7,733,295
Federal funds 9,164,953
Total 16,898,248
Sec. B.327 Department for children and families - secure residential treatment
Personal services 258,100
Operating expenses 38,870
Grants 4,476,862
Total 4,773,832
Source of funds
General fund 4,743,832
Global Commitment fund 30,000
Total 4,773,832
Sec. B.328 Department for children and families - disability determination
services
Personal services 8,771,035
Operating expenses 632,678
Total 9,403,713
Source of funds
General fund 141,599
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 54 of 248
2026
Federal funds 9,262,114
Total 9,403,713
Sec. B.329 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - administration &
support
Personal services 53,613,657
Operating expenses 7,899,745
Total 61,513,402
Source of funds
General fund 28,240,734
Special funds 2,601,056
Federal funds 29,054,031
Global Commitment fund 110,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,507,581
Total 61,513,402
Sec. B.330 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - advocacy and
independent living grants
Grants 27,332,274
Total 27,332,274
Source of funds
General fund 8,769,909
Federal funds 10,541,896
Global Commitment fund 8,020,469
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 55 of 248
2026
Total 27,332,274
Sec. B.331 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - blind and visually
impaired
Grants 3,557,604
Total 3,557,604
Source of funds
General fund 639,154
Special funds 223,450
Federal funds 2,390,000
Global Commitment fund 305,000
Total 3,557,604
Sec. B.332 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - vocational
rehabilitation
Grants 10,145,384
Total 10,145,384
Source of funds
General fund 371,845
Federal funds 9,616,000
Interdepartmental transfers 157,539
Total 10,145,384
Sec. B.333 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - developmental
services
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 56 of 248
2026
Grants 361,412,468
Total 361,412,468
Source of funds
General fund 132,732
Special funds 15,463
Federal funds 200,000
Global Commitment fund 360,997,607
Interdepartmental transfers 66,666
Total 361,412,468
Sec. B.334 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - TBI home and
community based waiver
Grants 7,617,804
Total 7,617,804
Source of funds
Global Commitment fund 7,617,804
Total 7,617,804
Sec. B.334.1 Disabilities, aging, and independent living - long term care
Grants 363,402,885
Total 363,402,885
Source of funds
General fund 498,579
Federal funds 2,450,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 57 of 248
2026
Global Commitment fund 360,454,306
Total 363,402,885
Sec. B.335 Corrections - administration
Personal services 6,294,173
Operating expenses 269,950
Total 6,564,123
Source of funds
General fund 6,564,123
Total 6,564,123
Sec. B.336 Corrections - parole board
Personal services 546,911
Operating expenses 60,112
Total 607,023
Source of funds
General fund 607,023
Total 607,023
Sec. B.337 Corrections - correctional education
Personal services 4,229,246
Operating expenses 255,064
Total 4,484,310
Source of funds
General fund 4,335,526
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 58 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 148,784
Total 4,484,310
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 185,053,487
Operating expenses 28,640,294
Grants 801,823
Total 214,495,604
Source of funds
General fund 205,731,635
Special funds 935,963
Federal funds 581,790
Global Commitment fund 6,849,901
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315
Total 214,495,604
Sec. B.338.1 Corrections - justice reinvestment II
Grants 11,189,702
Total 11,189,702
Source of funds
General fund 8,625,161
Global Commitment fund 2,564,541
Total 11,189,702
Sec. B.339 Corrections - correctional services - out of state beds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 59 of 248
2026
Personal services 4,130,378
Total 4,130,378
Source of funds
General fund 4,130,378
Total 4,130,378
Sec. B.340 Corrections - correctional facilities - recreation
Personal services 694,135
Operating expenses 457,555
Total 1,151,690
Source of funds
Special funds 1,151,690
Total 1,151,690
Sec. B.341 Corrections - Vermont offender work program
Personal services 515,893
Operating expenses 160,570
Total 676,463
Source of funds
Internal service funds 676,463
Total 676,463
Sec. B.342 Vermont veterans’ home - care and support services
Personal services 24,295,479
Operating expenses 7,265,907
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 60 of 248
2026
Total 31,561,386
Source of funds
General fund 10,370,653
Special funds 12,153,730
Federal funds 9,037,003
Total 31,561,386
Sec. B.343 Commission on women
Personal services 446,911
Operating expenses 93,377
Total 540,288
Source of funds
General fund 536,228
Special funds 4,060
Total 540,288
Sec. B.344 Retired senior volunteer program
Grants 169,909
Total 169,909
Source of funds
General fund 169,909
Total 169,909
Sec. B.345 Green mountain care board
Personal services 10,791,488
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 61 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 585,144
Total 11,376,632
Source of funds
General fund 4,403,223
Special funds 6,973,409
Total 11,376,632
Sec. B.346 Office of the child, youth, and family advocate
Personal services 407,107
Operating expenses 85,059
Total 492,166
Source of funds
General fund 492,166
Total 492,166
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,516,164,329
Special funds 256,576,042
Tobacco fund 23,091,905
State health care resources fund 31,074,772
Federal funds 2,012,852,223
Global Commitment fund 2,214,599,524
Internal service funds 676,463
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 62 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 29,286,337
Permanent trust funds 25,000
Total 6,084,346,595
Sec. B.400 Labor - programs
Personal services 37,245,562
Operating expenses 5,944,271
Grants 1,632,900
Total 44,822,733
Source of funds
General fund 11,854,490
Special funds 10,685,153
Federal funds 22,188,227
Interdepartmental transfers 94,863
Total 44,822,733
Sec. B.401 Total labor
Source of funds
General fund 11,854,490
Special funds 10,685,153
Federal funds 22,188,227
Interdepartmental transfers 94,863
Total 44,822,733
Sec. B.500 Education - education services
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 63 of 248
2026
Personal services 34,311,091
Operating expenses 6,389,982
Grants 188,531,318
Total 229,232,391
Source of funds
General fund 20,194,009
Special funds 2,111,117
Tobacco fund 750,388
Education fund 3,937,725
Federal funds 200,665,386
Global Commitment fund 260,000
Interdepartmental transfers 1,313,766
Total 229,232,391
Sec. B.502 Education - special education: formula grants
Personal services 1,083,000
Grants 275,642,100
Total 276,725,100
Source of funds
Education fund 276,725,100
Total 276,725,100
Sec. B.503 Education - state-placed students
Grants 18,286,500
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 64 of 248
2026
Total 18,286,500
Source of funds
Education fund 18,286,500
Total 18,286,500
Sec. B.504 Education - adult education and literacy
Grants 5,290,338
Total 5,290,338
Source of funds
General fund 4,349,673
Federal funds 940,665
Total 5,290,338
Sec. B.504.1 Education - Flexible Pathways
Grants 11,742,782
Total 11,742,782
Source of funds
General fund 921,500
Education fund 10,821,282
Total 11,742,782
Sec. B.505 Education - adjusted education payment
Grants 2,067,557,580
Total 2,067,557,580
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 65 of 248
2026
Education fund 2,067,557,580
Total 2,067,557,580
Sec. B.506 Education - transportation
Grants 26,925,382
Total 26,925,382
Source of funds
Education fund 26,925,382
Total 26,925,382
Sec. B.507 Education - merger support grants
Grants 1,800,000
Total 1,800,000
Source of funds
Education fund 1,800,000
Total 1,800,000
Sec. B.507.1 Education - EL categorical aid
Grants 2,500,000
Total 2,500,000
Source of funds
Education fund 2,500,000
Total 2,500,000
Sec. B.508 Education - nutrition
Grants 18,300,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 66 of 248
2026
Total 18,300,000
Source of funds
Education fund 18,300,000
Total 18,300,000
Sec. B.509 Education - afterschool grant program
Personal services 484,293
Operating expenses 20,707
Grants 9,595,000
Total 10,100,000
Source of funds
Special funds 10,100,000
Total 10,100,000
Sec. B.510 Education - essential early education grant
Grants 9,552,240
Total 9,552,240
Source of funds
Education fund 9,552,240
Total 9,552,240
Sec. B.511 Education - technical education
Grants 19,636,750
Total 19,636,750
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 67 of 248
2026
Education fund 19,636,750
Total 19,636,750
Sec. B.511.1 State board of education
Personal services 184,208
Operating expenses 16,500
Total 200,708
Source of funds
General fund 200,708
Total 200,708
Sec. B.513 Retired teachers pension plus funding
Grants 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Source of funds
General fund 15,000,000
Total 15,000,000
Sec. B.514 State teachers’ retirement system
Grants 212,905,084
Total 212,905,084
Source of funds
General fund 170,750,066
Education fund 42,155,018
Total 212,905,084
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 68 of 248
2026
Sec. B.514.1 State teachers’ retirement system administration
Personal services 428,408
Operating expenses 3,750,161
Total 4,178,569
Source of funds
Pension trust funds 4,178,569
Total 4,178,569
Sec. B.515 Retired teachers’ health care and medical benefits
Grants 90,834,595
Total 90,834,595
Source of funds
General fund 62,640,904
Education fund 28,193,691
Total 90,834,595
Sec. B.516 Total general education
Source of funds
General fund 274,056,860
Special funds 12,211,117
Tobacco fund 750,388
Education fund 2,526,391,268
Federal funds 201,606,051
Global Commitment fund 260,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 69 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 1,313,766
Pension trust funds 4,178,569
Total 3,020,768,019
Sec. B.600 University of Vermont
Grants 59,099,447
Total 59,099,447
Source of funds
General fund 59,099,447
Total 59,099,447
Sec. B.602 Vermont state colleges
Grants 54,042,753
Total 54,042,753
Source of funds
General fund 54,042,753
Total 54,042,753
Sec. B.603 Vermont state colleges - allied health
Grants 1,806,000
Total 1,806,000
Source of funds
General fund 306,000
Global Commitment fund 1,500,000
Total 1,806,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 70 of 248
2026
Sec. B.605 Vermont student assistance corporation
Grants 27,897,494
Total 27,897,494
Source of funds
General fund 27,897,494
Total 27,897,494
Sec. B.605.1 VSAC - flexible pathways stipend
Grants 82,450
Total 82,450
Source of funds
General fund 41,225
Education fund 41,225
Total 82,450
Sec. B.606 New England higher education compact
Grants 86,520
Total 86,520
Source of funds
General fund 86,520
Total 86,520
Sec. B.607 Total higher education
Source of funds
General fund 141,473,439
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 71 of 248
2026
Education fund 41,225
Global Commitment fund 1,500,000
Total 143,014,664
Sec. B.700 Natural resources - agency of natural resources - administration
Personal services 6,881,451
Operating expenses 1,291,376
Grants 5,000
Total 8,177,827
Source of funds
General fund 5,628,757
Special funds 687,843
Interdepartmental transfers 1,861,227
Total 8,177,827
Sec. B.701 Natural resources - state land local property tax assessment
Operating expenses 2,711,643
Total 2,711,643
Source of funds
General fund 2,290,143
Interdepartmental transfers 421,500
Total 2,711,643
Sec. B.702 Fish and wildlife - support and field services
Personal services 25,124,512
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 72 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 7,287,815
Grants 824,803
Total 33,237,130
Source of funds
General fund 10,313,811
Special funds 379,405
Fish and wildlife fund 10,864,047
Federal funds 10,133,967
Interdepartmental transfers 1,545,900
Total 33,237,130
Sec. B.703 Forests, parks and recreation - administration
Personal services 1,644,130
Operating expenses 1,807,698
Total 3,451,828
Source of funds
General fund 3,207,811
Special funds 138,261
Federal funds 105,756
Total 3,451,828
Sec. B.704 Forests, parks and recreation - forestry
Personal services 10,669,963
Operating expenses 1,397,258
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 73 of 248
2026
Grants 2,517,648
Total 14,584,869
Source of funds
General fund 7,196,482
Special funds 1,553,980
Federal funds 5,657,787
Interdepartmental transfers 176,620
Total 14,584,869
Sec. B.705 Forests, parks and recreation - state parks
Personal services 14,447,858
Operating expenses 4,775,590
Grants 598,307
Total 19,821,755
Source of funds
General fund 1,774,736
Special funds 18,047,019
Total 19,821,755
Sec. B.706 Forests, parks and recreation - lands administration and recreation
Personal services 8,459,029
Operating expenses 4,627,930
Grants 2,469,865
Total 15,556,824
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 74 of 248
2026
Source of funds
General fund 1,403,261
Special funds 2,430,801
Federal funds 11,180,116
Interdepartmental transfers 542,646
Total 15,556,824
Sec. B.708 Forests, parks and recreation - forest and parks access roads
Personal services 130,000
Operating expenses 99,925
Total 229,925
Source of funds
General fund 229,925
Total 229,925
Sec. B.709 Environmental conservation - management and support services
Personal services 10,017,955
Operating expenses 5,850,830
Grants 191,597
Total 16,060,382
Source of funds
General fund 2,207,896
Special funds 1,593,728
Federal funds 2,948,598
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 75 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 9,310,160
Total 16,060,382
Sec. B.710 Environmental conservation - air and waste management
Personal services 15,391,418
Operating expenses 5,574,446
Grants 7,623,000
Total 28,588,864
Source of funds
General fund 1,476,577
Special funds 20,742,337
Federal funds 6,202,095
Interdepartmental transfers 167,855
Total 28,588,864
Sec. B.711 Environmental conservation - office of water programs
Personal services 43,817,953
Operating expenses 9,017,743
Grants 104,714,537
Total 157,550,233
Source of funds
General fund 13,321,778
Special funds 34,702,513
Federal funds 108,412,378
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 76 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 1,113,564
Total 157,550,233
Sec. B.713 Land use review board
Personal services 5,298,333
Operating expenses 598,682
Total 5,897,015
Source of funds
General fund 4,364,343
Special funds 1,532,672
Total 5,897,015
Sec. B.714 Total natural resources
Source of funds
General fund 53,415,520
Special funds 81,808,559
Fish and wildlife fund 10,864,047
Federal funds 144,640,697
Interdepartmental transfers 15,139,472
Total 305,868,295
Sec. B.800 Commerce and community development - agency of commerce
and community development - administration
Personal services 2,617,789
Operating expenses 921,911
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 77 of 248
2026
Grants 424,320
Total 3,964,020
Source of funds
General fund 3,964,020
Total 3,964,020
Sec. B.801 Economic development
Personal services 3,221,256
Operating expenses 1,306,125
Grants 6,506,544
Total 11,033,925
Source of funds
General fund 6,105,922
Special funds 3,314,565
Federal funds 1,613,438
Total 11,033,925
Sec. B.802 Housing and community development
Personal services 6,568,853
Operating expenses 2,253,786
Grants 45,303,523
Total 54,126,162
Source of funds
General fund 12,002,421
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 78 of 248
2026
Transportation fund 1,000,000
Special funds 10,679,645
Federal funds 30,444,096
Total 54,126,162
Sec. B.806 Tourism and marketing
Personal services 2,284,798
Operating expenses 1,785,851
Grants 1,020,000
Total 5,090,649
Source of funds
General fund 5,090,649
Total 5,090,649
Sec. B.808 Vermont council on the arts
Grants 1,071,800
Total 1,071,800
Source of funds
General fund 1,071,800
Total 1,071,800
Sec. B.809 Vermont symphony orchestra
Grants 158,795
Total 158,795
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 79 of 248
2026
General fund 158,795
Total 158,795
Sec. B.810 Vermont historical society
Grants 1,245,583
Total 1,245,583
Source of funds
General fund 1,245,583
Total 1,245,583
Sec. B.811 Vermont housing and conservation board
Grants 100,358,842
Total 100,358,842
Source of funds
General fund 1,680,529
Special funds 39,341,857
Federal funds 59,336,456
Total 100,358,842
Sec. B.812 Vermont humanities council
Grants 327,818
Total 327,818
Source of funds
General fund 327,818
Total 327,818
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 80 of 248
2026
Sec. B.813 Total commerce and community development
Source of funds
General fund 31,647,537
Transportation fund 1,000,000
Special funds 53,336,067
Federal funds 91,393,990
Total 177,377,594
Sec. B.900 Transportation - finance and administration
Personal services 19,147,814
Operating expenses 6,291,478
Grants 50,000
Total 25,489,292
Source of funds
Transportation fund 24,169,252
Federal funds 1,320,040
Total 25,489,292
Sec. B.901 Transportation - aviation
Personal services 5,289,467
Operating expenses 7,691,413
Total 12,980,880
Source of funds
Transportation fund 6,710,146
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 81 of 248
2026
Federal funds 6,270,734
Total 12,980,880
Sec. B.902 Transportation - buildings
Operating expenses 1,700,000
Total 1,700,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 1,700,000
Total 1,700,000
Sec. B.903 Transportation - program development
Personal services 109,305,403
Operating expenses 304,422,913
Grants 51,321,428
Total 465,049,744
Source of funds
Transportation fund 66,875,701
TIB fund 14,575,436
Special funds 280,000
Federal funds 363,035,876
Interdepartmental transfers 10,331,303
Local match 9,951,428
Total 465,049,744
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 82 of 248
2026
Sec. B.904 Transportation - rest areas construction
Personal services 180,000
Operating expenses 270,000
Total 450,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 45,000
Federal funds 405,000
Total 450,000
Sec. B.905 Transportation - maintenance state system
Personal services 52,774,612
Operating expenses 59,752,063
Total 112,526,675
Source of funds
Transportation fund 109,994,661
Federal funds 2,432,014
Interdepartmental transfers 100,000
Total 112,526,675
Sec. B.906 Transportation - policy and planning
Personal services 3,368,645
Operating expenses 299,526
Grants 10,254,679
Total 13,922,850
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 83 of 248
2026
Source of funds
Transportation fund 2,378,766
Federal funds 11,444,134
Interdepartmental transfers 99,950
Total 13,922,850
Sec. B.906.1 Transportation - environmental policy and sustainability
Personal services 14,855,456
Operating expenses 89,082
Total 14,944,538
Source of funds
Transportation fund 371,589
Federal funds 11,025,693
Interdepartmental transfers 1,141,695
Local match 2,405,561
Total 14,944,538
Sec. B.907 Transportation - rail
Personal services 8,671,804
Operating expenses 51,567,606
Grants 50,000
Total 60,289,410
Source of funds
Transportation fund 12,548,774
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 84 of 248
2026
TIB fund 1,000,000
Federal funds 34,688,907
Interdepartmental transfers 6,854,052
Local match 5,197,677
Total 60,289,410
Sec. B.907.1 Transportation - Rail Trails Program
Personal services 3,577,763
Operating expenses 57,266
Total 3,635,029
Source of funds
Transportation fund 478,272
Federal funds 1,769,326
Interdepartmental transfers 1,387,431
Total 3,635,029
Sec. B.908 Transportation - public transit
Personal services 136,840
Operating expenses 71,582
Grants 57,646,725
Total 57,855,147
Source of funds
Transportation fund 9,947,447
Federal funds 46,607,700
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 85 of 248
2026
Interdepartmental transfers 1,300,000
Total 57,855,147
Sec. B.909 Transportation - central garage
Personal services 6,345,376
Operating expenses 19,725,126
Total 26,070,502
Source of funds
Internal service funds 26,070,502
Total 26,070,502
Sec. B.910 Department of motor vehicles
Personal services 39,906,668
Operating expenses 11,738,708
Total 51,645,376
Source of funds
Transportation fund 46,545,599
Federal funds 4,978,081
Interdepartmental transfers 121,696
Total 51,645,376
Sec. B.911 Transportation - town highway structures
Grants 7,394,400
Total 7,394,400
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 86 of 248
2026
Transportation fund 7,394,400
Total 7,394,400
Sec. B.912 Transportation - town highway local technical assistance program
Personal services 439,752
Operating expenses 28,700
Grants 13,000
Total 481,452
Source of funds
Transportation fund 121,452
Federal funds 360,000
Total 481,452
Sec. B.913 Transportation - town highway class 2 roadway
Grants 8,832,200
Total 8,832,200
Source of funds
Transportation fund 8,832,200
Total 8,832,200
Sec. B.914 Transportation - town highway bridges
Personal services 9,168,000
Operating expenses 19,830,382
Grants 1,280,000
Total 30,278,382
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 87 of 248
2026
Source of funds
TIB fund 2,774,564
Federal funds 25,604,186
Interdepartmental transfers 255,672
Local match 1,643,960
Total 30,278,382
Sec. B.915 Transportation - town highway aid program
Grants 31,240,042
Total 31,240,042
Source of funds
Transportation fund 31,240,042
Total 31,240,042
Sec. B.916 Transportation - town highway class 1 supplemental grants
Grants 128,750
Total 128,750
Source of funds
Transportation fund 128,750
Total 128,750
Sec. B.917 Transportation - town highway: state aid for nonfederal disasters
Grants 1,150,000
Total 1,150,000
Source of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 88 of 248
2026
Transportation fund 1,150,000
Total 1,150,000
Sec. B.918 Transportation - town highway: state aid for federal disasters
Personal services 500,000
Operating expenses 50,000
Grants 3,450,000
Total 4,000,000
Source of funds
Federal funds 4,000,000
Total 4,000,000
Sec. B.919 Transportation - municipal mitigation assistance program
Personal services 137,500
Operating expenses 310,500
Grants 5,695,000
Total 6,143,000
Source of funds
Transportation fund 715,000
Special funds 4,000,000
Federal funds 1,428,000
Total 6,143,000
Sec. B.921 Transportation board
Personal services 176,096
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 89 of 248
2026
Operating expenses 19,208
Total 195,304
Source of funds
Transportation fund 195,304
Total 195,304
Sec. B.922 Total transportation
Source of funds
Transportation fund 331,542,355
TIB fund 18,350,000
Special funds 4,280,000
Federal funds 515,369,691
Internal service funds 26,070,502
Interdepartmental transfers 21,591,799
Local match 19,198,626
Total 936,402,973
Sec. B.1000 Debt service
Operating expenses 675,000
Total 675,000
Source of funds
General fund 675,000
Total 675,000
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 90 of 248
2026
Sec. B.1001 Total debt service
Source of funds
General fund 675,000
Total 675,000
* * * Fiscal Year 2027 One-Time Appropriations * * *
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) Agency of Administration Secretary’s office. In fiscal year 2027, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $110,000 General Fund for the Office of Racial Equity to continue
for an additional year the Inclusion, Diversity, Equity, Action, Leadership
Vermont program.
(2) $900,000 General Fund to complete the work of the Truth and
Reconciliation Commission.
(b) Department of Vermont Health Access. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $300,000 General Fund and $2,700,000 federal funds for
information technology updates resulting from the 2025 federal H.R.1
Medicaid changes.
(2) $1,210,000 General Fund for Provider Stabilization Grants.
(3) $3,708,562 Global Commitment for enhanced rates to primary care
providers pursuant to Sec. E.306.3 of this act.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 91 of 248
2026
(c) Department for Children and Families. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $21,183,809 General Fund for the provision of services,
implementation of the Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum, shelter
development and operation, emergency housing in hotels and motels, grants to
municipalities, emergency cold weather shelters, and supportive services,
including case management, staffing, grants, and contracts to be allocated as
follows:
(A) $14,118,880 for emergency housing in hotels and motels;
(B) $2,064,929 for staffing, grants, and contracts;
(C) $3,000,000 for shelter development;
(D) $500,000 for grants to municipalities pursuant to 33 V.S.A.
§ 2209(a); and
(E) $1,500,000 for emergency cold-weather shelters.
(2) $164,500 General Fund and $29,873 Global Commitment for a grant
to Prevent Child Abuse Vermont for nurturing parenting programs.
(3) $180,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Parent Child
Center Network for concrete supports programs.
(4) $200,000 General Fund for a grant to End Homelessness Vermont to
continue providing statewide housing navigation, case management, service
coordination, technical assistance, appeals, and permanent housing support for
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 92 of 248
2026
individuals living with complex needs and disabilities who are experiencing
homelessness or housing insecurity.
(5) $130,000 General Fund for distribution to supervised visitation
programs pursuant to Sec. E.317 of this act.
(6) $4,000,000 General Fund for a temporary secure treatment facility
for youth.
(7) $550,000 General Fund for direct aid to the Vermont Foodbank’s
network partners through an equitable statewide distribution of food or
subgrants, or both.
(8) $293,866 Global Commitment for post permanency adoption
services.
(d) Agency of Human Services Secretary’s office. In fiscal year 2027,
funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for a grant to Vermont Legal Aid for an
immigration attorney.
(2) $500,000 General Fund and $692,464 federal funds for the Global
Commitment appropriation in subdivision (k)(2) of this section to support
Meals on Wheels programs.
(3) $12,526 General Fund and $17,347 federal funds for the Global
Commitment appropriation in subdivision (c)(2) of this section for a grant to
Prevent Child Abuse Vermont for nurturing parenting programs.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 93 of 248
2026
(4) $1,555,000 General Fund and $2,153,562 federal funds for the
Global Commitment appropriation in subdivision (b)(3) of this section for
enhanced rates to primary care providers pursuant to Sec. E.306.3 of this act.
(5) $123,218 General Fund and $170,648 federal funds for the Global
Commitment appropriation in subdivision (c)(8) of this section for post
permanency adoption services.
(6) $56,000 General Fund, $44,000 federal funds, and $100,000 Global
Commitment for a grant to Vermont Legal Aid for the Vermont Legal Aid
Helpline.
(e) Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation. In fiscal year 2027, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for Vermont Outdoor Recreation Economic
Collaborative grants.
(2) $300,000 General Fund for the Serve Learn Earn Program.
(f) Department of Housing and Community Development. In fiscal year
2027, funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $800,000 General Fund for the Manufactured Home Improvement
and Repair Program.
(2) $1,000,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont State Housing
Authority for the Rent Arrears Assistance Fund established by 2023 Acts and
Resolves No. 47, Sec. 45.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 94 of 248
2026
(3) $100,000 General Fund for the Vermont Housing Finance Agency
First Generation Homebuyer Program.
(4) $25,000 General Fund for a grant to the South Hero Service
Committee to design and construct a building.
(5) $50,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont 250th Anniversary
Commission for the 250th celebration.
(6) $250,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Council on Rural
Development for municipal technical assistance.
(g) Department of Economic Development. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $150,000 General Fund for maintaining the current contract with the
Canadian International Economic Development Partnership to provide in-
market services to Montreal-based businesses seeking to expand into Vermont.
(2) $75,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Professionals of
Color Network.
(3) $2,000,000 General Fund for the Rural Industry Development
Program.
(4) $100,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Law and
Graduate School for its public education offerings and free legal support to
small businesses through its Vermont Small Business Law Center.
(5) $150,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Small Business
Development Center to support the continuation of its work in helping
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 95 of 248
2026
Vermonters start, acquire, and grow businesses and to increase business
advising and educational workshops to meet increasing demands of
entrepreneurs and small business owners post pandemic.
(h) Agency of Transportation. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $1,360,069 Transportation Fund for the FEMA 428 project
relocating the Central Garage to Paine Turnpike in Berlin.
(2) $1,347,107 PILOT Special Fund, notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 3709(a), for grants to municipalities that would have otherwise been eligible
for federal aid if a presidential disaster declaration had been approved for
damage incurred in Caledonia County during July 2025. Grants shall be
provided on a reimbursement basis for actual costs incurred under the
following conditions:
(A) Awards shall be for repairs made to infrastructure included in
damage estimates conducted by the Agency of Transportation in March 2026
for the July 2025 disaster.
(B) Awards shall be for up to 50 percent of the repair costs estimated
by the Agency of Transportation in March 2026.
(C) The repair conducted is compliant with all applicable Vermont
statutes and regulations.
(D) The recipient agrees to maintain documentation as required by
the Agency of Transportation.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 96 of 248
2026
(E) The recipient accepts other award terms and conditions as
determined by the Agency of Transportation and required by Agency of
Administration Bulletin 5 to ensure the funds are spent appropriately and
effectively.
(3) $300,000 General Fund for supplemental nonemergency medical
transportation funding.
(4) $3,000,000 PILOT Special Fund, notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 3709(a), to provide additional grants through the general State aid to town
highways program pursuant to 19 V.S.A. § 306(a). The amount appropriated
pursuant to this subdivision shall be supplemental to and shall not supplant or
decrease any amounts appropriated pursuant to the provisions of 19 V.S.A.
§ 306(a) in fiscal year 2027.
(i) Department of Health. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $140,000 General Fund for the Vermont State Youth Council.
(2) $150,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Language Justice
Project to prepare informational materials for Vermonters who speak
languages other than English in the event of a disease outbreak, natural
disaster, or other public health emergency.
(j) Department of Mental Health. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 97 of 248
2026
(1) $160,000 General Fund for a grant to the Howard Center for the
Community Outreach Program.
(k) Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living. In fiscal
year 2027, funds are appropriated for the following:
(1) $235,000 General Fund for a grant to HomeShare Vermont.
(2) $1,192,464 Global Commitment to support Meals on Wheels
programs.
(3) $100,000 General Fund for a grant to support the start-up costs of a
new adult day program in Washington or Rutland county or to support the cost
of an existing adult day program to expand its capacity to serve more
individuals.
(l) Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets. In fiscal year 2027, funds
are appropriated for the following:
(1) $350,000 General Fund for a grant to the Northeast Organic Farming
Association of Vermont for the Crop Cash, Crop Cash Plus, and Farm Share
programs.
(2) $300,000 General Fund for grants to Vermont’s 14 Natural Resource
Conservation Districts.
(3) $250,000 General Fund for a grant to the Vermont Foodbank for the
Vermonters Feeding Vermonters Program.
(m) Office of the Secretary of State. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 98 of 248
2026
(1) $90,000 General Fund for the Vermont Access Network Community
Radio Program.
(2) $450,000 General Fund to support the costs of elections in calendar
year 2026.
(3) $50,000 General Fund for awards to support local civic journalism.
(n) Department of Labor. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $200,000 General Fund for a grant to Advance Vermont.
(o) Agency of Education. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) $157,000 General Fund to provide healthy meals and snacks to
children and adults receiving supervised care services.
(2) $150,000 General Fund for automated external defibrillators and
cardiopulmonary resuscitation training in schools.
(3) $700,000 General Fund for the Read Vermont Program.
(p) [Deleted.]
(q) Vermont Student Assistance Corporation. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 2885, $2,320,000 Higher Education
Endowment Trust Fund, which shall be considered a reduction to the principal
for the purposes of the calculations in 16 V.S.A. § 2885(c) and (d), for
Freedom and Unity grants.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 99 of 248
2026
(r) Office of the State Treasurer. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $150,000 General Fund for the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance
Program.
(2) $75,000 General Fund for costs associated with the Pension and
Benefits Funding Task Force.
(s) General Assembly. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for the
following:
(1) $15,000 General Fund to support the work of the County and
Regional Governance Study Committee.
(t) Vermont State Colleges. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for
the following:
(1) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 2885, $600,000 Higher Education
Endowment Trust Fund, which shall be considered a reduction to the principal
for the purposes of the calculations in 16 V.S.A. § 2885(c) and (d), for the
development of the new 30-unit, three-story housing complex on the Johnson
Campus.
(u) [Deleted.]
(v) [Deleted.]
(w) [Deleted.]
(x) University of Vermont. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated for
the following:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 100 of 248
2026
(1)(A) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 2885, $2,000,000 Higher Education
Endowment Trust Fund, which shall be considered a reduction to the principal
for the purposes of the calculations in 16 V.S.A. § 2885(c) and (d), and
$10,000,000 General Fund for the Multi-Purpose Center Project approved by
the Board of Trustees in 2019.
(B) Any contract awarded for construction that is paid for with this
spending authority shall adhere to the higher of:
(i) the prevailing wage requirements established in 29 V.S.A.
§ 161(b); or
(ii) the prevailing local wage requirements as determined by the
U.S. Department of Labor under the Davis-Bacon Act or related federal acts or
regulations.
(C) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this appropriation be
a contribution to the remaining fundraising effort, estimated to be a total of
$101,000,000, for the project. If the University of Vermont has not received
new donations for the project totaling $89,000,000 or more between July 1,
2026, and July 1, 2029, it is the intent of the General Assembly that future
appropriations beginning in fiscal year 2030 be reduced over a reasonable
number of fiscal years to recoup an amount equal to this appropriation and any
interest accrued without causing undue financial harm to the institution.
(D)(i) In fiscal years 2027, 2028, and 2029, as part of its budget
presentation and as requested, to the extent that the fundraising effort for the
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 101 of 248
2026
project is ongoing, the University of Vermont shall report to the House and
Senate Committees on Appropriations on the status of the fundraising effort.
(ii) In fiscal years 2027, 2028, and 2029, to the extent that the fundraising
effort for the project is ongoing, the University of Vermont shall report to the
Joint Fiscal Committee at its July meeting and as requested on the status of the
fundraising effort.
(y) Department of Corrections. In fiscal year 2027, funds are appropriated
for the following:
(1) $50,000 General Fund for a grant to Jenna’s Promise to support
reentry services.
(z) Center for Crime Victim Services. In fiscal year 2027, funds are
appropriated for the following:
(1) $350,000 Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund for grants to
the member organizations of the Vermont Network Against Domestic and
Sexual Violence.
Sec. B.1101 FISCAL YEAR 2026 CLOSEOUT; FISCAL YEAR 2027
CONTINGENT TRANSACTIONS
(a) As part of the fiscal year 2026 closeout, the Department of Finance and
Management shall execute the requirements of 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27,
Sec. D.103(a)(1)(D), as amended by 2026 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 55
and further amended by Sec. C.102 of this act; 32 V.S.A. § 308; and 32 V.S.A.
§ 308f. The Department of Finance and Management shall then,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 102 of 248
2026
notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308c, calculate the maximum number of
contingent transactions that can be funded, in the order provided in subsection
(b) of this section, and reserve that money for such purpose in fiscal year 2027.
Any residual balance shall be reserved in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 308c.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, any contingent reserve established per subsection
(a) of this section shall be unreserved and the following transactions shall be
executed in the following order. In the event that the contingent reserve is
insufficient to fully fund the following transactions, the Department of Finance
and Management shall execute the transactions to the greatest extent possible,
including partial funding:
(1) $9,547,596.39 is transferred to the Technology Modernization
Special Fund (#21951).
(2) $30,000,000 is reserved for future appropriation or transfer by the
General Assembly for addressing federal funding shortfalls, Vermont Medicaid
and other human services needs, property tax relief, permanent housing
initiatives, or any other uses determined to be in the best interests of the public.
Sec. B.1103 CASH FUND FOR CAPITAL AND ESSENTIAL
INVESTMENTS; FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONE-TIME CAPITAL
APPROPRIATIONS
(a) In fiscal year 2027, $23,418,454.70 is appropriated from the Capital
Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and Essential
Investments for the following:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 103 of 248
2026
(1) Department of Buildings and General Services:
(A) $1,781,173.60 for statewide major maintenance;
(B) $225,000 for statewide physical security enhancements;
(C) $3,600,000 for Asa Bloomer roof replacement;
(D) $900,000 for Rutland multimodal garage renovation;
(E) $3,000,000 for Burlington, 32 Cherry St. parking garage repairs;
(F) $1,050,000 for the Agency of Human Services for HVAC
upgrades at correctional facilities;
(G) $225,000 for the Agency of Human Services for statewide
correctional facilities security upgrades;
(H) $2,700,000 for the Agency of Human Services for St. Johnsbury,
Northeast Correctional Complex (NECC) door control system replacements;
(I) $1,000,000 for the Agency of Human Services for the Northern
State Correctional Facility boiler replacement;
(J) $500,000 for the Agency of Human Services for Newport,
Northern State Correctional Facility sprinkler system upgrades;
(K) $500,000 for the Agency of Human Services for maintenance,
replacement, and renovations at the Chittenden Regional Correctional Facility
or other correctional facilities utilized in response to overcrowding for the
incarcerated women’s population;
(L) $772,557.10 for the Agency of Human Services for the
Department for Children and Families’ youth short-term stabilization facility;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 104 of 248
2026
(M) $500,000 for the Department of Public Safety for an Urban
Search and Rescue (USAR) facility; and
(N) $1,600,000 for the Judiciary for renovations at the White River
Junction courthouse.
(2) Department of Environmental Conservation:
(A) $2,498,000 for the State match for federal Drinking Water State
Revolving Fund; and
(B) $150,000 for Waterbury Dam Penstock project cost overruns.
(3) Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation:
(A) $400,000 for park infrastructure and rehabilitation, improvement,
and three-acre rule compliance.
(4) Department of Fish and Wildlife:
(A) $200,000 for dam maintenance and safety planning.
(5) Judiciary:
(A) $500,000 for the Essex County Courthouse connector project.
(6) Vermont Historical Society:
(A) $566,724 for the replacement of a climate control unit.
(7) Department of Corrections:
(A) $750,000 to work with the Agency of Digital Services to develop
a plan for providing network connectivity in State correctional facilities that
modernizes processes and reduces reliance on paper; improves staff efficiency
and addresses workforce challenges, such as staff retention; supports real-time
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 105 of 248
2026
data-driven operations; lays the foundation for future capabilities, such as
wearable technology and mobile device–supported operations; and ensures
secure, compliance connectivity in key facilities, each as outlined in the
Business Transformation Project Recommendations Report issued by the
Agency.
Sec. B.1104 MEDICAID AND SNAP BENEFIT ASSISTANCE GRANTS
(a) Notwithstanding 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.1101(b)(3), in
fiscal year 2027, $3,500,000 of the amount reserved in the General Fund
pursuant to 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.1101(b)(3) shall be
unreserved and an equal amount shall be appropriated to the Agency of Human
Services for a grant program for benefit assistance services provided by
community-based organizations throughout the State, including by the parent
child centers, community action agencies, recovery centers, Vermont 211, area
agencies on aging, and designated and specialized service agencies. In
developing this grant program, the Agency shall collaborate with Hunger Free
Vermont and the Office of the Health Care Advocate on program design and
the selection of the community-based organizations receiving grants. The
Agency shall provide an update on program design and grant recipient
selection at the Joint Fiscal Committee’s July 2026 meeting. The Agency shall
distribute grants on or before September 1, 2026.
(b)(1) Funds appropriated in this section shall be used to issue new or
augment existing or planned grants to organizations to assist clients with
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 106 of 248
2026
navigating Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) or Medicaid
eligibility, application processes, and benefit maintenance, respectively,
through the use of benefit assisters. The Agency shall ensure that benefit
assisters at the grant recipient organizations are providing accurate
information. Vermont 211 shall conduct outreach to all organizations
receiving a grant pursuant to this section to ensure that appropriate referrals are
made and information about benefit assistance services is available to the
public.
(2) The Agency shall work with organizations receiving a grant pursuant
to this section to develop communications and outreach strategies to
proactively connect with households. Such strategies shall include plain
language mailings, phone and text message scripts, email scripts, and press
release communications. The Agency shall work with organizations receiving
a grant pursuant to this section to reduce the administrative burden on
applicants and participants by sharing information when permissible to verify
SNAP and Medicaid requirements.
(3) Beginning in September 2026 through June 2027, the organizations
receiving a grant pursuant to this section shall submit quarterly reports to the
House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services, the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare, and the Agency regarding:
(A) the number of organization employees trained as benefit assisters
to assist with navigating SNAP or Medicaid requirements, respectively;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 107 of 248
2026
(B) the total number of eligible individuals who received assistance
from benefit assisters each quarter, including those receiving repeat application
assistance, repeat benefit maintenance assistance, and enrollment assistance;
(C) the number of individuals referred to other service providers or
enrolled in other State or federal benefit programs as a result of an interaction
with a benefit assister; and
(D) qualitative information regarding how outreach is conducted to
inform individuals that benefit assistance services are available.
(4) Beginning in September 2026 through June 2027, Vermont 211 shall
submit quarterly reports to the House Committees on Health Care and on
Human Services and to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare regarding
its outreach efforts and the number of referrals made to the organizations
receiving a grant pursuant to this section.
(c) Any spending authority designated for the purpose provided in this
section that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall be carried
forward for the same purpose for which it was originally designated.
* * * Fiscal Year 2026 Adjustments, Appropriations, and Amendments * * *
Sec. C.100 2026 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 83(e) is amended to read:
(e) If funds previously appropriated to the Agency of Human Services are
insufficient to provide the State match needed to make the payment adjustment
in subsection (a) of this section, notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 308b, the
Commissioner of Finance and Management shall unreserve an amount of funds
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 108 of 248
2026
equal to the deficiency from the Human Services Caseload Reserve and,
notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 706, transfer an amount of funds equal to the
deficiency shall be appropriated to the Agency of Human Services.
Sec. C.101 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. E.325(b), as amended by
2026 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 81, is further amended to read:
(b) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.325 of this act, $1,322,141
General Fund shall be used by the Department for Children and Families’
Office of Economic Opportunity for distribution to community partners
providing services to prevent and address homelessness for the purpose of
restoring these community partners to their fiscal year 2025 appropriation
level. The $1,322,141 shall be allocated as follows:
* * *
Sec. C.102 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. D.103, as amended by 2026
Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 55, is further amended to read:
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2026, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
provided:
(1) General Fund.
* * *
(D) The first $74,908,097 $78,037,622 of any fiscal year-end balance
otherwise subject to the requirements of 32 V.S.A. § 308c(a) shall, instead, be
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 109 of 248
2026
reserved for addressing federal funding shortfalls, property tax relief, or any
other uses determined to be in the best interests of the public in the subsequent
fiscal year. Any proceeds reserved in accordance with the requirements of this
subdivision (D) shall automatically be unreserved for use on July 1 of the
subsequent fiscal year.
* * *
Sec. C.103 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 32 is amended to read:
Sec. 32. AGENCY OF EDUCATION; TRANSFORMATION
APPROPRIATION; TRANSITION GRANTS
(a) The sum of $2,865,000.00 $3,647,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Agency of Education in fiscal year 2026 to support
education transformation work as follows:
(1) $200,000.00 $982,000.00 for the purpose of awarding transition
grants to support school boards transitioning the work required to transition to
new governance and administrative models as contemplated in this act
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, and in light of the continued analysis
of the work necessary in the field to transition to new, operational school
districts;
(2) $562,500.00 for positions established in Sec. 33 of this act; and
(3) $2,102,500.00 for contracted services, subject to the restrictions
contained in subsection (c) of this section, to support facilitate school districts
boards to study the advisability of forming union school districts, as well as to
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 110 of 248
2026
support districts with administrative activities relating to consolidation,
including accounting, budget and operational practice, and to support
education quality activities including the alignment of curricula, instructional
materials, and teaching activities.
(b) The Agency shall use the funds appropriated in subdivision (a)(1) of
this section to award transition facilitation grants to support the work required
to transition to new governance and administrative models.
(c) The appropriation contained in subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall be
subject to the following restrictions:
(1) While this appropriation may be used to contract for data analysis
necessary to support school districts with the administrative activities related to
consolidation, it shall also be used for developing data analysis tools to support
merger committees in consultation with the Department of Taxes.
(2) This appropriation shall be used to provide direct support to school
boards for the business processes that are required to be completed before new
school districts become operational. Support and training for school business
officials and other school district personnel shall be funded solely through the
appropriation contained in subdivision (a)(1) of this section and the
corresponding grants created in subsection (b) of this section.
(3) This appropriation may be used to support the special education
strategic plan required pursuant to Sec. 30 of this act. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that the strategic plan addresses the supports and processes
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 111 of 248
2026
needed to be in place for the transition to the weighted funding model for
special education as such funding model is contemplated in this act and as may
be further amended by an act of the General Assembly after consideration of
the report required pursuant to Sec. 45a of this act. Any work or analysis done
by the Agency regarding alternatives to the base amount or weights contained
in this act shall not be funded from this appropriation.
Sec. C.104 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. E.127.2 is amended to read:
Sec. E.127.2 FEDERAL FUNDING; CALCULATION OF
APPROPRIATION REDUCTION; SECRETARY OF
ADMINISTRATION; JOINT FISCAL COMMITTEE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Unduplicated function total” means the individual function totals
set forth in this act excluding Global Commitment funds, Interdepartmental
Transfer funds, and Internal Service funds. For purposes of this section, the
determination of an unduplicated function total shall not include Education
Funds.
(2) “Governmental function unit” refers to the governmental function
areas set forth in Sec. A.108 of this act.
(b) In fiscal years 2026, 2027, 2028, and 2029, in each instance that a
reduction in federal revenues to the State results in a decrease of the
unduplicated function total for any governmental function unit by:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 112 of 248
2026
(1) Less than 0.5 percent of the unduplicated function total or
$2,000,000, whichever threshold amount is greater, the Secretary of
Administration shall notify the Joint Fiscal Committee and may prepare and
implement a spending authority reduction plan without the approval of the
Joint Fiscal Committee, provided that any total reductions in appropriations
and transfers of funds are not greater than the reduction in the federal revenues.
If the Secretary’s plan consists of reductions greater than five percent to the
total amount appropriated in any section or subsection of any appropriations
act, such plan shall only be implemented in the manner provided for in
32 V.S.A. § 704(b)(2).
(2) Greater than $2,000,000 and 0.5 percent of the unduplicated function
total for any governmental function unit, but less than 25 percent or
$50,000,000, whichever threshold amount is lower:
(A) the Secretary of Administration shall prepare a spending
authority reduction and transfer plan for consideration and approval by the
Joint Fiscal Committee pursuant to the same process established in 32 V.S.A.
§ 704(e), notwithstanding the reference to subdivision (b)(1) of this section,
provided that the total reductions to federal spending authority are not greater
than the reductions in federal revenues; and
(B) to maintain a balanced State budget, to minimize the impact to
Vermonters and to abide by the legislative intent set forth by the General
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 113 of 248
2026
Assembly in this act or future fiscal year appropriations acts, or both, the Joint
Fiscal Committee may make a recommendation to the Emergency Board to:
(i) utilize the appropriation in Sec. B.1101(b)(2) of this act to
support impacted programs at not more than the current fiscal year funding
level until the General Assembly is in session;
(ii) revert any unexpended and unobligated funds; and
(iii) make such reductions or transfers in appropriations necessary
to support the priorities of the General Assembly.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for the
purpose of calculating any appropriation reduction that triggers the actions set
forth in this section, the baseline federal funding amounts shall be the federal
funding set forth in this act the general appropriations act for the fiscal year in
which the reduction occurs. The Secretary of Administration shall monitor any
changes in federal funding as the difference between the baseline federal
funding amount for use in fiscal year 2026 and any updated State federal funds
revenue forecast adopted by the Emergency Board and shall calculate the
percent reduction of the unduplicated function totals for each governmental
function unit.
Sec. C.105 3 V.S.A. § 118 is amended to read:
§ 118. COLLECTION AND DISPOSITION OF REVENUE
(a) There is hereby created a Secretary of State Services Fund. The Fund
shall be used to provide appropriations for the operations of the Office of the
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 114 of 248
2026
Secretary of State, with the exception of those operations provided for in
chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title. The Fund shall be administered as a
special fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. At the end of each
fiscal year, the unobligated balance in this Fund shall be transferred to the
General Fund.
(b) All revenues collected by the Secretary of State shall be deposited into
the Secretary of State Services Fund except for the following revenues:
(1) any revenues collected by the Office of Professional Regulation set
forth in chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title; and
(2) any revenues collected pursuant to subsection 117(k) of this title.
(c) The Secretary of State shall have the authority to collect and deposit
into the Secretary of State Services Fund revenues generated from optional
services offered in the normal course of business, including for one-time or
periodic sales of data by subscription or other contractual basis.
(d) The Secretary of State or designee shall report annually to the Joint
Fiscal Committee at its September meeting on the prior fiscal year Fund
balance at closeout. The report shall include projected revenues to and
expenditures from the Fund in future fiscal years.
Sec. C.106 2026 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 79 is amended to read:
Sec. 79. HOUSING ASSISTANCE
* * *
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 115 of 248
2026
(d) A housing authority shall notify the Department for Children and
Families of its intent to request funds and submit a report on its financial need,
including evidence that the request conforms to applicable HUD requirements
and is a necessary and proper expense, to the Department on or before April
15, 2026 within 10 business days after receiving official notice from HUD of
its federal fiscal year 2026 funding amount.
(e) On or before May 1, 2026 Not more than 20 business days after official
notice from HUD of federal fiscal year 2026 funding amounts for housing
authorities in Vermont, the Department for Children and Families, in
consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development,
shall:
(1) establish procedures for validating that such expenditures conform to
applicable HUD requirements and are a necessary and proper expense prior to
issuing funds; and
(2) establish guidelines to ensure that funds are distributed based upon
need.
* * *
Sec. C.107 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1102(c) is amended to
read:
(c) In fiscal year 2024, the amount of $50,000,000 General Fund is
appropriated to the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (VHCB):
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 116 of 248
2026
(1) $10,000,000 to provide support and enhance capacity for emergency
shelter and permanent homes for those experiencing homelessness or who need
supportive housing. The funds shall be used to expand Vermont’s shelter
capacity, provide homes for those experiencing homelessness, create housing
for individuals eligible to receive Medicaid-funded developmental disabilities
services, and decrease reliance on the General Assistance Emergency Housing
hotel and motel program. The Vermont Housing and Conservation Board shall
consult with the Agency of Human Services to ensure new investments in
homes and shelters are paired with appropriate support services for residents,
including services supported through Medicaid. Funded projects may utilize a
range of housing options, including the expansion of shelter capacity, the
conversion of hotels to housing, the creation of permanent supportive housing,
and the utilization of manufactured homes on infill sites.
* * *
Sec. C.108 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. C.110, as amended by 2025
Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. C.105, is further amended to read:
Sec. C.110 EMERGENCY RENTAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
REVERSION AND REALLOCATION
(a) The Secretary of Administration may reimburse up to $14,300,000 of
prior fiscal year federal funds expended through the Emergency Rental
Assistance Program, as approved by the Joint Fiscal Committee pursuant to
Grant Request #3034 with new General Fund or Other Infrastructure, Essential
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 117 of 248
2026
Investments, and Reserves Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital and
Essential Investments appropriations transferred from existing State programs
that meet the eligibility criteria established by the U.S. Treasury. These
programs shall receive an amount of spending authority from the Emergency
Rental Assistance Program 2 Fund equal to the amount of General Fund or
Other Infrastructure, Essential Investments, and Reserves Subaccount in the
Cash Fund for Capital and Essential Investments appropriation transferred.
(b) To the extent that qualifying General Fund or Other Infrastructure,
Essential Investments, and Reserves Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital
and Essential Investments expenditures already incurred are transferred onto
the spending authority established in subsection (a) of this section, the
Commissioner of Finance and Management shall, notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 706, transfer an equivalent amount of General Fund or Other Infrastructure,
Essential Investments, and Reserves Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital
and Essential Investments spending authority to support programs established
through Grant Request #3034 and subsequent Emergency Rental Assistance
Program grant approvals by the Joint Fiscal Committee.
Sec. C.109 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.1100, as amended by 2026
Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 51, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 MISCELLANEOUS FISCAL YEAR 2026 ONE-TIME
APPROPRIATIONS
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 118 of 248
2026
(a) Agency of Administration Secretary’s Office. In fiscal year 2026,
funds are appropriated for the following:
* * *
(4) $3,000,000 General Fund to ensure the appropriation made in Sec.
B.514 of this act is sufficient to meet 100 percent of the Vermont State
Teachers’ Retirement System Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution.
The appropriation made in Sec. B.513 of this act pursuant to 16 V.S.A. §
1944(c)(13) shall not be considered for the purposes of determining whether
the appropriation made in Sec. B.514 of this act is sufficient to ensure that the
Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution requirement is funded at 100
percent in fiscal year 2026. Any remaining funds may be used, if necessary, to
ensure that the Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution for the Vermont
State Employees’ Retirement System is 100 percent funded in fiscal year 2026.
The appropriation made in Sec. B.104.1 of this act pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
§ 473(c)(8) shall not be considered for the purposes of determining whether
fiscal year 2026 appropriations are sufficient to ensure that the Actuarially
Determined Employer Contribution requirement is funded at 100 percent in
fiscal year 2026. These funds shall carry forward each fiscal year until fully
expended or reverted by an act of the General Assembly.
Sec. C.110 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. SCHOOL DISTRICT REDISTRICTING TASK FORCE; REPORT
* * *
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 119 of 248
2026
(i) Appropriations.
* * *
(2) The sum of $100,000.00 $28,310.70 is appropriated to the Agency of
Digital Services from the General Fund in fiscal year 2026 to cover costs
associated with supporting the Task Force, or, if necessary, for the purposes of
hiring one or more consultants to provide support to the Task Force.
* * *
Sec. C.111 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.338, as amended by 2026
Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 41, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.338 Corrections - correctional services
Personal services 184,910,113 184,260,113
Operating expenses 26,227,109 26,227,109
Grants 801,823 801,823
Total 211,939,045 211,289,045
Source of funds
General fund 203,987,089 203,337,089
Special funds 990,963 990,963
Federal funds 516,600 516,600
Global Commitment fund 6,048,078 6,048,078
Interdepartmental transfers 396,315 396,315
Total 211,939,045 211,289,045
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 120 of 248
2026
Sec. C.112 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.347, as amended by 2026
Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 44, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.347 Total human services
Source of funds
General fund 1,461,126,849 1,460,476,849
Special funds 232,655,939 232,655,939
Tobacco fund 23,088,208 23,088,208
State health care resources fund 31,074,772 31,074,772
Federal funds 1,993,089,108 1,993,089,108
Global Commitment fund 2,213,122,801 2,213,122,801
Internal service funds 403,853 403,853
Interdepartmental transfers 32,694,090 32,694,090
Permanent trust funds 25,000 25,000
Total 5,987,280,620 5,986,630,620
Sec. C.113 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. B.1100, as amended by
2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.115 and 2024 Acts and Resolves No.
87, Sec. 49, is further amended to read:
Sec. B.1100 FISCAL YEAR 2023 ONE-TIME GENERAL FUND
APPROPRIATIONS
* * *
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 121 of 248
2026
(b) $11,000,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Safety for regional dispatch funding. The funds are subject to the
following conditions:
* * *
(3)(A) $2,490,000 shall be immediately available to the Department of
Public Safety for a grant to create and implement the Regional
Communications System Upgrade Project to enable the Capital Fire simulcast
dispatch cell as shown in the Vermont Public Safety Communications System
Design Concept and Recommendations report of January 2026.
(B) The grant shall only be issued to the Central Vermont Regional
Planning Commission and as the fiscal agent for the Capital Fire simulcast
dispatch cell if, in the determination of the Department of Public Safety and
the Public Safety Communications Task Force, the pilot project shall position
the State positively for implementing a statewide simulcast emergency
communications system and shall allow the State to prove that the desired
vision is not only possible but also practical and serves to gain stakeholder
buy-in when implementing change on a larger scale. The pilot project shall
enable the standards authority to make iterative improvements and adjust
option parameters based on lessons learned during the pilot project, increasing
the odds for long-term success.
(C) To obtain the grant funding described in this subdivision (3), the
Planning Commission shall first submit a pilot project proposal on or before
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 122 of 248
2026
October 2, 2026, that includes, to the satisfaction of the Department and Task
Force:
(i) full designs and engineering plans for an initial construction
date in 2027;
(ii) detailed descriptions of project phases, goals, and benchmarks,
and how these are met;
(iii) detailed descriptions of project budgeting, including
mechanisms for tracking of expenses, record maintenance, and auditing of
project finances, a cost quote from a qualified contractor as part of the budget,
and a showing of how the cost-sharing requirement described in subdivision
(D) of this subdivision (3) will be met; and
(iv) an explanation of how the pilot project aligns with and
furthers the development of a statewide public safety communications system
as reported by the Public Safety Communications Task Force, as established
by 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. C.114.
(D) To obtain the grant funding described in this subdivision (3), the
Planning Commission shall first agree that it will be responsible for 30 percent
of the project costs and provide proper documentation that it is able to finance
its share of project costs, in its entirety, prior to commencing any phase of the
project or expending any grant funds awarded by the Department.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 123 of 248
2026
(E) $50,000 shall be immediately available to the Department of
Public Safety to hire a technical consultant to evaluate the pilot project
proposal requirements described in subdivision (C) of this subdivision (3).
(F) If the Planning Commission satisfies the conditions of
subdivisions (B)–(E) of this subdivision (3), the Department shall issue the
grant to the Planning Commission on or before November 2, 2026.
(G) The Department shall report on or before January 31, 2027, and
again on or before January 31, 2028, to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and to the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Government Operations with
details pertaining to the progress of the project, including grant funds
dispensed, and detailed descriptions of project phases, goals, and benchmarks,
and how these have or have not been met.
(H) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Regional
Communications System Upgrade Project be a pilot project that shall enable
the State to determine an effective and efficient manner in which to implement
similar projects in other regions of the State, with the ultimate goal of building
a statewide public safety communications system.
(4) Any remaining amounts not obligated pursuant to subdivisions (1)
and, (2), and (3) of this subsection shall remain unobligated and unexpended
until approval to expend the funds is authorized by further enactment of the
General Assembly.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 124 of 248
2026
* * *
Sec. C.114 2017 Acts and Resolves No. 79, Sec. 13, as amended by 2020 Acts
and Resolves No. 120, Sec. A.8, 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 44, Sec. 2, and
2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. E.136.1, is further amended to read:
Sec. 13. STATE ETHICS COMMISSION FUNDING SOURCE
SURCHARGE; REPEAL
(a) Surcharge.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 2283(c) setting forth
the purpose and rate of charges collected in the Human Resource Services
Internal Service Fund, in fiscal year 2018 and thereafter, a surcharge of up to
2.3 percent, but no greater than the cost of the activities of the State Ethics
Commission set forth in Sec. 7 of this act, on the per-position portion of the
charges authorized in 3 V.S.A. § 2283(c)(2) shall be assessed to all Executive
Branch agencies, departments, and offices and shall be paid by all assessed
entities solely with State funds.
(2) The amount collected shall be accounted for within the Human
Resource Services Internal Service Fund and used solely for the purposes of
funding the activities of the State Ethics Commission set forth in Sec. 7 of this
act.
(b) Repeal. This section shall be repealed on July 1, 2025 July 1, 2027.
Sec. C.115 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. D.101(b), as amended by
2026 Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec. 53, is further amended to read:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 125 of 248
2026
(b) The following transfers shall be in accordance with the citations
provided. Transfer estimates are for purposes of developing the fiscal year
2026 budget and do not supersede the actual year-end transfer amounts.
(1) To the General Fund (#10000) from the:
* * *
(C) 27 V.S.A. § 1543. Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100):
$8,994,314 $16,144,149.
* * *
* * * Fiscal Year 2027 Fund Transfers and Reserve Allocations * * *
Sec. D.100 PROPERTY TRANSFER TAX ALLOCATIONS
(a) This act contains the following amounts allocated to special funds that
receive revenue from the property transfer tax. These allocations shall not
exceed available revenues.
(1) The sum of $608,137 is allocated from the Current Use
Administration Special Fund to the Department of Taxes for administration of
the Use Tax Reimbursement Program. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 9610(c),
amounts in excess of $608,137 from the property transfer tax deposited into the
Current Use Administration Special Fund shall be transferred to the General
Fund.
(2) Notwithstanding 10 V.S.A. § 312, amounts in excess of $37,653,750
from the property transfer tax and the surcharge established by 32 V.SA.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 126 of 248
2026
§ 9602a deposited into the Vermont Housing and Conservation Trust Fund
shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(A) The dedication of $2,500,000 in revenue from the property
transfer tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 9610(d) for the debt payments on the
affordable housing bond (10 V.S.A. § 314) shall be offset by the reduction of
$1,500,000 in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board and $1,000,000 from the surcharge established by 32 V.S.A. § 9602a.
The fiscal year 2027 appropriation of $37,653,750 to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board reflects the $1,500,000 reduction. The affordable housing
bond and related property transfer tax and surcharge provisions are repealed
after the life of the bond on July 1, 2039. Once the bond is retired, the
$1,500,000 reduction in the appropriation to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board shall be restored.
(3) Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a)(2), amounts in excess of
$10,179,975 from the property transfer tax deposited into the Municipal and
Regional Planning and Resilience Fund shall be transferred into the General
Fund. Notwithstanding 24 V.S.A. § 4306(a)(3), the $10,179,975 shall be
allocated as follows:
(A) $7,838,580 for disbursement to regional planning commissions in
a manner consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b);
(B) $1,323,397 for disbursement to municipalities in a manner
consistent with 24 V.S.A. § 4306(b); and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 127 of 248
2026
(C) $1,017,998 to the Agency of Digital Services for the Vermont
Center for Geographic Information.
Sec. D.101 FUND TRANSFERS
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following amounts
shall be transferred from the funds indicated:
(1) From the General Fund (#10000) to the:
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$73,797,962.
(B) Capital Infrastructure Subaccount in the Cash Fund for Capital
and Essential Investments (#21952): $17,016,160.
(C) Tax Computer System Modernization Fund (#21909):
$4,650,000.
(D) Education Fund (#20205): $100,908,097.
(E) Vermont State Police Radio Equipment and Firearm Replacement
Special Fund: $500,000.
(F) Domestic and Sexual Violence Special Fund (#21926):
$350,000.
(2) From the Transportation Fund (#20105) to the:
(A) General Obligation Bonds Debt Service Fund (#35100):
$294,775.
(B) Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvements
Fund (#21575): $523,966.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 128 of 248
2026
(3) From the Education Fund (#20205) to the:
(A) Tax Computer System Modernization Fund (#21909):
$1,550,000.
(4) From the Clean Water Fund (#21932) to the:
(A) Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund (#21933): $11,897,381.
(B) Lake in Crisis Response Program Special Fund (#21938):
$120,000.
(5) From the Agency of Human Services Central Office Earned Federal
Receipts (#22005) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $5,000,000.
(6) From the AG-Fees and Reimbursement-Court Order Special Fund
(#21638) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $2,000,000.
(B) Miscellaneous Fines & Penalties Fund (#21054): $1,538,600.
(7) From the Insurance Reserve Fund (#21335) to the:
(A) Transportation Fund (#20105): $1,360,069, notwithstanding
32 V.S.A. § 135.
(8) From the State PACE Reserve Fund (#21943) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $60,806.73, notwithstanding 24 V.S.A.
§ 3270.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 129 of 248
2026
(9) From the Technology Modernization Special Fund (#21951) to the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $9,547,596.39, notwithstanding 3
V.S.A. § 3306.
(b) The following transfers shall be in accordance with the citations
provided. Transfer estimates are for purposes of developing the fiscal year
2027 budget and do not supersede the actual fiscal year-end transfer amounts.
(1) To the General Fund (#10000) from the:
(A) 8 V.S.A. § 80(d). Insurance Regulatory and Supervision Fund
(#21075): $42,837,511.
(B) 9 V.S.A. § 5613(c). Securities Regulatory and Supervision Fund
(#21085): $23,762,455.
(C) 27 V.S.A. § 1543. Unclaimed Property Fund (#62100):
$10,464,702.
(2) 8 V.S.A. § 6017(b). To the Captive Insurance Regulatory and
Supervision Fund (#21085) from the:
(A) General Fund (#10000): $143,318.
(c) Transfers from the following enterprise funds to the General Fund
(#10000), shall not exceed the actual fiscal year-end profits earned by the
enterprise net of any amount necessary to absolve the fund of a deficit. The
following estimated transfers are for purposes of developing the fiscal year
2027 budget only.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 130 of 248
2026
(1) From the Sports Wagering Enterprise Fund (#50250): $6,700,000.
(2) From the Liquor Control Fund (#50300): $20,871,297.
Sec. D.102 REVERSIONS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2027, the following amounts shall revert to the General Fund from the
accounts indicated:
1100892208 AOA-VT Housing Finance Agency 1,000,000.00
1100892310 AOA-FEMA COVID Match 890,937.34
1100892402 AOA-High-Risk FEMA Denial Resv 5,184,452.41
1100892401 AOA-ORE-Language Access Plan 150,000.00
2200892301 AAFM-Ecosystems Services 100,000.00
2200892307 AAFM-Conservation Districts 16,513.42
2200892408 AAFM-Dairy Risk Mgmt 35,496.73
2240892204 PSD-Affordable Comm Scale Ren 200,000.00
2240892404 PSD-SHARE 195,000.00
3150892302 DMH-Howard Center 790.68
3400892204 AHSCO-Workforce Retention 300,000.00
3400892304 AHS-Nurse Preceptor Grants 189,984.00
3410892502 DVHA-Technical Analysis 21,601.25
3440891905 Child Dev Assoc Credential 29,752.09
3440892401 DCF-Reach Ahead 2 Year Pilot 498.63
3480892501 DOC-Data Contract 300,000.00
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 131 of 248
2026
5100892308 AOE-Universal Income Dec. 99,990.00
6140892402 DEC-Emissions Repair Program 362,416.60
7110892406 HCD-Mobile Home Condemnation 831,043.50
7110892106 HCD - Tech Serv Local Gov 1,056.73
7110892306 HCD-Designated Area Report 5,342.36
7120892204 ACCD-Technology Related Grants 100,000.00
Sec. D.103 RESERVES
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2027, the following reserve transactions shall be implemented for the funds
provided:
(1) General Fund.
(A) The General Fund 27/53 Reserve shall be adjusted in accordance
with 32 V.S.A. § 308e. For purposes of developing this budget, $6,550,000 is
expected to be reserved in fiscal year 2027.
(B) The $30,000,000 General Fund reserved pursuant to 2025 Acts
and Resolves No. 27, Sec. B.1101(b)(4) is unreserved.
* * * General Government * * *
Sec. E.100 POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of six permanent positions is authorized in fiscal year
2027 for the following:
(1) Permanent classified positions:
(A) Office of the State Treasurer:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 132 of 248
2026
(i) one Program Technician III; and
(ii) one Policy and Research Manager.
(B) Vermont Pension Investment Commission:
(i) one Financial Director III.
(C) Office of the Secretary of State:
(i) one RIM Specialist; and
(ii) one Business Services Administrator.
(2) Permanent exempt positions:
(A) Vermont Labor Relations Board:
(i) one Mediator.
(b) The establishment of one limited service exempt Staff Attorney position
is authorized at the State Ethics Commission in fiscal year 2027.
(c) The conversion of four limited service positions to permanent classified
status is authorized in fiscal year 2027 as follows:
(1) Office of the Attorney General:
(A) one Assistant Director of Court Diversion and Pretrial Services;
and
(B) one Home Improvement Specialist.
(2) Office of the Secretary of State:
(A) one Administrative Services Coordinator IV.
(3) Department of Public Service:
(A) one Financial Director IV.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 133 of 248
2026
(d) The conversion of 26 limited service positions to permanent exempt
status is authorized in fiscal year 2027 as follows:
(1) Judiciary:
(A) one Database Administrator;
(B) two IT Help Desk Analysts;
(C) two Centralized Service Analysts;
(D) 10 Judicial Assistants; and
(E) 11 Judicial Officer II’s.
Sec. E.100.1 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 27, Sec. E.100.3 is amended to read:
Sec. E.100.3 AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT; CORONAVIRUS
STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND APPROPRIATIONS;
REPORTING
(a) In fiscal year years 2026 and 2027, the Secretary of Administration
shall report to the Joint Fiscal Committee on a quarterly basis, and upon the
request of the Committee, on the status of appropriations made from the
American Rescue Plan Act – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund.
(1) Reports shall include information on:
(A) the original amounts appropriated;
(B) outstanding obligations against appropriations; and
(C) any remaining spending authority.
(b) In fiscal year years 2026, 2027, and 2028, the Secretary of
Administration shall report to the Joint Fiscal Committee on a quarterly basis,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 134 of 248
2026
and upon the request of the Committee, on the status of any spending authority
established pursuant to 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.106.
(1) Reports shall include information on:
(A) the original amounts appropriated;
(B) outstanding obligations against appropriations; and
(C) any remaining spending authority.
(c) Any spending authority established pursuant to 2024 Acts and Resolves
No. 113, Sec. E.106(a) and (c) that remains unexpended and unencumbered on
December 31, 2027, shall revert to the General Fund. Any unallocated balance
resulting from this reversion shall be reserved in the General Fund Balance
Reserve.
* * *
Sec. E.100.2 SECRETARY OF ADMINISTRATION; REPORT ON
STATUS OF FEDERAL FUNDS
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall report to the Joint Fiscal
Committee at its July, September, and November 2026 meetings, and at other
meetings as requested, on any reductions to federal revenues to the State and
the status of any appropriations impacted by such reductions.
Sec. E.100.3 2018 (Sp. Sess.) Acts and Resolves No. 9, Sec. 5 is amended to
read:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 135 of 248
2026
Sec. 5. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF RACIAL EQUITY; RACIAL
EQUITY ADVISORY PANEL; FUNDING SOURCE;
SURCHARGE; REPEAL
(a) Surcharge.
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 2283(c) setting forth
the purpose and rate of charges collected in the Human Resource Services
Internal Service Fund, in fiscal year 2019, a surcharge of up to 1.65 percent,
and in fiscal year 2020 and thereafter, a surcharge of up to 3.3 percent, but not
greater than the cost of both the Racial Equity Advisory Panel and the position
of Executive Director activities of the Office of Racial Equity set forth in Sec.
3 of this act, on the perposition per-position portion of the charges authorized
in 3 V.S.A. § 2283(c)(2) shall be assessed to all Executive Branch agencies,
departments, and offices and shall be paid by all assessed entities solely with
State funds.
(2) The amount collected shall be accounted for within the Human
Resource Services Internal Service Fund and used solely for the purposes of
funding the Racial Equity Advisory Panel and the position of the Executive
Director of Racial Equity set forth in Sec. 3 of this act.
(b) Repeal. This section shall be repealed on June 30, 2024 July 1, 2027.
Sec. E.105.1 AGENCY OF DIGITAL SERVICES; INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY INTERNAL SERVICE FUND; DEFICIT
MITIGATION PLAN
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 136 of 248
2026
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the Agency of Digital Services shall, in
consultation with the Department of Finance and Management, provide a
written plan to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Energy and
Digital Infrastructure and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on
Institutions on how to reduce the fund deficit in the Information Technology
Internal Service Fund established by 3 V.S.A. § 3304, including any
recommended changes to Fund sources, uses, and transfers. The report shall
include information on revenues to and expenditures from the Fund and the
Fund’s balance at the fiscal year closeout for the previous 10 fiscal years. The
report shall also include the most current available information Fund sources,
uses, transfers, and the estimated Fund balance at the fiscal year 2027 closeout.
(b) On or before February 15, 2027, the Agency of Digital Services shall,
in consultation with the Department of Finance and Management, provide a
report to the House Committees on Appropriations and on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on
Institutions on the approach and assumptions used for estimating sources and
uses for the Core Enterprise Services Fund (#58100), Enterprise Offerings
Fund (#58110), Professional Services Fund (#58120), and Customized
Services Fund (#58130) for the purposes of building the fiscal year 2027
budget. The report shall include information on the Agency’s adaptation to
and compliance with new procedures on the part of various State agencies and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 137 of 248
2026
departments and any managerial or organizational advantages to the fiscal year
2027 budgeting approach.
(c) On or before February 15, 2027, the Department of Finance and
Management shall provide a report to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Institutions on the establishment and
consistent use of the State’s Chart of Accounts to uniformly track expenditures
associated with major IT projects by agency and department. It is the intent of
the General Assembly that project-level tracking include contracts with IT
implementation vendors, business process contracts that support project
delivery, and internal staffing and operating costs.
Sec. E.106 32 V.S.A. § 307(b) is amended to read:
(b) The budget shall also include in detail definite recommendations of the
Governor relative to the amounts that should be appropriated to each of the
activities referred to under this section. It shall also include definite
recommendations of the Governor relative to the financing of the expenditures
recommended and the appropriate amounts to be raised from ordinary revenue,
direct taxes, bonds, or loans. The financing of the expenditures recommended,
as proposed by the Governor, shall not include the funds from the Budget
Stabilization Reserve as established in section 308 of this title. With the
budget, the Governor shall submit to the General Assembly such messages,
statements, or supplemental data with reference to the same, as the Governor
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 138 of 248
2026
may deem expedient; however, budget documentation shall include to the
extent possible the following:
* * *
(5) A document outlining reversions and approved carryforward by
appropriation for those funds subject to the Secretary of Administration’s
carryforward authority or containing automatic carryforward provisions as
designated by the General Assembly.
Sec. E.108 STATE EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION STUDY;
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES; REPORT
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the Department of Human Resources
shall submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on
Appropriations, the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs, and the Senate Committee on Government Operations with its findings
and any recommendations for legislative action on how and whether to amend
the statutes governing State employee compensation, including what State
employee salary information should be set forth in statute and the method of
determining appropriate pay increases for State employees. The report and
recommendations shall be based on the Department’s review and analysis of
the following:
(1) those exempt position titles that set forth the associated salary in
statute and the exempt position titles that do not set forth salary in statute;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 139 of 248
2026
(2) how the annual rate of adjustment is determined and applied for
exempt employee salaries and how it compares to the annual rate of adjustment
determination and application for classified employee salaries; and
(3) the salary advancement structure for exempt employees as compared
to the salary advancement structure for classified employees.
Sec. E.108.1 3 V.S.A. § 2283 is amended to read:
§ 2283. DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES
* * *
(c)(1) There is established in the Department of Human Resources a
Human Resource Services Internal Service Fund to consist of revenues from
charges to agencies, departments, and similar units of Vermont State
government and to be available to fund the costs of the consolidated human
resource, Office of Racial Equity, and State Ethics Commission services in the
Department of Human Resources.
(2) The rate of the charges shall be proposed by the Commissioner of
Human Resources, subject to the approval of the Secretary of Administration.
Proposed rates of charges shall be based upon the cost of operations associated
with human resource, Office of Racial Equity, and State Ethics Commission
services provided to agencies, departments, and similar units of Vermont State
government.
Sec. E.111 DEPARTMENT OF TAXES; POSITION POOL;
FUNDING
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 140 of 248
2026
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.111 of this act, $135,000 General
Fund shall be for a permanent, classified Business Analyst position to be taken
from the position pool.
Sec. E.127 JOINT FISCAL OFFICE; SPECIAL FUNDS REPORT
(a) The Joint Fiscal Office shall, in consultation with the Department of
Finance and Management, provide a report with a general overview of special
funds and their uses to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations on
or before December 15, 2026.
(b) In addition to the report outlined in subsection (a) of this section, the
Joint Fiscal Office shall, in consultation with the Office of Legislative Counsel
and the Department of Finance and Management, submit the following reports
to the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations:
(1) A report with detailed information on all special funds in existence
the prior fiscal year that fall within function areas of government identified by
the Department of Finance and Management’s accounting system as “general
government,” “labor,” “general education,” “commerce and community
development,” and “transportation.” The report shall be submitted on or
before December 15, 2026.
(2) A report with detailed information on all special funds in existence
the prior fiscal year that fall within function areas of government identified by
the Department of Finance and Management’s accounting system as “human
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 141 of 248
2026
services” and “natural resources.” The report shall be submitted on or before
December 15, 2027.
(3) A report with detailed information on all special funds in existence
the prior fiscal year that fall within function areas of government identified by
the Department of Finance and Management’s accounting system as
“protection to persons and property.” The report shall be submitted on or
before December 15, 2028.
(4) A report with detailed information on all special funds in existence
the prior fiscal year that did not fall within any function areas of government
identified in subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection or that would fall within
those function areas of government but were established after the relevant
report was submitted. The report shall be submitted on or before December
15, 2029.
(c) The reports required by subsection (b) of this section shall include, for
each special fund identified, the following information, if available:
(1) the authorizing statute for the fund, its date of enactment, and any
amendments to the statute;
(2) a description of sources, uses, transfers, and reservations, including
stated purposes of uses, transfers, and reservations;
(3) the prior fiscal year fund balance at closeout; and
(4) other relevant information on the general management and oversight
of the fund.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 142 of 248
2026
Sec. E.127.1 FISCAL YEAR 2027 FEE REPORT; HUMAN SERVICES;
NATURAL RESOURCES
(a) Fiscal year 2027 fee information. Agencies, departments, boards, and
offices that receive appropriations in Secs. B.300–399 and B.700–799 of this
act shall, in collaboration with the Joint Fiscal Office, prepare a comprehensive
fee report for each fee that is in effect in fiscal year 2027. The fee report shall
contain the following information for each fee:
(1) the statutory authorization and termination date, if any;
(2) the current rate or amount of the fee and the date the fee was last set
or adjusted by the General Assembly or Joint Fiscal Committee;
(3) the Fund into which the fee revenues are deposited;
(4) the amount of the revenues derived from the fee in each of the five
fiscal years preceding fiscal year 2027;
(5) the number of times that the fee was paid in each of the two fiscal
years preceding fiscal year 2027;
(6) a projection of the fee revenues in fiscal years 2027 and 2028;
(7) a description of the service or product provided or the regulatory
function performed by the agency, department, board, or office supported by
the fee;
(8) the amount of the fee if adjusted for inflation from the last time the
fee amount was modified using an appropriate index chosen in consultation
with the Joint Fiscal Office. The inflation adjustment shall be calculated as the
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 143 of 248
2026
percentage change between the value of the index in the July of the year the fee
was last adjusted by the General Assembly and July 2026;
(9) if any portion of the fee revenue is deposited into a special fund, the
percentage of the special fund’s revenues that the fee represents;
(10) any available information regarding comparable fees in other
jurisdictions;
(11) any policies or trends that might affect the viability of the fee
amount; and
(12) any other relevant considerations for setting the fee amount.
(b) Reports.
(1) The Joint Fiscal Office shall provide guidance as necessary to the
agencies, departments, boards, and offices described in subsection (a) of this
section on the methodology to be used for compiling the information requested
in the fee reports. On or before October 15, 2026, the agencies, departments,
boards, and offices described in subsection (a) of this section shall submit a
draft report of the information required in subdivisions (a)(1)–(12) of this
section to the Joint Fiscal Office for review. Agencies, departments, boards,
and offices shall work with the Joint Fiscal Office to finalize the report before
submitting the report described in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) On or before December 15, 2026, the agencies, departments, boards,
and offices described in subsection (a) of this section shall submit a final report
to the Joint Fiscal Office.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 144 of 248
2026
(3) On or before January 15, 2027, the Joint Fiscal Office shall submit a
consolidated report consisting of the final reports submitted pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection to the House Committees on Appropriations
and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on
Finance.
(4) If any of the information requested in this section cannot be provided
for any reason, the agencies, departments, boards, and offices described in
subsection (a) of this section shall include in both the draft and final reports a
written explanation for why the information cannot be provided.
(c) As used in this section, as it pertains to Executive Branch agencies,
departments, boards, and offices, “fee” means any source of State revenue
classified by the Department of Finance and Management Accounting System
as “fees,” “business licenses,” “nonbusiness licenses,” and “fines and
penalties.”
(d) Executive Branch fee report moratorium. Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A.
§ 605, in fiscal year 2027, the Governor shall not be required to submit the
consolidated Executive Branch fee annual report and request to the General
Assembly.
Sec. E.131 HIGHER EDUCATION ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND; USES;
REPORT
(a) In calendar year 2026, as part of the annual financial report on the
Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund required by 16 V.S.A.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 145 of 248
2026
§ 2885(e), the Office of the State Treasurer shall, in consultation with the
Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund Council and the respective
student government associations of the University of Vermont, Community
College of Vermont, and Vermont State University, on each item listed below,
include recommendations on the following:
(1) any changes to Fund sources, uses, and transfers, including any
expanded uses of the Fund and adjustments to the current statutory allocation
structure;
(2) mechanisms, including requiring consultation with the Vermont
Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund Council, for ensuring appropriate
fiduciary oversight of the use of the Fund to ensure that the endowed funds,
including principal and interest earnings, are available for the intended purpose
of providing scholarships to Vermont students;
(3) how to expand or modify the membership of the Council to include
student representatives of the recipient institutions of higher education; and
(4) how to expand the scope of scholarship awards, including award
amounts, types of degrees covered, and institutions of higher education
included in the scholarship program.
Sec. E.131.1 STATE PACE RESERVE FUND; REPEAL
(a) 24 V.S.A. § 3270 (State PACE Reserve Fund) is repealed and any
balance remaining shall be transferred to the General Fund.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 146 of 248
2026
Sec. E.133 VERMONT STATE EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION;
OPERATING BUDGET; SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $3,768,126 appropriated in Sec. B.133 of this act, $2,526,938
constitutes the Vermont State Employees’ Retirement System operating
budget, and $1,241,188 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont State
Employees’ Retirement System.
Sec. E.134 VERMONT MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT
SYSTEM AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT
COMMISSION; OPERATING BUDGET; SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $2,207,869 appropriated in Sec. B.134 of this act, $1,765,361
constitutes the Vermont Municipal Employees’ Retirement System operating
budget, and $442,508 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension
Investment Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont Municipal
Employees’ Retirement System.
Sec. E.135 3 V.S.A. § 922 is amended to read:
§ 922. OFFICE SPACE; EMPLOYEES; MEDIATOR
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall, upon request by the State Labor
Relations Board, allow the Board the responsible use of public buildings under
his or her the Secretary’s control and furnish heat, light, and furniture for any
meeting or hearing called by the Board.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 147 of 248
2026
(b) The Board may employ such employees and agents as it deems
necessary and may employ a reporter for taking and transcribing testimony in
hearing before it.
(c)(1) The Board may employ a mediator to provide free mediation services
to public and private sector collective bargaining units and employers upon
reaching an impasse during collective bargaining.
(2) If the mediator has capacity, the mediator may provide free
mediation services to public and private sector collective bargaining units and
employers on grievances and unfair labor practice charges.
(3) The Board shall develop policies and procedures to ensure that all
confidential mediation information is maintained separately and insulated from
access by members of the Board or other employees of the State Labor
Relations Board so as to protect the integrity of the mediation process.
Sec. E.136.1 STATE ETHICS COMMISSION; REPORT
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the State Ethics Commission shall
report to the House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs, the Senate Committee on Government Operations, and the House and
Senate Committees on Appropriations on its organizational structure,
workload, and capacity.
(b) The report shall include information on the Commission’s:
(1) current personnel and management structure with two full-time
equivalents; and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 148 of 248
2026
(2) recommendations for reducing or eliminating duties given to it
through prior legislative enactment to align its workload with its fiscal year
2027 personnel capacity.
Sec. E.136.2 STATE ETHICS COMMISSION; POSITION FUNDING
(a) The $150,000 General Fund and $214,306 internal service fund
appropriated in Sec. B.136.1 of this act may be used by the State Ethics
Commission for personal services costs for up to two full-time equivalents to
fund positions established at the Commission, including the Executive Director
and the Staff Attorney established by Sec. E.100 of this act.
Sec. E.136.3 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 171 (2024 Ethics Act), Sec. 24, as
amended by 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 44, Sec. 4, is further amended to
read:
Sec. 24. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
(1) Sec. 13 (adding 3 V.S.A. § 1230, Commission procedure,
rulemaking) shall take effect on July 1, 2027 2028, except that the Commission
may adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. § 1230(b) prior to July 1, 2028;
(2) Sec. 22 (creating Municipal Code of Ethics) shall take effect on
January 1, 2025;
(3) Sec. 7 (amending 3 V.S.A. § 1221(a), describing expansion of
Commission powers) shall take effect on September 1, 2027 July 1, 2028;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 149 of 248
2026
(4) Sec. 8 (amending 3 V.S.A. § 1222; title redesignation) shall take
effect on July 1, 2025;
(5) Sec. 9 (amending 3 V.S.A. § 1223, Commission procedure for
accepting and referring complaints) shall take effect on September 1, 2025.;
(6) Secs. 10 (adding 3 V.S.A. § 1227, Commission investigations),
11 (adding 3 V.S.A. § 1228, Commission hearings), 12 (adding 3 V.S.A.
§ 1229, Commission warnings, reprimands, recommended actions, and
agreements), and 14 (adding 3 V.S.A. § 1231, Commission public records
regarding complaints) shall take effect on September 1, 2027 July 1, 2028; and
(7) Sec. 1 (amending 17 V.S.A. § 2414, candidate disclosures) shall take
effect on January 1, 2026.
Sec. E.136.4 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 44, Sec. 5 is amended to read:
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on passage, except that:
(1) Sec. 1 (amending 3 V.S.A. § 1223, Commission procedure for
accepting and referring complaints) shall take effect on September 1, 2025, and
shall supersede those provisions of 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 171, Sec. 9
that amended 3 V.S.A. § 1223 and that conflict with the language in this act;
(2) Sec. 2 (amending future version of 3 V.S.A. § 1223) shall take effect
on September 1, 2027 July 1, 2028; and
(3) Sec. 3 (amending 3 V.S.A. § 1231, Commission public records
regarding complaints) shall take effect on September 1, 2027 July 1, 2028, and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 150 of 248
2026
shall supersede those provisions of 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 171, Sec. 14
that amended 3 V.S.A. § 1231 and that conflict with the language in this act.
Sec. E.138 RENTER REBATE FISCAL YEAR 2027 BASE INCREASE;
ONE-TIME
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the $4,000,000 increase to
the appropriation in Sec. B.138 of this act be a one-time increase in fiscal year
2027 that shall not recur in future fiscal years.
Sec. E.139 GRAND LIST LITIGATION ASSISTANCE
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3709(a), of the appropriation in Sec.
B.139 of this act, $70,000 shall be provided to the Department of Taxes’
Division of Property Valuation and Review and used with any remaining funds
from the amount previously transferred for final payment of expenses incurred
by the Department or towns in defense of grand list appeals regarding the
reappraisals of the hydroelectric plants and other expenses incurred to
undertake utility property appraisals in Vermont.
Sec. E.139.1 TAX DEPARTMENT APPROPRIATION; PILOT FUND
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3709(a) or any other provision of law to
the contrary, the appropriation in Sec. B.139 of this act shall be made from the
PILOT Special Fund.
Sec. E.142 PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES
(a) This appropriation is for State payments in lieu of property taxes under
32 V.S.A. chapter 123, subchapter 4, and the payments shall be calculated in
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 151 of 248
2026
addition to and without regard to the appropriations for correctional facilities
elsewhere in this act. Payments in lieu of taxes under this section shall be paid
from the PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. E.144 PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES; CORRECTIONAL
FACILITIES
(a) Payments in lieu of taxes under this section shall be paid from the
PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. E.200 ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Office of the Attorney
General, Medicaid Fraud and Residential Abuse Unit, is authorized to retain,
subject to appropriation, one-half of the State share of any recoveries from
Medicaid fraud settlements, excluding interest, that exceed the State share of
restitution to the Medicaid Program. All such designated additional recoveries
retained shall be used to finance Medicaid Fraud and Residential Abuse Unit
activities.
(b) Of the revenue available to the Attorney General under 9 V.S.A.
§ 2458(b)(4), $2,263,600 is appropriated in Sec. B.200 of this act.
Sec. E.208 PUBLIC SAFETY; ADMINISTRATION
(a) The Commissioner of Public Safety is authorized to enter into a
performance-based contract with the Essex County Sheriff’s Department to
provide law enforcement service activities agreed upon by both the
Commissioner of Public Safety and the Sheriff.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 152 of 248
2026
Sec. E.209 PUBLIC SAFETY; STATE POLICE
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209 of this act, $35,000
shall be available to the Southern Vermont Wilderness Search and Rescue
Team, which is composed of the State Police, the Department of Fish and
Wildlife, county sheriffs, and local law enforcement personnel in Bennington,
Windham, and Windsor Counties, for snowmobile enforcement.
(b) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209 of this act, $405,000 is
allocated for grants in support of the Drug Task Force. Of this amount,
$190,000 shall be used by the Vermont Drug Task Force to fund three town
task force officers. These town task force officers shall be dedicated to
enforcement efforts with respect to both regulated drugs as defined in 18
V.S.A. § 4201(29) and the diversion of legal prescription drugs. Any
unobligated funds may be allocated by the Commissioner to fund the work of
the Drug Task Force or carried forward.
(c) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.209 of this act, $2,100,000
is allocated exclusively for the purchase, outfitting, assignment, and disposal of
State Police vehicles.
Sec. E.209.1 20 V.S.A. § 1913a is added to read:
§ 1913a. VERMONT STATE POLICE RADIO EQUIPMENT AND
FIREARM REPLACEMENT SPECIAL FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont State Police Radio Equipment
and Firearm Replacement Special Fund, to be administered by the Department
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 153 of 248
2026
of Public Safety in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. Monies
in the Fund shall be used for the purchase of Vermont State Police radio
equipment and firearms in accordance with the life cycle replacement schedule
as approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) any amounts transferred to it by the General Assembly; and
(2) the proceeds from the sale of any existing radio equipment and
firearms.
(c) Fund balance. Any balance remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall
remain in the Fund.
(d) Receipts. The Commissioner of Finance and Management may
anticipate receipts to this Fund and issue warrants based thereon.
Sec. E.212 PUBLIC SAFETY; FIRE SAFETY
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.212 of this act, $55,000
shall be granted to the Vermont Rural Fire Protection Task Force for the
purpose of designing dry hydrants.
Sec. E.215 MILITARY; ADMINISTRATION
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.215 of this act, $1,219,834
shall be disbursed to the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation for the
Vermont National Guard Tuition Benefit Program established in 16 V.S.A.
§ 2857.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 154 of 248
2026
Sec. E.217 MILITARY; POSITION POOL; FEDERAL FUNDING
(a) Of the federal funds appropriated in Sec. B.217 of this act, $442,247
shall be the 75 percent federal share for the following six classified limited
service positions to be taken from the position pool: four Military
Maintenance Specialists II; one Military Building Construction Specialist; and
one Military Storekeeper.
Sec. E.218 MILITARY; POSITION POOL; STATE FUNDING
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.218 of this act, $147,411
shall be the 25 percent State share for the following six classified limited
service positions to be taken from the position pool: four Military
Maintenance Specialists II; one Military Building Construction Specialist; and
one Military Storekeeper.
Sec. E.219 MILITARY; VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
(a) Of the General Fund appropriated in Sec. B.219 of this act, $1,000 shall
be used for continuation of the Vermont Medal Program; $2,000 shall be used
for the expenses of the Governor’s Veterans Advisory Council; $7,500 shall be
used for the Veterans Day parade; $10,000 shall be granted to the American
Legion for the Green Mountain Boys’ State and Green Mountain Girls’ State
programs; and $10,000 shall be used for the USS Vermont Support Group.
Sec. E.232 SECRETARY OF STATE; VERMONT ACCESS NETWORK
BUDGET
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 155 of 248
2026
(a) The Secretary of State shall grant the $1,800,000 General Fund
appropriation provided in Sec. B.232 of this act to the Vermont Access
Network to maintain current operations and programming.
Sec. E.233 30 V.S.A. § 202d is amended to read:
§ 202d. TELECOMMUNICATIONS PLAN
* * *
(f) The Department shall adopt a new Plan every three five years pursuant
to the procedures established in subsection (e) of this section. The Plan shall
outline significant deviations from the prior Plan. For good cause or upon
request by a joint resolution passed by the General Assembly, an interim
review and revision of any section of the Plan may be made after conducting
public hearings on the interim revision. At least one hearing shall be held
jointly with committees of the General Assembly designated by the General
Assembly for this purpose.
Sec. E.233.1 30 V.S.A. § 209 is amended to read:
§ 209. JURISDICTION; GENERAL SCOPE
* * *
(e) Thermal energy and process fuel efficiency funding.
(1) Each of the following shall be used to deliver thermal energy and
process fuel energy efficiency services in accordance with this section for
unregulated fuels to Vermont consumers of such fuels. In addition, the
Commission may authorize an entity appointed to deliver such services under
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 156 of 248
2026
subdivision (d)(2)(B) of this section to use monies subject to this subsection
for the engineering, design, and construction of facilities for the conversion of
thermal energy customers using fossil fuels to district heat if the majority of
the district’s energy is from biomass sources, the district’s distribution system
is highly energy efficient, and such conversion is cost effective.
(A) Net revenues above costs associated with payments from the
New England Independent System Operator (ISO-NE) for capacity savings
resulting from the activities of the energy efficiency utility designated under
subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (e) that are not transferred to the State
PACE Reserve Fund under 24 V.S.A. § 3270(c). These revenues shall be
deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund established by this section. In
delivering services with respect to heating systems using the revenues subject
to this subdivision (A), the entity shall give priority to incentives for the
installation of high efficiency biomass heating systems and shall have a goal of
offering an incentive that is equal to 25 percent of the installed cost of such a
system. Provision of an incentive under this subdivision (A) for a biomass
heating system shall not be contingent on the making of other energy
efficiency improvements at the property on which the system will be installed.
* * *
Sec. E.234 REPORT ON REGIONAL RENEWABLE ENERGY MARKET
CONDITIONS; PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 157 of 248
2026
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the Public Utility Commission shall
prepare a written report on projected regional renewable electric generation
market conditions. In developing the report, the Commission shall examine
the cost and availability of new regional renewable electric generation
resources during the years 2027–2035.
(b) In preparing the report, the Commission shall provide an opportunity
for written input from interested stakeholders, including retail electricity
providers, renewable energy developers, regional transmission organizations,
consumer advocates, and any other members of the public. In addition, the
Commission may consult with the Department of Public Service and other
relevant state, regional, or federal entities, as the Commission deems
appropriate. Preparation of the report is not subject to the contested case
procedures established under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
(c) The Commission shall submit the report to the House Committees on
Environment and on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and the Senate
Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy.
Sec. E.236 HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION; POSITION POOL;
FUNDING
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.236 of this act, $130,000 General
Fund shall be for a permanent, exempt Staff Attorney Investigator position to
be taken from the position pool.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 158 of 248
2026
Sec. E.300 FUNDING FOR THE OFFICE OF THE HEALTH CARE
ADVOCATE, VERMONT LEGAL AID
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.300 of this act:
(1) $2,450,406 shall be for the contract with the Office of the Health
Care Advocate;
(2) $1,717,994 shall be for Vermont Legal Aid services, including the
Poverty Law Project and mental health services; and
(3) $650,000 shall be for the purposes of maintaining current Vermont
Legal Aid program capacity and addressing increased requests for services,
including eviction prevention and protection from foreclosure and consumer
debt.
Sec. E.300.1 HIGH-END SYSTEM FACILITIES FOR YOUTH
(a) At the August, October, and December 2026 meetings of the Joint
Legislative Justice Oversight Committee, the Departments for Children and
Families and of Buildings and General Services shall report on their plan to
develop the Green Mountain Youth Facility.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, before the
Departments for Children and Families and of Buildings and General Services
approve design documents for construction and prior to approval of the lease
for the facility, the Department of Buildings and General Services shall submit
their approved design to the House Committees on Corrections and Institutions
and on Human Services and the Senate Committees on Institutions and on
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 159 of 248
2026
Health and Welfare. At the same time, the Department for Children and
Families shall submit a draft operating budget.
Sec. E.301 SECRETARY’S OFFICE; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall use the funds appropriated in Sec.
B.301 of this act for payment required under the intergovernmental agreement
between the Agency of Human Services and the managed care entity, the
Department of Vermont Health Access, as provided for in the Global
Commitment to Health Waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act.
(b) In addition to the State funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, a
total estimated sum of $28,368,715 is anticipated to be certified as State
matching funds under the Global Commitment as follows:
(1) $25,158,000 certified State match available from local education
agencies for eligible special education school-based Medicaid services under
Global Commitment. This amount, combined with $34,842,000 of federal
funds appropriated in Sec. B.301 of this act, equals a total estimated
expenditure of $60,000,000. An amount equal to the amount of the federal
matching funds for eligible special education school-based Medicaid services
under Global Commitment shall be transferred from the Global Commitment
Fund to the School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund created in
33 V.S.A. § 1904a.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 160 of 248
2026
(2) $3,210,715 certified State match available from local designated
mental health and developmental services agencies for eligible mental health
services provided under Global Commitment.
(c) Up to $4,997,210 is transferred from the Agency of Human Services
Federal Receipts Holding Account to the Interdepartmental Transfer Fund
consistent with the amount appropriated in Sec. B.301 (Secretary’s Office;
Global Commitment) of this act.
Sec. E.301.1 GLOBAL COMMITMENT APPROPRIATIONS; TRANSFER;
REPORT
(a) To facilitate fiscal year 2027 closeout, the Secretary of Human Services,
with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, may make transfers
among the appropriations authorized for Medicaid and Medicaid waiver
program expenses, including Global Commitment appropriations outside the
Agency of Human Services. At least three business days prior to any transfer,
the Agency of Human Services shall submit to the Joint Fiscal Office a
proposal of transfers to be made pursuant to this section. A final report on all
transfers made under this section shall be made to the Joint Fiscal Committee
for review at the Committee’s September 2027 meeting. The purpose of this
section is to provide the Agency with limited authority to modify the
appropriations to comply with the terms and conditions of the Global
Commitment to Health Section 1115 demonstration approved by the Centers
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 161 of 248
2026
for Medicare and Medicaid Services under Section 1115 of the Social Security
Act.
Sec. E.301.2 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 83, Sec. 72a, as amended by 2022
Acts and Resolves No. 185, Sec. C.105, 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec.
E.301.2, 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 113, Sec. E.300.2, and 2025 Acts and
Resolves No. 27, Sec. E.301.2, is further amended to read:
Sec. 72a. MEDICAID HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES
(HCBS PLAN)
* * *
(f) The Global Commitment Fund appropriated in subsection (e) of this
section obligated in fiscal years 2023, 2024, 2025, and 2026, and 2027 for the
purposes of bringing HCBS plan spending authority forward into fiscal years
2024, 2025, and 2026, and 2027, respectively. The funds appropriated in
subsections (b), (c), and (e) of this section may be transferred on a net-neutral
basis in fiscal years 2023, 2024, 2025, and 2026, and 2027 in the same manner
as the Global Commitment appropriations in 2022 Acts and Resolves No. 185,
Sec. E.301. The Agency shall report to the Joint Fiscal Committee in
September 2023, September 2024, September 2025, and September 2026, and
September 2027, respectively, on transfers of appropriations made and final
amounts expended by each department in fiscal years 2023, 2024, 2025, and
2026, and 2027, respectively, and any obligated funds carried forward to be
expended in fiscal years 2024, 2025, and 2026, and 2027, respectively.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 162 of 248
2026
Sec. E.301.3 GLOBAL COMMITMENT WAIVER AMENDMENT
(a) The Secretary of Human Services is authorized to seek an extension of
Vermont’s Global Commitment to Health Section 1115 Demonstration for the
period of January 1, 2028, through December 31, 2032, from the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Sec. E.306.1 MEDICARE ADVOCACY PROGRAM
(a) Effective July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access
shall terminate any contract for services for the Medicare Advocacy Program
under 33 V.S.A. chapter 67 consistent with the provisions of 33 V.S.A.
§ 6703(b).
Sec. E.306.2 DEPARTMENT OF VERMONT HEALTH ACCESS;
POSITION POOL; FUNDING
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.306 of this act, $497,077 of General
Fund and $497,077 of federal funds shall be for the following permanent,
classified positions to be taken from the position pool: one Health Care
Assistant Administrator I; one Digital Communications Specialist II; one
Business Project Manager; four Vermont Healthcare Service Specialist I’s; and
five Vermont Healthcare Service Specialist II’s.
Sec. E.306.3 DEPARTMENT OF VERMONT HEALTH ACCESS;
PAYMENTS TO PROVIDERS IN PRIMARY CARE PLUS
PROGRAM
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 163 of 248
2026
(a) In order to preserve access to primary care services, the Department of
Vermont Health Access shall provide enhanced primary care rates and
enhanced encounter rates, as applicable, to primary care providers in fiscal
year 2027.
Sec. E.307 DEPARTMENT OF VERMONT HEALTH ACCESS;
EDUCATION MEDICAID RECEIPTS
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of 16 V.S.A. § 2959a to the contrary, the
payments ordinarily made by the Secretary of Education pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 2959a(c) and (d) shall instead be made by the Commissioner of Vermont
Health Access.
Sec. E.307.1 33 V.S.A. § 1900 is amended to read:
§ 1900. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter, unless otherwise indicated:
* * *
(12) “Supervisory union” has the same meaning as in 16 V.S.A. § 11
and includes a supervisory district.
Sec. E.307.2 33 V.S.A. § 1904 is added to read:
§ 1904. MEDICAID SCHOOL-BASED SERVICES PROGRAM
(a)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State of Vermont
maximize its receipt of federal reimbursement for medically related services
provided to students who are eligible under Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social
Security Act.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 164 of 248
2026
(2) It is also the intent of the General Assembly that Vermont’s School-
Based Medical Assistance Program shall comply with all federal Medicaid
requirements. As the State Medicaid agency, the Agency of Human Services
shall have sole responsibility for determining and maintaining program
compliance.
(b) The Agency of Education shall be responsible for coordination of the
School-Based Medical Assistance Program with statewide education policy
and objectives and for communicating with supervisory unions.
(c) The Agency of Human Services shall adopt rules in accordance with
3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to identify the services that are available through the
School-Based Medical Assistance Program and to set forth the requirements
for supervisory union participation. The rules shall include State and federal
requirements for:
(1) Medicaid reimbursement;
(2) participation in a Random Moment Time Study and an electronic
health records system;
(3) Medicaid cost reports;
(4) provider enrollment and trainings;
(5) service documentation;
(6) Medicaid eligibility; and
(7) any other provisions necessary for compliance with the Medicaid
program.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 165 of 248
2026
(d)(1) The Agency of Human Services shall support supervisory unions by
funding and providing the technical elements of the Program necessary for
federal compliance.
(2) Supervisory unions delivering medically related services pursuant to
the Medicaid School-Based Services Program shall participate in a Random
Moment Time Study and an electronic health records system as directed by the
Agency of Human Services to enable Medicaid billing of direct health services
and Medicaid administrative claiming activities.
Sec. E.307.3 33 V.S.A. § 1904a is added to read:
§ 1904a. SCHOOL-BASED MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FUND
(a) The School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund is established as a
special fund to receive federal reimbursements for medically related services
delivered pursuant to the Medicaid school-based services program described in
section 1904 of this chapter. Monies received by the State pursuant to this
section shall be transferred to the School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement
Fund, which shall be administered by the Agency of Human Services, and
Fund receipts shall be allocated in accordance with this section.
(b) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall pay 55 percent of the
federal reimbursement monies generated by the medically related services
delivered in each supervisory union pursuant to the Medicaid school-based
services program to the supervisory union based on the Medicaid cost reports,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 166 of 248
2026
service claims, and Medicaid administrative costs submitted by the supervisory
union.
(c)(1) Up to 25 percent of the federal reimbursement monies generated by
services delivered pursuant to the Medicaid school-based services program
shall be available for the administrative costs of the Agencies of Education and
of Human Services related to the collection, operations, and reporting of
school-based medical assistance programs and statewide programs.
(2) The Agencies shall enter into a memorandum of understanding
setting forth the processes by which Medicaid reimbursement monies available
for administrative costs and statewide programs are allocated to the Agencies.
(3) The Secretaries of Education and of Human Services shall expend
monies from the Fund only as appropriated by the General Assembly. The
provisions of 32 V.S.A. § 511 shall not apply to this Fund.
(d) At the close of each fiscal year, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management shall transfer to and deposit any unencumbered available cash
balance remaining in the School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement Fund net of
accounts payable into the Education Fund.
Sec. E.307.4 33 V.S.A. § 1904a is amended to read:
§ 1904a. SCHOOL-BASED MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FUND
* * *
(c)(1) Up to 25 20 percent of the federal reimbursement monies generated
by services delivered pursuant to the Medicaid school-based services program
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 167 of 248
2026
shall be available for the administrative costs of the Agencies of Education and
of Human Services related to the collection, operations, and reporting of
school-based medical assistance programs and statewide programs.
* * *
Sec. E.307.5 16 V.S.A. § 2959a is amended to read:
§ 2959a. EDUCATION MEDICAID RECEIPTS MEDICAID SCHOOL-
BASED SERVICES PROGRAM; SUPERVISORY UNIONS AND
SUPERVISORY DISTRICTS; LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State of Vermont shall
maximize its receipt of federal Medicaid dollars available for reimbursement
of for medically related services provided to students who are Medicaid
eligible under Title XIX (Medicaid) of the Social Security Act. It is further the
intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) each supervisory union identify special education and other students
eligible for Medicaid reimbursement and, to the extent possible, submit
Medicaid bills for services reimbursement Medicaid-compliant cost reports
and service claims; and
(2) the Agencies of Education and of Human Services work with local
school districts to maximize reimbursements, including services to non-IEP
students.
(b) A Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund is established within the
Agency of Education. Funds received by the State under this section shall be
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 168 of 248
2026
transferred to the Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund. The Fund receipts
shall be allocated in accordance with this section.
(c) At least annually, the Secretary of Education shall pay to each
supervisory union submitting Medicaid bills under this section 50 percent of
the reimbursed funds generated by the supervisory union’s bill, excluding
claims generated by State-placed students. Unless the supervisory union has
agreed to use the funds to operate a supervisory unionwide program or to
distribute the funds in a different manner, upon receipt, the supervisory union
shall distribute the funds to its member school districts based on how the funds
were generated. The Secretary may withhold payment due a supervisory union
pursuant to section 2950 of this title for a Medicaid-eligible State-placed
student if the supervisory union has not submitted a Medicaid claim for
reimbursable services for that student.
(d) If the amount of Medicaid reimbursement funds received for services
provided in the prior State fiscal year exceeds $25,000,000.00, in addition to
the 50 percent of the funds paid to supervisory unions submitting Medicaid
bills, 25 percent of the amounts in excess of the $25,000,000.00 shall be paid
into an incentive fund created in the Agency of Education. These funds shall
be used for an incentive payment to supervisory unions with student
participation rates of over 80 percent in accordance with a formula to be
developed by the Agency, in consultation with the Vermont Superintendents
Association. For any incentive payments made subsequent to fiscal year 2007,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 169 of 248
2026
the $25,000,000.00 threshold of this subsection shall be increased by the
percentage increase of the most recent New England Economic Project
Cumulative Price Index, as of November 15, for state and local government
purchases of goods and services from fiscal year 2005 through the fiscal year
for which the payment is being determined, plus an additional one-tenth of one
percent.
(e) Supervisory unions shall use funds received under this section to pay
for reasonable costs of administering the Medicaid claims process, and school
districts or supervisory unions shall use funds received under this section for
prevention and intervention programs in prekindergarten through grade 12.
The programs shall be designed to facilitate early identification of and
intervention with children with disabilities and to ensure all students achieve
rigorous and challenging standards approved and adopted by the State Board or
locally adopted standards. A supervisory union shall provide annual written
justification to the Secretary of Education on how it or its member districts
used the funds. Such annual submission shall show how the funds’ use is
expressly linked to those provisions of the supervisory union’s action plan that
directly relate to improving student performance. A supervisory union shall
include in its annual report the amount of the prior year’s Medicaid
reimbursement revenues and the use of Medicaid funds consistent with the
purposes set forth in this subsection.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 170 of 248
2026
(f) Up to 30 percent of Medicaid reimbursements received under this
section shall be available for administrative costs of the Agencies of Education
and of Human Services related to the collection, processing, and reporting of
education Medicaid reimbursements and statewide programs. The Secretaries
of Education and of Human Services shall expend monies from the Fund only
as appropriated by the General Assembly.
(g) Remaining reimbursed funds shall be deposited into the Education
Fund.
Sec. E.307.6 STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT IN IMPLEMENTATION
OF CHANGES TO MEDICAID SCHOOL-BASED SERVICES
PROGRAM
(a) The Agency of Human Services shall collaborate with the Agency of
Education, Vermont Association of School Business Officials, Vermont
Council of Special Education Administrators, and school district officials in
implementing changes to the Medicaid school-based services program in
accordance with this act, including:
(1) providing structured opportunities for input during the phased
implementation process in order to address challenges and risks in a timely
manner and minimize disruptions; and
(2) focusing on geographic diversity to ensure that the implementation
process is responsive to regional variations in needs and capacity.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 171 of 248
2026
Sec. E.307.7 SPECIAL FUND BALANCE TRANSFER
(a) Any outstanding fund balances, assets, or liabilities remaining in the
Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund established pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 2959a shall be transferred to the School-Based Medicaid Reimbursement
Fund established pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 1904a prior to the elimination of the
Medicaid Reimbursement Special Fund by Sec. E.307.5 of this act.
Sec. E.307.8 DEPARTMENT OF VERMONT HEALTH ACCESS; FAMILY
PLANNING CODE IMPLEMENTATION; REPORT
(a) On or before September 15, 2026, the Department of Vermont Health
Access shall review its implementation of family planning codes in the
Medicaid program to ensure that all expenditures for family planning services
and supplies that are eligible for federal match at a 90 percent federal medical
assistance percentage are receiving that enhanced rate.
(b) On or before October 1, 2026, the Department shall provide a progress
report to the Health Reform Oversight Committee and the Joint Fiscal
Committee on:
(1) the Department’s findings to date from its review;
(2) an estimate of any reductions in General Fund expenditures that can
be realized by maximizing usage of the family planning codes to obtain the
90 percent federal match for qualifying services and supplies; and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 172 of 248
2026
(3) proposals for ways in which the estimated savings can be reinvested
into rate increases for family planning services and supplies as part of the fiscal
year 2027 budget adjustment.
Sec. E.311 2020 Acts and Resolves No. 155, Sec. 7a, as amended by 2021
Acts and Resolves No. 74, Sec E.311.2, is further amended to read:
Sec. 7a. SUNSET
18 V.S.A. § 33 (medical students; primary care) is repealed on July 1, 2027.
[Deleted.]
Sec. E.312 HEALTH; PUBLIC HEALTH
(a) HIV/AIDS funding:
(1) In fiscal year 2027 and as provided in this section, the Department of
Health shall provide grants in the amount of $475,000 in AIDS Medication
Rebates special funds to the Vermont AIDS service and peer-support
organizations for client-based support services. The Department of Health
AIDS Program shall meet at least quarterly with the Community Advisory
Group with current information and data relating to service initiatives. The
funds shall be allocated according to a request for proposal process.
(2) In fiscal year 2027 and as provided by this section, the Department
of Health shall provide grants in the amount of $340,000 from the General
Fund for HIV and Harm Reduction Services to the following organizations:
(A) Vermont CARES: $165,000;
(B) AIDS Project of Southern Vermont: $115,000; and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 173 of 248
2026
(C) HIV/HCV Resource Center: $60,000.
(3) Ryan White Title II funds for AIDS services and the Vermont
Medication Assistance Program shall be distributed in accordance with federal
guidelines. The federal guidelines shall not apply to programs or services
funded solely by the General Fund.
(A) The Secretary of Human Services shall immediately notify the
Joint Fiscal Committee if at any time there are insufficient funds in the
Vermont Medication Assistance Program to assist all eligible individuals. The
Secretary shall work in collaboration with persons living with HIV/AIDS to
develop a plan to continue access to Vermont Medication Assistance Program
medications until such time as the General Assembly can take action.
(B) As provided in this section, the Secretary of Human Services
shall work in collaboration with the Vermont Medication Assistance Program
Advisory Committee, which shall be composed of not less than 50 percent of
members who are living with HIV/AIDS. If a modification to the Program’s
eligibility requirements or benefit coverage is considered, the Committee shall
make recommendations regarding the Program’s formulary of approved
medication, related laboratory testing, nutritional supplements, and eligibility
for the Program.
(4) In fiscal year 2027, the Department of Health shall provide grants in
the amount of $400,000 from the General Fund for HIV and Harm Reduction
Services on or before September 1, 2026. The method by which these
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 174 of 248
2026
prevention funds are distributed shall be determined by mutual agreement of
the Department of Health and the Vermont AIDS service organizations and
other Vermont HIV/AIDS prevention providers.
(5) In fiscal year 2027, the Department of Health shall not reduce any
grants to the Vermont AIDS service and peer-support organizations or syringe
service programs from funds appropriated for HIV/AIDS services to levels
below those in fiscal year 2026 without receiving prior approval from the Joint
Fiscal Committee.
Sec. E.313 18 V.S.A. § 4812 is amended to read:
§ 4812. SUBSTANCE MISUSE PREVENTION SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Substance Misuse Prevention Special Fund is established and
managed by the Vermont Department of Health in accordance with 32 V.S.A.
chapter 7, subchapter 5 for the purpose of funding substance misuse prevention
programming, including school-based prevention programming.
(b) Thirty percent of the revenues raised by the cannabis excise tax
imposed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 7902, not to exceed $10,000,000.00 per fiscal
year, shall be deposited into this fund for substance misuse prevention costs.
* * *
Sec. E.313.1 REPORT; RECOVERY RESIDENCES AND RECOVERY
CENTERS; INFLATION
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2028 budget presentation, the Department of
Health shall present the following information to the House Committees on
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 175 of 248
2026
Appropriations and on Human Services and to the Senate Committees on
Appropriations and on Health and Welfare:
(1) base appropriations to recovery residences and recovery centers
during the previous 10 fiscal years; and
(2) what each of those base appropriations would have been had each
kept up with inflation.
Sec. E.316 REPORT; REACH UP
(a) On or before January 15, 2027, the Department for Children and
Families shall submit a written report to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Human Services and to the Senate Committees on
Appropriations and on Health and Welfare evaluating the Reach Up Program,
including any inefficiencies or gaps in services; an actionable, phased plan that
estimates the amount needed to remove the ratable reduction in the Reach Up
program; and any recommendations for legislative action.
Sec. E.316.1 33 V.S.A. § 3702 is amended to read:
§ 3702. FUNDING
(a) The Secretary of Human Services shall disperse a joint allocation for all
parent child center services to the Parent Child Center Network, which shall
distribute funding to each authorized parent child center.
(b) The Agency shall consult with the Parent Child Center Network to
develop appropriate measures and methods of accountability for authorized
members of the Network. The Network and authorized parent child centers
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 176 of 248
2026
shall provide any previously agreed upon information to enable the Secretary
to evaluate the services provided through grant funds, the effect of services on
consumers, and an accounting of the expenditure of grant funds.
(c) Annually, as part of its budget presentation, the Agency shall inform the
House Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare of the cost of
adding a one percent base increase over the previous fiscal year’s base
appropriation for the Parent Child Center Network.
Sec. E.316.2 REPORT; PARENT CHILD CENTERS; INFLATION
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2028 budget presentation, the Department for
Children and Families shall present the following information to the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Human Services and to the Senate
Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare:
(1) base appropriations to the Parent Child Center Network during the
previous 10 fiscal years; and
(2) what each of those base appropriations would have been had each
kept up with inflation.
Sec. E.316.3 SNAP AND MEDICAID REQUIREMENTS; REPORTING
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the Agency of Human Services shall report to the
Joint Fiscal Committee on the implementation of federal H.R.1 SNAP work
requirements and, to the extent applicable, Medicaid work requirements.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 177 of 248
2026
(1) On or before September 15, 2026, with regard to SNAP benefits, the
Agency shall submit a report that includes to the extent practicable:
(A) the number of individuals who have become ineligible for
benefits or experienced a loss or reduction in benefits due to federal changes to
work requirements, including specifically by adults between 55 and 64 years of
age, individuals experiencing homelessness, and adults with a child between
14 and 18 years of age;
(B) the number of individuals who lost benefits due to federal
changes to work requirements and immediately reapplied for benefits and any
related administrative costs;
(C) the estimated total amount of benefit loss to individuals due to
federal changes to work requirements;
(D) the reasons individuals are determined ineligible for benefits;
(E) the Agency’s use of discretionary exemptions, including those
expiring in September 2026, and the remaining balance to offset benefit loss
and reductions;
(F) the number of individuals who received assistance from the
Agency due to federal changes to work requirements, including the number of
individuals who did not lose or experience a reduction in benefits after
receiving assistance from the Agency;
(G) payment error rate percentages for the current federal fiscal year,
including an analysis on Agency and client errors; and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 178 of 248
2026
(H) any other pertinent information.
(2) On or before March 1, 2027, with regard to Medicaid, the Agency
shall submit a report that includes to the extent practicable:
(A) the number of individuals who are subject to work requirements
due to federal changes;
(B) the number of individuals each month who were required to re-
enroll from January through June of 2026;
(C) the number of individuals each month who will be required to re-
enroll from January through June of 2027;
(D) an outline of the Agency’s plan for automating data-matching for
eligibly redeterminations and assessing compliance with work requirements;
and
(E) a summary of the two-year plan to recertify Vermont Medicaid
providers, including a list and timeline for providers requiring recertification
and any changes in Vermont Medicaid.
(3) Both reports shall also include:
(A) information regarding outreach, stakeholder coordination, and
other efforts undertaken to support impacted households and community
partners in assisting households to obtain and maintain benefits, including the
provision of sample notices, automated calls, text scripts, and other
communications with individuals; and
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 179 of 248
2026
(B) the number of applications supported by outreach partners,
benefit assisters, or other community service providers.
(4) In calendar years 2027 and 2028, the Agency shall, on a quarterly
basis, provide an update to the reports required by this subsection to the House
Committees on Appropriations, on Health Care, and on Human Services and
the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare while the
General Assembly is in session and to the Joint Fiscal Committee while the
General Assembly is not in session.
Sec. E.316.4 33 V.S.A. § 1703 is amended to read:
§ 1703. CHANGES TO PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION
(a)(1) The Department shall report to the Chairs of the House Committee
on Human Services and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare and,
community partners under contract with the Department to provide outreach
services, federally authorized retailers operating in Vermont, any other
interested stakeholders, and, if the General Assembly is adjourned, the Joint
Fiscal Committee, within 30 days after any substantive change in the federal
law governing SNAP that:
(A)(1) restricts or improves eligibility;
(B)(2) increases or reduces barriers or creates or eliminates hardships
to access; or
(3) identifies anticipated impacts on the administrative burden or costs
to the Department, community partners under contract with the Department to
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 180 of 248
2026
provide outreach services, or federally authorized retailers operating in
Vermont; or
(C)(4) inhibits or increases benefit usage.
(2)(b) Within Not less than 90 days after prior to the implementation of
a substantive voluntary change described pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection to Vermont’s SNAP program, the Department shall provide an
analysis to the Chairs of any anticipated administrative costs to the Department
and any impacts on SNAP applicants and participants as a result of the
change.:
(1) convene a meeting with community partners under contract with the
Department to provide outreach services, federally authorized retailers
operating in Vermont, and any other interested stakeholders to describe the
proposed change to Vermont’s SNAP program, including the anticipated
impact on eligibility, benefit level, administrative burden or costs, and any
other relevant impact of the proposed change; and
(2) consult with and consider input from community partners under
contract with the Department to provide outreach services, federally authorized
retailers operating in Vermont, and any other interested stakeholders on the
impacts of the Department’s voluntary change to Vermont’s SNAP program.
(b) The Commissioner may convene a meeting of interested stakeholders to
discuss a change listed in subsection (a) of this section.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 181 of 248
2026
Sec. E.316.5 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
ADMINISTRATION; VERMONT HOMELESSNESS
RESPONSE CONTINUUM BASE FUNDING
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.316 of this act, $1,100,000
shall be for staffing, grants, and contracts relating to the implementation of the
Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum.
(b) Any spending authority designated for the purposes provided in
subsection (a) of this section that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year
2027 shall be carried forward for the same purpose for which it was originally
designated.
Sec. E.317 SUPERVISED VISITATION PROGRAMS
(a)(1) $137,500 of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.317 of this act,
the $130,000 General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.1100(c)(5) of this act, and
$100,000 of the federal funds appropriation in Sec. B.317 of this act shall be
granted by the Department for Children and Families to supervised visitation
programs as follows:
(A) $367,500 to the six existing community-based supervised
visitation sites.
(2) The Department shall work with the Vermont Network Against
Domestic Violence and Sexual Violence to develop a funding formula for
supervised visitation sites, to identify the community partners to develop two
new supervised visitation sites during fiscal year 2027, and to begin planning
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 182 of 248
2026
for the creation of four additional supervised visitation sites, two each to
become operational beginning in fiscal years 2028 and 2029.
Sec. E.318 CHILD CARE; TUITION RATES
(a) Notwithstanding 33 V.S.A. § 3517, in fiscal year 2027, the
Commissioner for Children and Families may authorize a nonprofit child care
provider that did not rebase tuition rates pursuant to 2023 Acts and Resolves
No. 76 to increase annual tuition in excess of 1.5 times the most recent annual
increase in NAICS Code 611, Educational Services, upon a finding of financial
hardship. Prior to authorization, the Commissioner shall determine that the
child care provider has experienced a loss of revenue and is reasonably likely
to continue to experience a loss of revenue absent the requested tuition
increase. The child care provider shall furnish any information requested by
the Commissioner in support of such a determination.
Sec. E.321 END HOMELESSNESS VERMONT; GRANT;
HOMELESSNESS RESPONSE CONTINUUM
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont ranks fourth per capita in the United States for
homelessness;
(2) Vermont’s unhoused population has risen dramatically since the
COVID-19 pandemic;
(3) Vermont’s shelter, housing, and supportive services capacity is
insufficient to meet the needs of its unhoused population;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 183 of 248
2026
(4) repeated changes in program scope and eligibility requirements for
programs, including emergency housing provided through General Assistance
program, have made it difficult for Vermonters seeking housing assistance to
access and maintain support;
(5) the Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum may not be fully
implemented in fiscal year 2027; and
(6) End Homelessness Vermont has provided essential services to
unhoused Vermonters, including service navigation and coordination from
crisis through housing stability, technical assistance, and concrete supports.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the grant to End
Homelessness Vermont in Sec. B.1100(c)(4) of this act support its continued
statewide work of providing essential services to individuals living with
complex needs and disabilities who are experiencing homelessness or housing
insecurity.
Sec. E.321.1 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
GENERAL ASSISTANCE; VERMONT HOMELESSNESS
RESPONSE CONTINUUM BASE FUNDING
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.321 of this act, $9,251,120
shall be for emergency housing in hotels and motels relating to the
implementation of the Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum.
(b) Any spending authority designated for the purposes provided in
subsection (a) of this section that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 184 of 248
2026
2027 shall be carried forward for the same purpose for which it was originally
designated.
(c) Any spending authority designated for General Assistance emergency
housing that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall be carried
forward for investment in the Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum in
fiscal year 2027.
Sec. E.322 33 V.S.A. § 2605 is amended to read:
§ 2605. BENEFIT AMOUNTS
* * *
(h) Households A household receiving benefits from 3SquaresVT whose
head of household that is not otherwise eligible for a fuel benefit under this
section shall be eligible for a nominal annual Home Heating Fuel Assistance
benefit of $21.00 if a member of the household is elderly or disabled under the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program regulations.
Sec. E.323 REACH FIRST; REPEAL
(a) 33 V.S.A. chapter 10 (Reach First) is repealed.
Sec. E.325 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES; OFFICE
OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
(a) Of the General Fund appropriation in Sec. B.325 of this act,
$38,251,696 shall be used by the Department for Children and Families’ Office
of Economic Opportunity to issue grants to community agencies to assist
individuals experiencing homelessness by preserving existing services,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 185 of 248
2026
increasing services, or increasing resources available statewide. These funds
may be granted alone or in conjunction with federal Emergency Solutions
Grants funds. Grant decisions and the administration of funds shall be done in
consultation with the two U.S. Department of Housing and Urban
Development–recognized Continuum of Care programs.
Sec. E.325.1 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES OFFICE
OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY; VERMONT
HOMELESSNESS RESPONSE CONTINUUM BASE
FUNDING
(a) Of the appropriations in Sec. B.325 of this act, $38,251,696 General
Fund, $830,422 federal funds, and $202,488 Global Commitment shall be for
Housing Opportunity Grant Program operations, $778,987 General Fund and
$3,421,013 Global Commitment shall be for permanent supportive housing
and family supportive housing, $500,000 General Fund shall be for the
Community Resource Center, $2,400,000 General Fund shall be for case
management, $3,000,000 General Fund shall be for rental assistance,
$1,400,000 General Fund shall be for shelter development, and $314,618
federal funds shall be for other expenses relating to the implementation of the
Vermont Homelessness Response Continuum.
(b) Any spending authority designated for the purposes provided in
subsection (a) of this section that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 186 of 248
2026
2027 shall be carried forward for the same purpose for which it was originally
designated.
(c) Any spending authority designated for the Housing Opportunity Grant
Program that remains unexpended at the end of fiscal year 2026 shall be
carried forward for investment in the Vermont Homelessness Response
Continuum in fiscal year 2027.
Sec. E.326 DEPARTMENT FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES; OFFICE
OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY; WEATHERIZATION
ASSISTANCE
(a) Of the special fund appropriation in Sec. B.326 of this act, $750,000 is
for the replacement and repair of home heating equipment.
Sec. E.329 DESIGNATED AND SPECIALIZED SERVICE AGENCIES;
WORKING GROUP; ENGAGEMENT PROCESS; REPORT
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the Agency of Human Services, in collaboration
with Vermont Care Partners, shall convene a working group to support the
ongoing coordination and a shared understanding of the designated and
specialized service agency support system, including the system’s functioning
and capacity. The Agency, Vermont Care Partners, and the working group
shall meet at least twice during fiscal year 2027. The Agency and Vermont
Care Partners shall jointly develop the agenda in advance of each meeting.
(1) The meetings may include a discussion of State and federal
requirements, system operations and service delivery, workforce and provider
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 187 of 248
2026
capacity, fiscal pressures, administrative burden, the definition of essential
services, and the extent to which evolving community needs and system
reforms have affected the responsibilities and long-term sustainability of
designated and specialized service agencies.
(2) At the first meeting, the Agency and Vermont Care Partners shall
develop a transparent process to communicate about and implement changes
necessitated by State or federal requirements, including changes related to
funding, staffing, operational feasibility, and service delivery.
(3) The working group shall discuss alignment with the State’s health
care delivery system planning efforts, including ongoing hospital and health
system transformation work.
(4) On or before January 15, 2027, the Agency of Human Services, in
collaboration with Vermont Care Partners, shall provide an update to the
House Committees on Appropriations, on Health Care, and on Human Services
and the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare
regarding the activities of the working group.
(b) On or before January 15, 2028, the Department of Disabilities, Aging,
and Independent Living, in consultation with the Departments of Health and of
Mental Health and the Office of Health Care Reform, shall submit a plan to the
House Committees on Appropriations, on Health Care, and on Human Services
and to the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Health and Welfare
for developing and conducting a data-informed, patient-focused, community-
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 188 of 248
2026
inclusive engagement process for Vermont’s designated and specialized
service agencies that conforms with the Statewide Health Delivery Strategic
Plan developed pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 9403. Development of the plan shall
include participation by individuals who reflect Vermont’s diversity with
regard to race, income, age, and disability status. Specifically, the plan shall
include:
(1) hearing from and sharing data, information, trends, and insights with
communities about the current and future states of the designated and
specialized service agencies;
(2) providing opportunities for meaningful participation in all stages of
the engagement process by current, former, and prospective clients of the
designated and specialized service agencies and health care providers,
including employees of designated and specialized service agencies;
(3) providing the data, information, and analysis necessary to support
the engagement process, including information and trends relating to the
current and future states of the designated and specialized service agencies and
the workforce challenges encountered by the agencies; and
(4) establishing mechanisms to assess the impact of any changes on the
designated and specialized service agencies, including on workforce
recruitment and retention initiatives.
(c) As part of its fiscal year 2027 budget adjustment presentation, the
Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living may include a
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 189 of 248
2026
request for an appropriation to hire one or more consultants to support the
engagement process recommended pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. E.329.1 CHOICES FOR CARE; FISCAL YEAR 2028 BUDGET
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2028 budget presentation, the Department of
Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living shall report to the House
Committee on Human Services, the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare,
and the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations on appropriations for
the Choices for Care Program in the prior five fiscal years, including detailed
information on expenditures for home- and community-based services and
skilled nursing facility services.
Sec. E.329.2 DEPARTMENT OF DISABILITIES, AGING, AND
INDEPENDENT LIVING; POSITION POOL; FUNDING
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.329 of this act, $130,000 General
Fund shall be for a permanent, classified Disabilities Housing Coordinator
position to be taken from the position pool.
Sec. E.338 CORRECTIONS; CORRECTIONAL SERVICES
(a) Notwithstanding 32 V.S.A. § 3709(a), the special fund appropriation of
$152,000 for the supplemental facility payments to Newport and Springfield
shall be paid from the PILOT Special Fund under 32 V.S.A. § 3709.
Sec. E.500 AGENCY OF EDUCATION; BUDGET PRESENTATIONS
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2027 budget adjustment and fiscal year 2028
budget presentations, the Agency of Education shall include:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 190 of 248
2026
(1) a comprehensive account of fiscal year 2027 appropriations,
including information on amounts expended or obligated at the time of the
presentation’s submission;
(2) a comprehensive account of anticipated fiscal year 2027
carryforward, including information on the reasons for expenditures being
lower than anticipated;
(3) information on all third-party contract agreements the Agency
entered into in fiscal year 2027;
(4) organizational charts reflecting the current structure of the Agency
and each division within the Agency;
(5) written explanation of any changes to the Agency’s organizational
structure and personnel;
(6) a comprehensive account of any vacancies within the Agency,
including information on the duration of each position vacancy and any
recommendations for the elimination or redesignation of positions; and
(7) information on any changes to federal funding, rules, or policy that
may affect the Agency and any action the Agency has taken or may take to
address those changes.
Sec. E.500.1 EDUCATION; GLOBAL COMMITMENT
(a) The Global Commitment appropriation in Sec. B.500 of this act shall be
used for physician claims for determining medical necessity of Individualized
Education Programs. These services are intended to increase access to quality
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 191 of 248
2026
health care for uninsured persons, underinsured persons, and Medicaid
beneficiaries.
Sec. E.500.2 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 33 is amended to read:
Sec. 33. EDUCATION TRANSFORMATION; POOL POSITIONS
The General Fund appropriation in Sec. 32 of this act shall fund five limited
service permanent classified positions taken from the position pool. The pool
positions shall be used to establish the following limited service permanent
classified positions at the Agency of Education in fiscal year 2026 to support
education transformation work:
(1) one Business Operations Support Specialist;
(2) one Data Integration Support Specialist;
(3) one Curriculum and Education Quality Standards Integration
Specialist;
(4) one Learning and Teaching Integration Specialist; and
(5) one School Facilities Field Support Specialist.
Sec. E.500.3 16 V.S.A. § 51 is amended to read:
§ 51. UNIVERSAL AFTERSCHOOL AND SUMMER SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Universal Afterschool and Summer Special Fund is created, to be
managed by the Agency of Education. The cannabis sales tax revenue shall be
deposited into the Universal Afterschool and Summer Special Fund. The Fund
shall be used as follows:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 192 of 248
2026
(1) To establish a grant program that supports the expansion of universal
afterschool and summer programs with a focus on underserved areas of the
State.
(2) Cannabis sales tax revenue shall be used to support a mixed delivery
system for afterschool and summer programming. Eligible recipients can be
public, private, or nonprofit organizations.
(A) Grants may be used for technical assistance, program
implementation, program expansion, program sustainability, and related costs.
(B) Funds may be used to directly target communities with low
existing capacity to serve youth in afterschool and summer settings.
(C) The award of grants and any subsequent contract or written
agreement issued pursuant to the award of a grant shall require that a grantee
does not discriminate, and prohibits its employees, agents, subcontractors, and
other service providers from discriminating, on the basis of race, creed, color,
national origin, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or
disability.
(D) The Agency may use up to $500,000.00 five percent of annually
forecasted revenues for administrative costs to allow for the support of the
grant program and technical assistance to communities. This could include
subcontracts to support the grant program.
* * *
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 193 of 248
2026
Sec. E.502 EDUCATION; SPECIAL EDUCATION; FORMULA GRANTS
(a) Of the appropriation authorized in Sec. B.502 of this act, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount not to
exceed $5,336,200 shall be used by the Agency of Education in fiscal year
2027 as funding for 16 V.S.A. § 2967(b)(2)–(6). In distributing such funds,
the Secretary shall not be limited by the restrictions contained within 16 V.S.A.
§ 2969(c) and (d).
(b) Of the appropriation authorized in Sec. B.502 of this act, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, an amount not to
exceed $2,000,000 shall be used by the Agency of Education in fiscal year
2027 as funding for 16 V.S.A. § 2975. In distributing such funds, the
Secretary shall not be limited by the restrictions contained within 16 V.S.A.
§ 2969(c) and (d).
Sec. E.503 EDUCATION; STATE-PLACED STUDENTS
(a) The Independence Place Program of ANEW Place shall be considered a
24-hour residential program for the purposes of reimbursement of education
costs.
Sec. E.504 ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY
(a) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.504 of this act, $4,349,673 General Fund
shall be granted to adult education and literacy providers, pursuant to the Adult
Education and Secondary Credential Program established in 16 V.S.A. § 945.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 194 of 248
2026
Sec. E.504.1 EDUCATION; FLEXIBLE PATHWAYS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, of the Education Fund appropriation
in Sec. B.504.1 of this act, the amount of:
(1) $921,500 is available for dual enrollment programs notwithstanding
16 V.S.A. § 944(f)(2);
(2) $2,400,000 is available to support the Vermont Virtual High School;
(3) $400,000 is available for secondary school reform grants;
(4) $4,200,000 is available for Early College pursuant to 16 V.S.A.
§ 947(b); and
(5) $2,899,782 is available for the Adult Education and Secondary
Credential Program.
(b) Of the appropriation in Sec. B.504 of this act, $921,500 from the
General Fund is available for dual enrollment programs.
Sec. E.504.2 16 V.S.A. § 4021 is added to read:
§ 4021. ADULT EDUCATION FUNDING
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Local adult education and literacy provider” has the same meaning
as in section 942 of this title.
(2) “Statewide AEL student count” means the average annual number of
students statewide who complete the diagnostic portions of the adult education
and secondary credential program over the previous two completed fiscal
years.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 195 of 248
2026
(3) “Statewide AEL student-hours” means the average annual number of
student-hours of instruction provided statewide for adult education and literacy
activities over the previous two completed fiscal years.
(b) Annual appropriation. Annually, the General Assembly shall
appropriate funds to pay for adult education and literacy activities in an
amount equal to 26 percent of the base education amount multiplied by the
statewide AEL student count. The General Assembly shall appropriate
40 percent of the funds from the Education Fund and 60 percent of the funds
from the General Fund.
(c) Payment allocations.
(1) Beginning in fiscal year 2029, the Secretary shall determine
payments from the appropriation under subsection (b) of this section on a per-
county basis according to this subdivision.
(A) The Secretary shall first allocate $80,000.00 to each county.
(B) The Secretary shall then allocate the remaining funds among the
counties according to each county’s share of the statewide AEL student count.
(2) Annually, the Secretary shall pay to each local adult education and
literacy provider, as defined in section 942 of this title, that provides an adult
education and secondary credential program the amount determined pursuant
to this section for each county in which the local adult education and literacy
provider provides the county’s adult education and secondary credential
program.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 196 of 248
2026
(3) For each of fiscal years 2027 and 2028, the Secretary shall determine
payments from the appropriation under subsection (b) of this section on a per-
county basis according to this subdivision.
(A) The Secretary shall first allocate $80,000.00 to each county.
(B) The Secretary shall then allocate among the counties 85 percent
of the remaining funds according to each county’s share of the statewide AEL
student count and 15 percent of the remaining funds according to each
county’s share of the statewide AEL student-hours.
Sec. E.504.3 REPEAL
(a) 16 V.S.A. § 4021(c)(3) (adult education funding transition language) is
repealed on July 1, 2028.
Sec. E.504.4 16 V.S.A. § 4011(f) is amended to read:
(f) Annually, the Secretary shall pay to a local adult education and literacy
provider, as defined in section 942 of this title, that provides an adult education
and secondary credential program an amount equal to 26 percent of the base
education amount for each student who completes the diagnostic portions of
the adult education and secondary credential program, based on an average of
the previous two completed fiscal years. Forty percent of the payment required
under this subsection shall be from State funds appropriated from the
Education Fund and 60 percent of the payment required under this subsection
shall be from State funds appropriated from the General Fund. [Repealed.]
Sec. E.504.5 16 V.S.A. § 4021(b) is amended to read:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 197 of 248
2026
(b) Annual appropriation. Annually, the General Assembly shall
appropriate funds to pay for adult education and literacy activities in an
amount equal to 26 percent of the categorical base education amount
multiplied by the statewide AEL student count. The General Assembly shall
appropriate 40 percent of the funds from the Education Fund and 60 percent of
the funds from the General Fund.
Sec. E.507.1 ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS; CATEGORICAL AID
(a) The funds appropriated in Sec. B.507.1 of this act shall be used to
provide categorical aid to school districts for English Learner services,
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 4013.
Sec. E.511.1 STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; POSITION POOL;
FUNDING
(a) Of the General Fund appropriated in Sec. B.511.1 of this act, $130,000
shall be for a limited service exempt position to be taken from the position
pool.
Sec. E.514 VERMONT STATE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944(g)(2), the annual contribution to
the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System shall be $220,905,084, of
which $212,905,084 shall be the State’s contribution and $8,000,000 shall be
contributed from local school systems or educational entities pursuant to 16
V.S.A. § 1944c.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 198 of 248
2026
(b) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944(c)(2), of the annual contribution,
$43,739,011 is the “normal contribution,” and $177,166,073 is the “accrued
liability contribution.”
Sec. E.514.1 VERMONT STATE TEACHERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
AND VERMONT PENSION INVESTMENT COMMISSION;
OPERATING BUDGET; SOURCE OF FUNDS
(a) Of the $4,178,569 appropriated in Sec. B.514.1 of this act, $2,879,269
constitutes the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement System operating budget,
and $1,299,300 constitutes the portion of the Vermont Pension Investment
Commission’s budget attributable to the Vermont State Teachers’ Retirement
System.
Sec. E.515 RETIRED TEACHERS’ HEALTH CARE AND MEDICAL
BENEFITS
(a) In accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 1944b(b)(2) and 16 V.S.A.
§ 1944b(h)(1), the annual contribution to the Retired Teachers’ Health and
Medical Benefits plan shall be $99,834,595, of which $90,834,595 shall be the
State’s contribution and $9,000,000 shall be from the annual charge for teacher
health care contributed by employers pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 1944d. Of the
annual contribution, $30,987,156 is the “normal contribution,” and
$68,847,439 is the “accrued liability contribution.”
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 199 of 248
2026
Sec. E.600 UNIVERSITY OF VERMONT
(a) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants to
pay 1/12 of the appropriation in Sec. B.600 of this act to the University of
Vermont on or about the 15th day of each calendar month of the year.
(b) Of this appropriation, $380,362 shall be transferred to the Experimental
Program to Stimulate Competitive Research to comply with State matching
fund requirements necessary for the receipt of available federal or private
funds, or both.
Sec. E.602 VERMONT STATE COLLEGES
(a) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue warrants to
pay 1/12 of the appropriation in Sec. B.602 of this act to the Vermont State
Colleges on or about the 15th day of each calendar month of the year.
(b) Of this appropriation, $427,898 shall be transferred to the Vermont
Manufacturing Extension Center to comply with State matching fund
requirements necessary for the receipt of available federal or private funds, or
both.
Sec. E.603 VERMONT STATE COLLEGES; ALLIED HEALTH
(a) If Global Commitment Fund monies are unavailable, the total grant
funding for the Vermont State Colleges shall be maintained through the
General Fund or other State funding sources.
(b) The Vermont State Colleges shall use the Global Commitment
appropriation in Sec. B.603 of this act to support the dental hygiene,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 200 of 248
2026
respiratory therapy, and nursing programs that graduate approximately 315
health care providers annually. These graduates deliver direct, high-quality
health care services to Medicaid beneficiaries or uninsured or underinsured
persons.
Sec. E.605 VERMONT STUDENT ASSISTANCE CORPORATION
(a) Of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act:
(1) $25,000 shall be deposited into the trust fund established in 16
V.S.A. § 2845;
(2) not more than $400,000 may be used by the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation for a student aspirational initiative to serve one or more
high schools; and
(3) not less than $1,000,000 shall be used to continue the Vermont
Trades Scholarship Program established in 2022 Act and Resolves No. 183,
Sec. 14.
(b) Of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act that remain after accounting for the
expenditures set forth in subsection (a) of this section, not less than 93 percent
shall be used for direct student aid.
(c) After accounting for the expenditures set forth in subsection (a) of this
section, up to seven percent of the funds appropriated to the Vermont Student
Assistance Corporation in Sec. B.605 of this act or otherwise currently or
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 201 of 248
2026
previously appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation or
provided to the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation by an agency or
department of the State for the administration of a program or initiative may be
used by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation for its costs of
administration. The Vermont Student Assistance Corporation may recoup its
reasonable costs of collecting the forgivable loans in repayment. Funds shall
not be used for indirect costs. To the extent that any of these funds are federal
funds, allocation for expenses associated with administering the funds shall be
consistent with federal grant requirements.
Sec. E.605.1 NEED-BASED STIPEND FOR DUAL ENROLLMENT AND
EARLY COLLEGE STUDENTS
(a) Notwithstanding 16 V.S.A. § 4025, the $41,225 Education Fund and
$41,225 General Fund appropriated to the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation in Sec. B.605.1 of this act is for dual enrollment and need-based
stipend purposes to fund a flat-rate, need-based stipend or voucher program for
financially disadvantaged students enrolled in a dual enrollment course
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 944 or in early college pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 946 to
be used for the purchase of books, cost of transportation, and payment of fees.
The Vermont Student Assistance Corporation shall establish the criteria for
program eligibility. Funds shall be granted to eligible students on a first-come,
first-served basis until funds are depleted.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 202 of 248
2026
(b) On or before January 15, 2027, the Vermont Student Assistance
Corporation shall report on the program to the House Committees on
Appropriations and on Commerce and Economic Development and to the
Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs.
Sec. E.606 16 V.S.A. § 2885 is amended to read:
§ 2885. VERMONT HIGHER EDUCATION ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND
(a) A Vermont Higher Education Endowment Trust Fund is established in
the Office of the State Treasurer to comprise the following:
(1) appropriations transfers made by the General Assembly;
* * *
Sec. E.700 3 V.S.A. § 2807 is amended to read:
§ 2807. LANDS AND FACILITIES TRUST FUND
(a) Legislative purpose. The General Assembly finds and determines:
(1) The public lands, facilities, and recreational assets of Vermont
represent both a priceless inheritance from the past and an enduring legacy for
future generations.
(2) The lands, facilities, and recreational assets owned or managed by
the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation Agency of Natural Resources
are held as public assets for the citizens of Vermont, and require proper
management to ensure that these natural resources and facilities remain viable
and available for this and all future generations.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 203 of 248
2026
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and
Recreation or the Commissioner’s designee “Secretary” means the Secretary of
Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee.
(2) “Eligible activity” means any activity undertaken, initiated, or
supported by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation Agency of
Natural Resources, for State lands under the ownership of the Department of
Forests, Parks and Recreation, that provides for the management of State lands,
facilities, and recreational assets, including administrative support. “Eligible
activity” includes but is not limited to: repair and maintenance of State parks;
contract surveys and mapping; maintenance of State lands, including
boundaries, roads, trails, and facilities; contract inventories of State land
natural resources; repair of State-owned dams; repair, replacement, and
maintenance of conservation camps; and timber management in accordance
with U.S.D.A. silvicultural guidelines; project management; contract
development and administration; and business office support. “Eligible
activity” does not include the acquisition of land.
(3) “Fund” means the Lands and Facilities Trust Fund.
(c) Creation and use of Fund.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury an income-producing fund
to be known as the Lands and Facilities Trust Fund, to be managed by the State
Treasurer, and from which expenditures shall be made by the Commissioner
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 204 of 248
2026
Secretary in accordance with appropriations by the General Assembly for the
benefit of lands, facilities, and recreational assets owned or managed by the
Agency. Payments from the Fund may be made to meet costs for eligible
activities that are not covered in operating budgets for management of Agency
lands, facilities, and recreational assets.
(2) The Fund shall be administered as part of the trust investment
account established in 32 V.S.A. § 434. After the first three years of the
Fund’s existence, on July 1 of each year, the Treasurer shall may distribute
from the Fund five up to eight percent of the moving average of the market
value of the Fund over the prior 12 quarters with the approval of the House and
Senate, provided that the Fund balance does not go below the prior fiscal
year’s ending fund balance. Notwithstanding the foregoing, during the first
three years of the Fund’s existence, expenditures for immediate needs, not to
exceed five percent of the principal, may be authorized by the Commissioner
Secretary, provided that such expenditures are consistent with the priorities
established by the Commissioner Secretary, pursuant to this section, and shall
be subject to the approval of the General Assembly.
(3) Annual expenditures from the Fund shall be limited to projects
approved by the Commissioner and shall be in accordance with appropriations
of the General Assembly. Project priorities shall be determined in accordance
with criteria established by the Commissioner and shall include consideration
of at least the following: The Secretary may make expenditures from the Fund
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 205 of 248
2026
for eligible projects with a consideration towards cost; availability of funds;
condition of the resource, facility, or infrastructure; level of use; level of public
need; the stated intent of the donor, when donated property is involved; and the
ability to protect or enhance a public investment or public resource.
(4) There shall be deposited in the Fund monies received by the Agency
that are related to management and administrative support of Agency lands,
facilities, and recreational assets and that are received from a variety of public
and private sources pertinent to the purposes of the Fund, including donations;
grants; special use permits; federal funds specifically designated for uses
compatible with the intent of the fund; timber sale receipts received after June
30, 2001, from State forestland and all Agency lands otherwise not restricted;
and such sums as may be appropriated transferred to the Fund by the General
Assembly. The Agency may solicit and accept aid or contributions consistent
with the stated intent of the donor and deposited with the State Treasurer.
Income earned by the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund, and all balances
in the Fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried forward and remain
part of the Fund.
* * *
Sec. E.700.1 2018 (Sp. Sess.) Acts and Resolves No. 11, Section C.110 is
amended to read:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 206 of 248
2026
Sec. C.110 IMPLEMENTATION OF PRELIMINARY
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE VERMONT CLIMATE
ACTION COMMISSION
* * *
(b) Recommendations of the Commission and actions taken on them
include:
* * *
(5) Electrify the transportation system: The direction concerning the use
of Environmental Mitigation Trust monies resulting from the Volkswagen
litigation set forth in Sec. E.700 of this act is designed to increase
electrification of transportation.
Sec. E.700.2 2018 (Sp. Sess.) Acts and Resolves No. 11, Section E.700 is
amended to read:
Sec. E.700 VOLKSWAGEN LITIGATION; ENVIRONMENTAL
MITIGATION TRUST FOR STATE BENEFICIARIES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Appendix D-2” means Appendix D-2 to the Environmental
Mitigation Trust, entitled “Eligible Mitigation Actions and Mitigation Action
Expenditures.”
(2) “Environmental Mitigation Trust” or “Trust” means the
Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement for State Beneficiaries filed on
October 2, 2017 in In re: Volkswagen “Clean Diesel” Marketing, Sales
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 207 of 248
2026
Practices, and Products Liability Litigation, 3:16-CV-00295-CRB, MDL No.
2672 CRB (JSC) (N.D. Cal.).
(3) “Mobile source” means any vehicle, freight switcher, ferry, tug,
vessel, or equipment that qualifies under an eligible mitigation action listed in
Appendix D-2.
(b) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall administer Environmental
Mitigation Trust monies pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 554(15) and, in administering
the Trust monies appropriated under Sec. B.710 of this act, shall:
(1) Dedicate at least 15 percent of those monies for the purchase of light
duty electric supply equipment and associated allowable administrative costs in
accordance with Appendix D-2.
(2) Dedicate the remainder of the monies to the replacement of mobile
sources that consume fossil fuels with all-electric mobile sources or the
repowering of mobile sources that consume fossil fuels with all-electric
engines, or both, and associated allowable administrative costs. The
expenditures shall be in accordance with the requirements of Appendix D-2.
Sec. E.702 DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE; EQUIPMENT
REPLACEMENT FUNDING; FISCAL YEAR 2028 BUDGET
PRESENTATION
(a) As part of its fiscal year 2028 budget presentation, the Department of
Fish and Wildlife shall include information on the cost and schedule of radio
equipment and firearm life cycle replacement and any recommendations for
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 208 of 248
2026
future funding, including the establishment of a designated special fund for
that purpose.
Sec. E.711 AGENCY OF NATURAL RESOURCES; POSITION POOL;
FUNDING
(a) Of the funds appropriated in Sec. B.711 of this act, $300,000 General
Fund shall be for two permanent, classified Environmental Analysts to be
taken from the position pool to support the work required pursuant to 2024
Acts and Resolves No. 121.
Sec. E.801 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. F.8 is amended to read:
Sec. F.8 RURAL INDUSTRY DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Creation; purpose.
(1) A Rural Industry Development Grant Program is created within the
Agency of Commerce and Community Development to provide grant funding
through local development corporations for business relocation and expansion
efforts, including the purchase, demolition, and renovation of property for
industrial use.
(2)(A) To the extent funding is appropriated, the Agency shall make
grants through the Program to assist local development corporations with
business relocation and expansion efforts throughout Vermont.
(B) The Agency shall ensure an accounting of the respective State
and Grantee shares of investment in any property be maintained to refund to
the State an appropriate share of any net proceeds resulting from future sale or
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 209 of 248
2026
transfer of such property acquired or improved through a grant awarded under
this program.
(b) Grant considerations. In making grant awards, the Agency shall
consider:
(1) the real estate needs of growing and relocating businesses, including
nonprofit organizations, in the applicant’s region;
(2) the ability of the proposed project to meet the site-specific needs of
businesses considering whether to expand or locate in this State;
(3) the funding that the applicant has identified, or secured, to leverage a
grant award; and
(4) the readiness of an applicant to move a project forward.
(c) Eligible applicants; priority.
(1) To be eligible for a grant, an applicant must be a local development
corporation, as defined in subdivision 212(10) of this title, located within this
State.
(2) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development may
designate projects and agreements as first priority based on rural communities
that continue to experience insufficient economic and grand list growth.
(d) Eligible activities. A grant recipient may use funding for the following:
(1) to purchase land for potential industrial use;
(2) for the costs of site development, permitting, or providing
infrastructure for property the recipient owns;
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 210 of 248
2026
(3) for the equity investment required for a loan transaction through the
Vermont Economic Development Authority under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12,
subchapter 3; or
(4) for the matching requirement of another State or federal grant
consistent with this section.
(e) Application; market assessment.
(1) An applicant shall include in its application a local and regional
market assessment that demonstrates reasonable need for the proposed
development and identifies imminent, potential, or existing business growth
opportunities.
(2) An applicant shall submit the following to demonstrate a readiness to
begin and complete the proposed project:
(A) community and regional support for the project;
(B) that grant funding is needed to complete the proposed project;
(C) an ability to manage the project, with requisite experience and a
plan for fiscal viability; and
(D) a description of the permitting required to proceed with the
project and a plan for obtaining the permits.
(f) Awards; amount.
(1) An award shall not exceed the lesser of $1,000,000 or 20 percent of
the total project cost.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 211 of 248
2026
(2) A recipient may combine grant funds with funding from other
sources.
(3) The Agency shall release grant funds upon determining that the
applicant has met all application conditions and requirements.
(4) A grant recipient may apply for additional grant funds if future
amounts are appropriated for the Program and the funds are for a separate but
eligible use.
(g) Deed restrictions; property sales. The Agency shall include deed
restrictions that require the return of the principal amount to the state and may
require the payment of a percentage of the sales profit. [Repealed.]
Sec. E.801.1 10 V.S.A. § 6 is added to read:
§ 6. RURAL INDUSTRY DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Creation; purpose.
(1) The Rural Industry Development Grant Program is created within
the Agency of Commerce and Community Development to provide grant
funding through local development corporations for the purpose of business
relocation and expansion activities set forth in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) To the extent funding is appropriated, the Agency shall make grants
through the Program fund to assist local development corporations with
business relocation and expansion efforts throughout Vermont.
(3) As used in this section, “federally impacted property” means real
property that is:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 212 of 248
2026
(A) owned by the United States or by any federal agency or an
instrumentality thereof; or
(B) under the custody or control of a federally appointed receiver,
trustee, or conservator, and includes property subject to federal court
jurisdiction.
(b) Grant considerations. In making grant awards, the Agency shall
consider:
(1) the real estate needs of growing and relocating businesses, including
nonprofit organizations, in the applicant’s region;
(2) the ability of the proposed project to meet the site-specific needs of
businesses considering whether to expand or locate in this State;
(3) the funding that the applicant has identified, or secured, to leverage a
grant award; and
(4) the readiness of an applicant to move a project forward.
(c) Eligible applicants; priority.
(1) To be eligible for a grant, an applicant must be a local development
corporation, as defined in subdivision 212(10) of this title, located within this
State.
(2) The Secretary of Commerce and Community Development may
designate projects and agreements as first priority based on rural communities
that continue to experience insufficient economic and grand list growth.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 213 of 248
2026
(d) Eligible activities. A grant recipient shall use any funding provided
through this section only for the following:
(1) to purchase real property for potential industrial, commercial, or, in
the case of a federally impacted property, residential use;
(2) for the costs of site development, permitting, or providing
infrastructure for property the recipient owns;
(3) for a project that supports future commercial or industrial
development as outlined in a development agreement;
(4) for the equity investment required for a loan transaction through the
Vermont Economic Development Authority under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12,
subchapter 3;
(5) for the matching requirement of another State or federal grant
consistent with this section; or
(6) for the purchasing, holding, and renovation of property for the
repurposing or redevelopment of a federally impacted property.
(e) Application; market assessment.
(1) An applicant shall include in its application a local and regional
market assessment that demonstrates reasonable need for the proposed
development and identifies imminent, potential, or existing business growth
opportunities.
(2) An applicant shall submit the following to demonstrate a readiness to
begin and complete the proposed project:
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 214 of 248
2026
(A) community and regional support for the project;
(B) that grant funding is needed to complete the proposed project;
(C) an ability to manage the project, with requisite experience and a
plan for fiscal viability; and
(D) a description of the permitting required to proceed with the
project and a plan for obtaining the permits.
(f) Awards; amount.
(1)(A) An award shall not exceed the lesser of $1,000,000.00 or 50
percent of the total project cost, subject to the exception in subdivision (B) of
this subdivision (1).
(B) An award may exceed $1,000,000.00 but shall not exceed
$2,000,000.00 if the property is classified as a federally impacted property and
the Secretary certifies that the project is located in:
(i) a designated downtown development district; and
(ii) a rural economic area partnership program (REAP Zone); or
(iii) a federally declared natural disaster area, provided the
declaration was made not more than five years from the application date.
(2) A recipient may combine grant funds with funding from other
sources.
(3) The Agency shall release grant funds upon determining that the
applicant has met all application conditions and requirements.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 215 of 248
2026
(4) A grant recipient may apply for additional grant funds if future
amounts are appropriated for the Program and the funds are for a separate but
eligible use.
(g) Deed restrictions. Any deed restriction requiring a Rural Industry
Development Grant Program award recipient to return to the State the principal
amount of the grant or a percentage of the sales profit is void and shall not be
enforced.
Sec. E.801.2 INTENT AND RETROACTIVITY
(a) The intent of Secs. E.801 and E.801.1 of this act is to move the Rural
Industry Development Grant Program from its original placement in 2023 Acts
and Resolves No. 78, Sec. F.8 to Title 10 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated.
The move is intended to increase the visibility of the Program. Any applicant
that was awarded a grant through the Program before the effective date of this
act shall:
(1) not have its award rescinded solely due to the Program language
being moved to Title 10;
(2) if the award has not been fully paid out, be eligible to have the
applicant’s invoices that are submitted on or after the effective date of this act
to the Agency reimbursed at a rate of 50 percent; and
(3) not be eligible for an increased total award amount.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 216 of 248
2026
Sec. E.915 32 V.S.A. § 3709 is amended to read:
§ 3709. PILOT SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is hereby established a PILOT Special Fund consisting of local
option tax revenues paid to the State Treasurer pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138.
This Fund shall be managed by the Commissioner of Taxes pursuant to chapter
7, subchapter 5 of this title. Notwithstanding subdivision 588(3) of this title,
all interest earned on the Fund shall be retained in the Fund for use in meeting
future obligations. The Fund shall be exclusively for payments required under
chapter 123, subchapters 4 and 4C of this title chapter, and for any additional
State payments in lieu of taxes for correctional facilities, and as provided in
subsection (c) of this section. The Commissioner of Finance and Management
may draw warrants for disbursements from this Fund in anticipation of
receipts.
* * *
(c) If the local option tax cash receipts deposited in the PILOT Special
Fund, pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 138, in any State fiscal year exceed the sum of
all cash disbursements made under subchapters 4 and 4C of this chapter;
payments in lieu of taxes for correctional facilities; and grand list and appraisal
assistance during that same fiscal year, then an amount of PILOT Special
Funds equal to three-fourths of the surplus annual operating cash receipts shall
be transferred by the Commissioner of Finance and Management to the Local
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 217 of 248
2026
Option Municipal Transportation Special Fund, established pursuant to 19
V.S.A. § 306b, as part of the annual fiscal year close out process.
Sec. E.915.1 19 V.S.A. § 306b is added to read:
§ 306b. LOCAL OPTION MUNICIPAL TRANSPORTATION SPECIAL
FUND
(a) The Local Option Municipal Transportation Special Fund is established
in the Agency of Transportation and shall be managed in accordance with
32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The purpose of the Fund is to provide
additional State aid for town highways pursuant to the provisions of section
306 of this chapter.
(b) The Fund shall consist of:
(1) transfers from the PILOT Special Fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A.
§ 3709(c);
(2) any gifts, grants, or contributions made to the Fund;
(3) any amounts transferred to the Fund by the General Assembly; and
(4) all interest earned on Fund balances.
(c)(1) The Secretary may seek and accept gifts, donations, and grants from
any source, public or private, for deposit into the Fund.
(2) The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall anticipate
receipts to the Fund and shall issue warrants based on the anticipated amounts.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 218 of 248
2026
(3)(A) The Fund shall be used solely to provide State aid to
municipalities pursuant to subsections 306(a), (e), and (h) of this chapter and
for any administrative costs of administering the Fund.
(B) Notwithstanding any provision of subsections 306(a), (e), and (h)
of this chapter to the contrary, the aggregate amount of appropriations from the
Fund pursuant to those subsections in any given State fiscal year shall not
exceed 95 percent of the anticipated cash receipts to the Fund for that fiscal
year.
Sec. E.915.2 19 V.S.A. § 306 is amended to read:
§ 306. APPROPRIATION; STATE AID FOR TOWN HIGHWAYS
(a) General State aid to town highways.
(1) An annual appropriation to class 1, 2, and 3 town highways shall be
made. This appropriation shall increase over the previous fiscal year’s
appropriation by the same percentage change as the following, whichever is
less, or shall remain at the previous fiscal year’s appropriation if either of the
following are negative or zero:
* * *
(3) The funds appropriated shall be distributed to towns as follows:
(A) Six percent of the State’s annual town highway appropriation
shall be apportioned to class 1 town highways. The apportionment for each
town shall be that town’s percentage of class 1 town highways of the total class
1 town highway mileage in the State.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 219 of 248
2026
(B) Forty-four percent of the State’s annual town highway
appropriation shall be apportioned to class 2 town highways. The
apportionment for each town shall be that town’s percentage of class 2 town
highways of the total class 2 town highway mileage in the State.
(C) Fifty percent of the State’s annual town highway appropriation
shall be apportioned to class 3 town highways. The apportionment for each
town shall be that town’s percentage of class 3 town highways of the total class
3 town highway mileage in the State.
(D) Monies apportioned under subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this
subsection (a) shall be distributed to each town in quarterly payments
beginning July 15 in each year.
(E) Each town shall use the monies apportioned to it solely for town
highway construction, improvement, and maintenance purposes or as the
nonfederal share for public transit assistance. These funds may also be used
for the establishment and maintenance of bicycle routes and sidewalks. The
members of the selectboard shall be personally liable to the State, in a civil
action brought by the Attorney General, for making any unauthorized
expenditures from money apportioned to the town under this section.
(4)(A) In addition to the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection (a), a portion of the Local Option Municipal
Transportation Special Fund may be appropriated for class 1, 2, and 3 town
highways in each State fiscal year in an amount that is consistent with the
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 220 of 248
2026
provisions of subdivision 306b(c)(3) of this chapter. Amounts appropriated
shall be apportioned, distributed, and used in the same manner as provided
pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection (a).
(B) Amounts appropriated pursuant to this subdivision (4) shall be
supplemental to and shall not supplant or decrease the amount appropriated
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (a) or be subject to the annual
inflationary adjustment provided for in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection (a).
* * *
(e) State aid for town highway structures.
(1) There shall be an annual appropriation for grants to municipalities
for maintenance (, including actions to extend life expectancy), and for
construction of bridges and culverts; for maintenance and construction of other
structures, including causeways and retaining walls, intended to preserve the
integrity of the traveled portion of class 1, 2, and 3 town highways; and for
alternatives that eliminate the need for a bridge, culvert, or other structure,
such as the construction or reconstruction of a highway, the purchase of parcels
of land that would be landlocked by closure of a bridge, the payment of
damages for loss of highway access, and the substitution of other means of
access. This appropriation shall increase over the previous fiscal year’s
appropriation by the same percentage change as the following, whichever is
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 221 of 248
2026
less, or shall remain at the previous fiscal year’s appropriation if either of the
following are negative or zero:
* * *
(5) Funds received as grants for State aid for town highway structures
may be used by a municipality to satisfy a portion of the matching
requirements for federal earmarks, subject to subsection 309b(c) of this title.
(6)(A) In addition to the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection (e), a portion of the Local Option Municipal
Transportation Special Fund may be appropriated for town highway structures
in each State fiscal year in an amount that is consistent with the provisions of
subdivision 306b(c)(3) of this chapter. Amounts appropriated shall be used in
the same manner and for the same purposes as provided pursuant to
subdivisions (1) and (5) of this subsection (e).
(B) Amounts appropriated pursuant to this subdivision (6) shall be
supplemental to and shall not supplant or decrease the amount appropriated
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (e) or be subject to the annual
inflationary adjustment provided for in subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection
(e).
* * *
(h) Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program.
(1) There shall be an annual appropriation for grants to municipalities
for resurfacing, rehabilitation, or reconstruction of paved or unpaved class 2
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 222 of 248
2026
town highways. Municipalities that have no State highways or class 1 town
highways within their borders may use the grants for such activities with
respect to both class 2 and class 3 town highways. This appropriation shall
increase over the previous fiscal year’s appropriation by the same percentage
change as the following, whichever is less, or shall remain at the previous
fiscal year’s appropriation if either of the following are negative or zero:
* * *
(4) In a given fiscal year, should expenditures in the Class 2 Town
Highway Roadway Program exceed the amount appropriated, the Agency shall
advise the Governor of the need to request a supplemental appropriation from
the General Assembly to fund the additional project cost, provided that the
Agency has previously committed to completing those projects.
(5) Funds received as grants for State aid under the Class 2 Town
Highway Roadway Program may be used by a municipality to satisfy a portion
of the matching requirements for federal earmarks, subject to subsection
309b(c) of this title.
(6)(A) In addition to the amounts appropriated pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection (h), a portion of the Local Option Municipal
Transportation Special Fund may be appropriated for town highway structures
in each State fiscal year in an amount that is consistent with the provisions of
subdivision 306b(c)(3) of this chapter. Amounts appropriated shall be used in
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 223 of 248
2026
the same manner and for the same purposes as provided pursuant to
subdivisions (1) and (5) of this subsection (h).
(B) Amounts appropriated pursuant to this subdivision (6) shall be
supplemental to and shall not supplant or decrease the amount appropriated
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (h) or be subject to the annual
inflationary adjustment provided for in subdivisions (1)–(3) of this subsection
(h).
* * *
Sec. E.923 19 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. TRANSPORTATION FUND
The Transportation Fund shall comprise the following:
* * *
(8) other miscellaneous sources, including the sale of maps, plans, and
reports,; fees collected by the Travel Information Council,; leases for property
at State-owned airports and railroads,; proceeds from the sale of State surplus
property under the provisions of 29 V.S.A. §§ 1556 and 1557,; and proceeds
from the sale of recycled materials; and
(9) all interest earned in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 308a(e) and
interest earned upon the nondedicated component of the Transportation Fund.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 224 of 248
2026
Sec. E.923.1 19 V.S.A. § 11a is amended to read:
§ 11a. TRANSPORTATION FUND APPROPRIATIONS
No transportation funds shall be appropriated for the support of government
other than for the Agency, the Board, Transportation Pay Act Funds,
construction of transportation capital facilities, transportation debt service, the
purchase of level 1 and 2 electric vehicle supply equipment (EVSE) charging
ports by the Department of Housing and Community Development for the
purposes provided in 23 V.S.A. § 361, and the operation of information centers
by the Department of Buildings and General Services.
* * * Pay Act * * *
Sec. F.100 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS; FISCAL
YEARS 2027 AND 2028
(a) Fiscal year 2027. This act fully funds the first year of the collective
bargaining agreements between the State and the Vermont State Employees’
Association and the State and the Vermont Troopers’ Association for the
period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The collective bargaining
agreements for most classified employees provide in fiscal year 2027 an
average 1.9 percent step increase and a 2 percent across-the-board increase on
July 12, 2026, and a 2 percent across-the-board increase on January 10, 2027,
for a total average increase of 5.9 percent for those employees receiving step
increases during the fiscal year.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 225 of 248
2026
(b) Fiscal year 2028. This act fully funds the second year of the collective
bargaining agreements between the State and the Vermont State Employees’
Association and the State and the Vermont Troopers’ Association for the
period of July 1, 2027, through June 30, 2028. The collective bargaining
agreements for most classified employees provide in fiscal year 2028 an
average 1.9 percent step increase and a 3.0 percent across-the-board increase
for a total average increase of 4.9 percent for those employees receiving step
increases during the fiscal year.
* * * Exempt Employees; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. F.101 EXEMPT EMPLOYEES; PERMITTED SALARY INCREASES;
FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028
(a) Fiscal year 2027. The Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branches
may extend the fiscal year 2027 provisions of the collective bargaining
agreements that are funded by this act to employees not covered by the
bargaining agreements as they determine to be appropriate and in accordance
with the appropriations provided to each branch.
(b) Fiscal year 2028. The Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branches
may extend the fiscal year 2028 provisions of the collective bargaining
agreements that are funded by this act to employees not covered by the
bargaining agreements as they determine to be appropriate and in accordance
with the appropriations provided to each branch.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 226 of 248
2026
Sec. F.102 EXECUTIVE BRANCH; EXEMPT AGENCY AND
DEPARTMENT HEADS, DEPUTIES, AND EXECUTIVE
ASSISTANTS; ANNUAL SALARY ADJUSTMENT AND
SPECIAL SALARY INCREASE OR BONUS
(a) Fiscal year 2027. For purposes of determining annual salary
adjustments, special salary increases, and bonuses under 32 V.S.A. §§ 1003(b)
and 1020(b), “the average rate of adjustment available to most classified
employees under the collective bargaining agreement” shall be, in fiscal year
2027, 5.9 percent.
(b) Fiscal year 2028. For purposes of determining annual salary
adjustments, special salary increases, and bonuses under 32 V.S.A. §§ 1003(b)
and 1020(b), “the average rate of adjustment available to most classified
employees under the collective bargaining agreement” shall be, in fiscal year
2028, 4.9 percent.
* * * Executive Branch; Miscellaneous Statutory Salaries;
Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. F.103 32 V.S.A. § 1003 is amended to read:
§ 1003. STATE OFFICERS
(a) Each elective officer of the Executive Department is entitled to an
annual salary as follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 227 of 248
2026
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Governor $222,371 $234,379
(2) Lieutenant Governor $94,392 $99,489
(3) Secretary of State $141,003 $148,617
(4) State Treasurer $141,003 $148,617
(5) Auditor of Accounts $141,003 $148,617
(6) Attorney General $168,837 $177,954
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Governor $243,520 $248,390 $260,561
(2) Lieutenant Governor $103,369 $105,436 $110,602
(3) Secretary of State $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
(4) State Treasurer $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
(5) Auditor of Accounts $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
(6) Attorney General $184,894 $188,592 $197,833
(b) The Governor may appoint each officer of the Executive Branch listed
in this subsection at a starting salary ranging from the base salary stated for
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 228 of 248
2026
that position to a salary that does not exceed the maximum salary unless
otherwise authorized by this subsection. The maximum salary for each
appointive officer shall be 50 percent above the base salary. Annually, the
Governor may grant to each of those officers an annual salary adjustment
subject to the maximum salary. The annual salary adjustment granted to
officers under this subsection shall not exceed the average rate of adjustment
available to most classified employees under the collective bargaining
agreement then in effect. In addition to the annual salary adjustment specified
in this subsection, the Governor may grant a special salary increase subject to
the maximum salary, or a bonus, to any officer listed in this subsection whose
job duties have significantly increased, or whose contributions to the State in
the preceding year are deemed especially significant. Special salary increases
or bonuses granted to any individual shall not exceed the average rate of
adjustment available to most classified employees under the collective
bargaining agreement then in effect.
(1) Heads of the following Departments and Agencies:
Base Base
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(A) Administration $134,466 $141,727
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 229 of 248
2026
(B) Agriculture,
Food and
Markets $134,466 $141,727
(C) Financial
Regulation $125,706 $132,494
(D) Buildings and
General Services $125,706 $132,494
(E) Children and
Families $125,706 $132,494
(F) Commerce and
Community
Development $134,466 $141,727
(G) Corrections $125,706 $132,494
(H) Defender
General $125,706 $132,494
(I) Disabilities,
Aging, and
Independent
Living $125,706 $132,494
(J) Economic
Development $114,031 $120,189
(K) Education $134,466 $141,727
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 230 of 248
2026
(L) Environmental
Conservation $125,706 $132,494
(M) Finance and
Management $125,706 $132,494
(N) Fish and
Wildlife $114,031 $120,189
(O) Forests, Parks
and Recreation $114,031 $120,189
(P) Health $125,706 $132,494
(Q) Housing and
Community
Development $114,031 $120,189
(R) Human
Resources $125,706 $132,494
(S) Human Services $134,466 $141,727
(T) Digital Services $134,466 $141,727
(U) Labor $125,706 $132,494
(V) Libraries $114,031 $120,189
(W) Liquor and
Lottery $114,031 $120,189
(X) [Repealed.]
(Y) Mental Health $125,706 $132,494
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 231 of 248
2026
(Z) Military $125,706 $132,494
(AA) Motor
Vehicles $114,031 $120,189
(BB) Natural
Resources $134,466 $141,727
(CC) Land Use Review
Board Chair $114,031 $120,189
(DD) Public Safety $125,706 $132,494
(EE) Public Service $125,706 $132,494
(FF) Taxes $125,706 $132,494
(GG) Tourism and
Marketing $114,031 $120,189
(HH) Transportation $134,466 $141,727
(II) Vermont Health
Access $125,706 $132,494
(JJ) Veterans’ Home $125,706 $132,494
Base Base Base
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(A) Administration $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 232 of 248
2026
(B) Agriculture,
Food and
Markets $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(C) Financial
Regulation $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(D) Buildings and
General Services $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(E) Children and
Families $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(F) Commerce and
Community
Development $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(G) Corrections $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(H) Defender
General $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(I) Disabilities,
Aging, and
Independent
Living $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(J) Economic
Development $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(K) Education $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 233 of 248
2026
(L) Environmental
Conservation $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(M) Finance and
Management $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(N) Fish and
Wildlife $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(O) Forests, Parks
and Recreation $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(P) Health $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(Q) Housing and
Community
Development $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(R) Human
Resources $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(S) Human Services $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(T) Digital Services $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(U) Labor $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(V) Libraries $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(W) Liquor and
Lottery $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(X) [Repealed.]
(Y) Mental Health $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 234 of 248
2026
(Z) Military $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(AA) Motor
Vehicles $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(BB) Natural
Resources $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(CC) Land Use Review
Board Chair $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(DD) Public Safety $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(EE) Public Service $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(FF) Taxes $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(GG) Tourism and
Marketing $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(HH) Transportation $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(II) Vermont Health
Access $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(JJ) Veterans’ Home $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(2) [Repealed.]
(3) If the Chair of the Land Use Review Board is employed on less than
a full-time basis, the hiring and salary maximums for that position shall be
reduced proportionately.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 235 of 248
2026
(4) When a permanent employee is appointed to an exempt position, the
Governor may authorize such employee to retain the present salary even
though it is in excess of any salary maximum provided in statute.
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding the maximum salary established in subsection (b) of
this section, the Defender General shall not receive compensation in excess of
the compensation established for the Attorney General in this section.
(e) Notwithstanding the maximum salary established in subsection (b) of
this section, the maximum salary for the Commissioner of Health shall not
exceed 100 percent above the base salary for this position.
* * * Judicial Branch; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. F.104 32 V.S.A. § 1003(c) is amended to read:
(c) The officers of the Judicial Branch named in this subsection shall be
entitled to annual salaries as follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Chief Justice of
Supreme Court $214,024 $225,581
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 236 of 248
2026
(2) Each Associate
Justice $204,264 $215,294
(3) Chief Superior
Judge $204,264 $215,294
(4) Each Superior
Judge $194,185 $204,671
(5) [Repealed.]
(6) Each
Magistrate $146,413 $154,319
(7) Each Judicial
Bureau hearing
officer $146,413 $154,319
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Chief Justice of
Supreme Court $234,379 $239,067 $250,781
(2) Each Associate
Justice $223,690 $228,164 $239,344
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 237 of 248
2026
(3) Chief Superior
Judge $223,690 $228,164 $239,344
(4) Each Superior
Judge $212,653 $216,906 $227,534
(5) [Repealed.]
(6) Each
Magistrate $160,337 $163,544 $171,558
(7) Each Judicial
Bureau hearing
officer $160,337 $163,544 $171,558
Sec. F.105 32 V.S.A. § 1141 is amended to read:
§ 1141. ASSISTANT JUDGES
(a)(1) Each assistant judge of the Superior Court shall be entitled to receive
compensation in the amount of $224.47 a day as of July 14, 2024 and $236.59
a day as of July 13, 2025 $245.82 a day as of July 12, 2026, $250.74 a day as
of January 10, 2027, and $263.03 a day as of July 11, 2027, for time spent in
the performance of official duties and necessary expenses as allowed to
classified State employees. Compensation under this section shall be based on
a two-hour minimum and hourly thereafter.
(2)(A) The compensation paid to an assistant judge pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the State except as provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (2).
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 238 of 248
2026
(B) The compensation paid to an assistant judge pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the county at the State rate established in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section when an assistant judge is sitting with a presiding
Superior judge in the Civil or Family Division of the Superior Court.
(b) Assistant judges of the Superior Court shall be entitled to receive pay
for such days as they attend court when it is in actual session or during a court
recess when engaged in the special performance of official duties.
Sec. F.106 32 V.S.A. § 1142 is amended to read:
§ 1142. PROBATE JUDGES
(a) The Probate judges in the several Probate Districts shall be entitled to
receive the following annual salaries, which shall be paid by the State in lieu of
all fees or other compensation:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Addison $76,555 $80,689
(2) Bennington $96,776 $102,002
(3) Caledonia $67,891 $71,557
(4) Chittenden $161,506 $170,227
(5) Essex $18,966 $19,990
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 239 of 248
2026
(6) Franklin $76,555 $80,689
(7) Grand Isle $18,966 $19,990
(8) Lamoille $53,443 $56,329
(9) Orange $63,554 $66,986
(10) Orleans $62,110 $65,464
(11) Rutland $137,221 $144,631
(12) Washington $105,441 $111,135
(13) Windham $85,221 $89,823
(14) Windsor $115,555 $121,795
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Addison $83,836 $85,513 $89,703
(2) Bennington $105,980 $108,100 $113,397
(3) Caledonia $74,348 $75,835 $79,551
(4) Chittenden $176,866 $180,403 $189,243
(5) Essex $20,770 $21,185 $22,223
(6) Franklin $83,836 $85,513 $89,703
(7) Grand Isle $20,770 $21,185 $22,223
(8) Lamoille $58,526 $59,697 $62,622
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 240 of 248
2026
(9) Orange $69,598 $70,990 $74,469
(10) Orleans $68,017 $69,377 $72,776
(11) Rutland $150,272 $153,277 $160,788
(12) Washington $115,469 $117,778 $123,549
(13) Windham $93,326 $95,193 $99,857
(14) Windsor $126,545 $129,076 $135,401
(b) Probate judges shall be entitled to be paid by the State for their actual
and necessary expenses under the rules pertaining to classified State
employees. The compensation for the Probate judge of the Chittenden District
shall be for full-time service.
(c) All Probate judges, regardless of the number of hours worked annually,
shall be eligible to participate in all employee benefits that are available to
exempt employees of the Judicial Department.
* * * Sheriffs; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. F.107 32 V.S.A. § 1182 is amended to read:
§ 1182. SHERIFFS
(a) The sheriffs of all counties except Chittenden shall be entitled to receive
salaries in the amount of $104,010.00 as of July 14, 2024 and $109.627.00 as
of July 13, 2025 $113,902.00 as of July 12, 2026, $116,180.00 as of January
10, 2027, and $122,873.00 as of July 11, 2027. The Sheriff of Chittenden
County shall be entitled to an annual salary in the amount of $110,070.00 as of
July 14, 2024 and $116,014.00 as of July 13, 2025 $120,539.00 as of July 12,
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 241 of 248
2026
2026, $122,950.00 as of January 10, 2027, and $128,975.00 as of July 11,
2027.
(b) Compensation under subsection (a) of this section shall be reduced by
10 percent for any sheriff who has Level II but not obtained Level III law
enforcement officer certification under 20 V.S.A. § 2358.
* * *
* * * State’s Attorneys; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. F.108 32 V.S.A. § 1183 is amended to read:
§ 1183. STATE’S ATTORNEYS
(a) The State’s Attorneys shall be entitled to receive annual salaries as
follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Addison County $140,691 $148,288
(2) Bennington
County $140,691 $148,288
(3) Caledonia County $140,691 $148,288
(4) Chittenden County $147,087 $155,030
(5) Essex County $105,521 $111,219
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 242 of 248
2026
(6) Franklin County $140,691 $148,288
(7) Grand Isle County $105,521 $111,219
(8) Lamoille County $140,691 $148,288
(9) Orange County $140,691 $148,288
(10) Orleans County $140,691 $148,288
(11) Rutland County $140,691 $148,288
(12) Washington
County $140,691 $148,288
(13) Windham County $140,691 $148,288
(14) Windsor County $140,691 $148,288
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Addison County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(2) Bennington
County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(3) Caledonia County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(4) Chittenden County $161,076 $164,298 $172,349
(5) Essex County $115,557 $117,868 $123,644
(6) Franklin County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 243 of 248
2026
(7) Grand Isle County $115,557 $117,868 $123,644
(8) Lamoille County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(9) Orange County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(10) Orleans County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(11) Rutland County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(12) Washington
County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(13) Windham County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(14) Windsor County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(b) In settlement of their accounts, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management shall allow the State’s Attorneys the expense of printing briefs in
cases in which the State’s Attorney has represented the State and their
necessary and actual expenses under the rules pertaining to classified State
employees.
Sec. F.108.1 32 V.S.A. § 1183 is amended to read:
§ 1183. STATE’S ATTORNEYS
* * *
(c) Compensation under subsection (a) of this section shall be reduced by
30 percent for any State’s Attorney who is not licensed or authorized to
practice law in the State pursuant to the administrative orders issued by the
Vermont Supreme Court.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 244 of 248
2026
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. F.109 PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND
2028
(a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2028; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
Association for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028; and salary
increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
agreements shall be funded as follows:
(1) Fiscal year 2027.
(A) General Fund. The amount of $23,918,820.00 is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Secretary of Administration for distribution to
departments to fund the fiscal year 2027 collective bargaining agreements and
the requirements of this act.
(B) Transportation Fund. The amount of $3,000,000.00 is
appropriated from the Transportation Fund to the Secretary of Administration
for distribution to the Agency of Transportation to fund the fiscal year 2027
collective bargaining agreements and the requirements of this act.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 245 of 248
2026
(C) Other funds. The Administration shall provide additional
spending authority to departments through the existing process of excess
receipts to fund the fiscal year 2027 collective bargaining agreements and the
requirements of this act. The estimated amounts are $27,184,607.00 from a
special fund, federal funds, and other sources.
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2027, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
(2) Fiscal year 2028.
(A) General Fund. The amount of $24,974,632.00 is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Secretary of Administration for distribution to
departments to fund the fiscal year 2028 collective bargaining agreements and
the requirements of this act.
(B) Transportation Fund. The amount of $3,000,000.00 is
appropriated from the Transportation Fund to the Secretary of Administration
for distribution to the Agency of Transportation to fund the fiscal year 2028
collective bargaining agreements and the requirements of this act.
(C) Other funds. The Administration shall provide additional
spending authority to departments through the existing process of excess
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 246 of 248
2026
receipts to fund the fiscal year 2028 collective bargaining agreements and the
requirements of this act. The estimated amounts are $28,362,343.00 from a
special fund, federal funds, and other sources.
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2028, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
(3) This section shall include sufficient funding to ensure administration
of exempt pay plans authorized by 32 V.S.A. § 1020(c).
(b) Judicial Branch.
(1) The Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court may extend the
provisions of the Judiciary’s collective bargaining agreement to Judiciary
employees who are not covered by the bargaining agreement.
(2) Fiscal year 2027. The first year of the two-year agreements between
the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’ Association for the
judicial bargaining unit for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027,
and salary increases for employees in the Judicial Branch not covered by the
bargaining agreements shall be funded as follows: the amount of
$3,800,867.00 is appropriated from the General Fund and the amount of
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 247 of 248
2026
$277,316.00 is provided from other sources to the Judiciary to fund the fiscal
year 2027 collective bargaining agreement and the requirements of this act.
(3) Fiscal year 2028. The second year of the two-year agreements
between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’ Association
for the judicial bargaining unit for the period of July 1, 2027, through June 30,
2028, and salary increases for employees in the Judicial Branch not covered by
the bargaining agreements shall be funded as follows: the amount of
$2,466,396.00 is appropriated from the General Fund and the amount of
$179,952.00 is provided from other sources to the Judiciary to fund the fiscal
year 2028 collective bargaining agreement and the requirements of this act.
(c) Legislative Branch.
(1) For the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, the General
Assembly, including all Legislative Branch employees, shall be funded as
follows: the amount of $914,634.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Legislative Branch.
(2) For the period of July 1, 2027, through June 30, 2028, the General
Assembly, including all Legislative Branch employees, shall be funded as
follows: the amount of $778,939.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Legislative Branch.
VT LEG #390227 v.1

No. 144 Page 248 of 248
2026
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. G.100 EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. C.100, C.101, C.102, C.103, C.104, C.105,
C.106, C.107, C.108, C.109, C.110, C.111, C.112, C.113, C.114, C.115,
E.504.2, E.504.3, E.504.4, E.801, E.801.1, E.801.2, E.915, and F.108.1 shall
take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. E.307.1, E.307.2, E.307.3, and E.307.5 shall take effect on
October 1, 2026.
(c) Secs. E.307.4 and E.923 shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
(d) Sec. E.504.5 shall take effect upon the occurrence of the contingencies
set forth in 2025 Acts and Resolves No. 73, Sec. 70(f).
(e) Sec. E.100.3 shall take effect retroactively on June 30, 2024.
(f) All other sections shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390227 v.1